Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Number of Reviews
69

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
It was to my detriment that I waited six weeks before finally seeing
_Saving Private Ryan_.  In the interim, I've heard a synopsis, strong
views pro and con, warnings of its graphic nature, and the candidates
for Oscar noms.  Superlatives ("the best war film ever made") are used
extravagantly, and there is this unwritten pressure to follow the media
frenzy.  Oh woe.  If only I had seen this afresh, with no pap.  Fat
chance.
That said, the best way to describe _Saving Private Ryan_ is by use of
analogy.  _Saving Private Ryan_ is to _Schindler's List_ is what _The
Lost World_ was to _Jurassic Park_.  It is a gorier, drawn out excursion
of elements made better in a prior film.  Lucky for Spielberg, _SPR_
doesn't suck like _Lost World_ did.  But Oscar contender?  I dunno.
Tom Hanks stars as Captain John Miller, a dedicated everyman, given the
task to find Private Ryan, so he could be released from duty.  Ryan's
three brothers had all died in the war, and the mother is in terrible
grief.  Such a move, reasons General George C. Marshall (Fargo's Harve
Presnell), should boost morale.
Should, but doesn't.  There's immense resentment amongst the ranks in
Miller's unit, most prominently voiced by Private Reiben (excellently
played by Ed Burns).  Does it make sense for an entire unit to risk
their lives in order to save one man?  Doesn't every other soldier there
have a mother too?
It's a good question, but remains unanswered.  Which puts the film in a
catch-22:  had the film been based on a real event, then a greater theme
of following unjust orders for a just cause would have genuine merit.
Because it's fiction, it's just a plot device, and a lame one at that.
The purpose of this plot device is to show, in vivid detail, the
atrocities of World War II.  Does it succeed?  Well... yes and no.  The
violence in the film is unlike any other World War II film ever made.
But violence doesn't equal realism.  I repeat: _Violence Does Not Equal
Realism_.
An example of this is in the opening sequence, mirrored after D-Day.
Two men are hiding underwater.  Two bullets (and _only_ two bullets)
glide down from above.  Two hits, in both chests.  Sure, it's
ultra-violent, it's relentless, and it's exhausting.  War is hell.  But
was that moment in cinema history realistic?  Me-thinks not.
Meanwhile, the stars of the film could have waltzed in wearing loud
neon-colored bulls-eyes on their helmets.  They're just not going to be
hit.  Oh sure, the red-shirts next to them will, including one who takes
off his helmet, to study the bullet that missed him.  Not a good idea.
The D-Day scene has some interesting camerawork that sets it apart from
(but not superior to) that in _Glory_, _Apocolypse Now_, or _Platoon_.
I liked the eerie slow-motion in real-time effect, which gave a vivid
impression that we were seeing through Tom Hanks' eyes.  We are also
treated to the documentary-verite style of having the camera zig-zag
everywhere, sometimes with splatters of blood on its lens.  If nothing
else, these get some kudos.
Further, the opening sequence is also much gorier than any D-Day
sequence before.  But gore is gore.  Gore does not advance the plot,
increase the tension, or make a better film.  It just weakens the
stomachs of those who would otherwise want to see this film, but won't.
Meanwhile, Fangoria connoisseurs can see where Spielberg lifted his
ideas:  lessee... the intestines hanging out is from _Scream_, and the
man searching for his arm is similar to _Re-Animator_, only the effect
in those films was far more devastating...
Other finer plot points lifted from other films:  there's that
sharpshooter who prays and quotes Scripture before pulling the trigger.
There are elements of _Pulp Fiction_ and _Desperado_ in there.  Tell me,
if you see the Spielbergian shot of an extreme close up from the barrel
of a gun to the eye of the sharpshooter, just to hear him quote a Psalm
("Thou O Lord are my high tower"), do you think he's gonna miss his
target?
Then there's the cowardly everyman, Corporal Upham, who's played vividly
by Jeremy Davies (_Spanking the Monkey_).  The buzz is that he's a
sure-thing Oscar contender.  But his opening scene, where he clumsily
knocks down everything in his path and offers to bring a typewriter to
the mission, is among the worst acting and writing I have seen this
year. Perhaps Spielberg could not resist injecting some humor in the
film, which didn't need any.
The other strong supporting-Actor Oscar contender (they say) is Tom
Sizemore, who plays Captain Miller's gruff assistant, Sergeant Horvath.
Sizemore is okay, but nowhere near the perfection he reached in _Heat_.
Nah.  The best acting in the film is Hanks (a deserved given), with a
close second being that of Ed Burns.  Burns is resentful, thoughtful,
outspoken, tough, and dependable.  Most importantly, he's _real_.
Along the way, there are also nice cameos by Dennis Farina, Paul
Giametti, and Ted Danson.  But I secretly wished that the invisible
shield that surrounded a highly compensated cameo should've been lifted,
and the actor been shot at and died.  Particuarly Danson.  (No such
luck.)
Lastly, it is an unfortunate casting choice to have Matt Damon, fresh
off of _Good Will Hunting_ fame, play the title role.  Had he been an
unknown character actor, as he was when he was cast, there would have
been real suspense in the search.  No dice.  A scene where they find
another "Private James Ryan" is totally useless and from the
Screenwriter's Guide for Curing Writer's Block.  With an unknown actor
in that role, there would have been genuine tension, because you _just
wouldn't know_.
Damon is the only actor in the troupe who did not undergo a vicious
basic training beforehand.  It should come as no surprise that compared
to the rugged, tired, frustrated faces of his pursuers, Damon appears to
be out from walking his dog.  Maybe such a contrast would've worked.
Not here.
I don't want to give the wrong impression.  _Saving Private Ryan_ is a
pretty good movie.  Unfortunately, it's the masquerading as THE GREATEST
WAR MOVIE EVER MADE that's bothering me.  It has too many Spielbergisms
and cliches and screenplay distractions to merit that honor.  In the
final sequence, we see an old man revisiting the gravesite of a fellow
soldier, saying to his wife, "Tell me I've been a good man." I am not
impressed.  Sorry.
It's hard to place superlatives, but for my money, the best war film
ever made is a toss-up between _Paths of Glory_ and (if you have the
patience) _Gettysburg_.  Search for them.  Those are needles in a stack
of needles (at your video store).

Author
Ryan Ellis
give me a buzz on the ol' e-lines, iluvmick@hotmail.com
        Steven Spielberg is a busy man. He's got a lot to worry
about with his leadership of 'Dreamworks SKG' and concurrently
trying to find scripts that appeal to the artist inside him.
Fortunately, a man with his kind of stroke in Hollywood can take
producing credit on some lesser projects and then direct his
personal favourites. Only his 6th directing effort of the '90s,
"Saving Private Ryan" is his most brutal, and perhaps most
honest, film.
        Like Spielberg's 1993 masterpiece, "Schindler's List", this
picture has historic significance. People can study "Saving
Private Ryan" and actually learn something about the horrors of
World War II. Now, don't assume that "study" means that young
kids should see this. They certainly should NOT see it because
the violence is so brutally frightening. What happens to the men
in this picture makes the violence in most action films look even
MORE cartoonish than usual. This is blood and guts at its
stripped-down core.
        And gore may have never been shown on the silver screen like
this. Even stupid slasher flicks haven't shown this much
diversity in how to kill people. The now-famous first 25 minutes
of "Saving Private Ryan" is the D-Day invasion on Omaha Beach.
The Allied Forces storm the beach to take it from the Germans by
sending in the ground troops to break down the defences. Before
many of the young men ever get off the boats, they're shot like
sittin' ducks. Using a great deal of hand-held camera shots and
terrific make-up, Spielberg shows men loosing limbs, internal
organs, heads, and obviously their lives throughout the bloody
invasion. As the bodies pile up and the audience grip their
arm-rests, the troops surge forward to "take the beach".
Ultimately successful in their primary objective, but faced with
massive loss of lives, the armed forces do what you do in war
when bad stuff happens--move on.        
        So, having said that, the movie would not have worked if the
main characters were not likable. And who's more likable on the
big screen than Tom Hanks? The two-time Oscar-winner is as close
to a modern-day Jimmy Stewart as we have. Heck, I'd follow Tom
Hanks into war. Nominated for another Academy Award as Captain
John Miller, Hanks leads a platoon of 7 other men into the heart
of a war-torn Europe. Their mission--and they have no choice but
to accept it--is to find the youngest son of a mother who has
already lost his 3 older brothers. They have orders to bring him
out so he can go home.
        On the surface, it's a simple story and one that COULD end
when they find Private Ryan (Matt Damon). A poor movie would end
with the trumpets blaring and the credits rolling when the entire
platoon stumbles victoriously into friendly territory with the
young fella. This film is better than that. It dares to give us a
reason to believe in their mission of endangering 8 lives for the
life of 1. You believe in their mission by the time the final
guns go off and just have to love these fightin' men. A part of
you dies when they die. Well, not ALL of them end up dead, but
let's be honest--even if you haven't seen the film--they're not
all coming out alive. After all, this is war and war is hell.
        Young Ryan responds in perhaps the most honest and
honourable way he could when the platoon find him--he refuses to
leave because he feels obligated to stay and defend a bridge with
his new "brothers", his squadron. The climactic battle with the
heavily fortified Germans is almost as messy as the D-Day
invasion. The out-manned Americans fight gallantly, but this
final battle rivals the one on Omaha Beach in terms of bloodshed.
        It's strange that one of the hottest actors on the planet,
Matt Damon, is not the star of this show (even if he IS the title
character). He is appropriately cast as the boy they're trying to
save. You feel the same way the platoon does when they first see
him--all the bellyaching about the mission is easily forgettable
when you put a face to the name. The chief "bellyacher" is Reiben
(Edward Burns). Playing the wisecracking' kid from Brooklyn,
Burns looked to be a good bet to receive an Oscar nomination.
Since he didn't, he can take something far more valuable from
this film--as a young director, he got to work with the immortal
Spielberg. Tom Sizemore, who plays loyal Sgt. Horvath, could have
been an Oscar-finalist, too, since he so epitomized the
toughness, grit, and sincerity of the group. Also, Jeremy Davies,
the green corporal brought along to translate, is like a small
child caught in a mansized nightmare. He's very good in his role,
as well.
        In all, "Saving Private Ryan" was nominated for 11 Academy
Awards, ranging from sound to art direction to score (John
Williams, alas) to the phenomenal make-up. However, it didn't get
the nod for Visual Effects and that's just not right. All those
bullets and explosions and hideous deaths were worthy of some
recognition. So, if the Academy won't do it, then I'll recognize
it here--the terrific special effects were award-worthy because
they were helpful to the story, rather than BEING the story.
        Spielberg has now shown the Jewish side and the American
side of WWII. It will be interesting to see if he takes a big
risk and tackles a project that shows the German, Japanese, or
even the Russian side of that war. If he does, he could be in
line for a third Best Director Oscar (provided he wins this year,
of course).
        This is only the second movie I've ever seen twice in a
theatre and it's good enough to be seen again. When I walked out
of the cinema the first time last summer, I said "there's your
Oscar winner right there". I stand by that quote even today,
despite the wonderful rivalry that should develop between "Saving
Private Ryan" and "Shakespeare In Love". Both films are worthy in
this two-horse race, but the great Steven Spielberg deserves a
2nd Best Director Oscar. I believe he'll win it for this film.
USELESS TRIVIA--If Tom Hanks wins his 3rd Oscar, he would become
the first actor to ever win 3 awards in a leading role (all of
them in just 6 years!).
This film receives a 10/10.
It also ranks #74 on My 100 Favourite Films list.


Author
Sridhar Prasad
    Steven Spielberg's second epic film on World War II is an 
unquestioned masterpiece of film.  Spielberg, ever the student on film, 
has managed to resurrect the war genre by producing one of its 
grittiest, and most powerful entries.  He also managed to cast this 
era's greatest answer to Jimmy Stewart, Tom Hanks, who delivers a 
performance that is nothing short of an astonishing miracle.
For about 160 out of its 170 minutes, "Saving Private Ryan" is 
flawless.  Literally.  The plot is simple enough.  After the epic D-Day 
invasion (whose sequences are nothing short of spectacular), Capt. John 
Miller (Hanks) and his team are forced to search for a Pvt. James Ryan 
(Damon), whose brothers have all died in battle.  Once they find him, 
they are to bring him back for immediate discharge so that he can go 
home.  Accompanying Miller are his crew, played with astonishing 
perfection by a group of character actors that are simply sensational.  
Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Vin Diesel, Giovanni Ribisi, Davies, and 
Burns are the team sent to find one man, and bring him home.
The battle sequences that bookend the film are extraordinary.  
Literally.  There is nothing in film that has ever been recorded that 
will prepare you for the sheer onslaught of terrorizing violence in the 
film's first 20 minutes.  Spielberg films almost the entire movie 
without music, leaving it up to the characters to generate emotion, and 
they do to perfection.  The sequences in France, all of them, beginning 
with the battle and ending with the battle, are fabulous, especially the 
dialogues between the men as they walk through the hills and 
countrysides, trying to save Private Ryan.
There are no words I can use to describe the true horror and power 
of these sequences.  This is what Coppola was looking for in "Apocalypse 
Now", but couldn't create.  The sheer horror of these sequences all but 
condemn war.  The performance by Hanks as the leader of this gang is 
also extraordinary.  He is head and shoulders above of the rest of the 
actors in the world, with his comic timing, dramatic flair, his quiet 
emotion that stirs an entire nation to tears.  Hanks is this country's 
finest actor, and he proves it here.
However, Spielberg almost destroys his own masterpiece.  With a 
chance to make it the one of the greatest films of all time, Spielberg 
creates 10 minutes of purely worthless film.  The sequence involving 
Army Chief-of-Stafff George Marshall and Mrs. Ryan is decent, but 
doesn't hold up to the rest of the film, relying on wartime cliches to 
power it.  But that is forgivable.  What isn't is the bookends of the 
film, the cemetary sequences.  The first one is quite good, a decent 
introduction into the lives of these men.  The last sequence is 
atrocious.  The forced emotion, accompanied by a ridiculous piece of 
music, is simply horrible compared to the rest of the magical film.  
These flaws are what downgrade "Ryan" from the greatest film of our era, 
to the greatest war film of our era.  Spielberg should have trusted his 
own material, and he should have trusted Hanks to deliver the most 
chilling line of the movie, to end his masterpiece right there.  The use 
of the flag, though patriotic, is in contrast to the movie's theme.  The 
power of the bulk of the film, however, is astonishing.  Spielberg has 
truly made a wondrous work of art, that persists even after first 
viewing of the film, is extraordinary.  This is the film of the year.

Author
Alex Ioshpe
An elderly man stepping into an endless sea of white crosses. He finds one
particular cross amidst thousands and falls on his knees before it. Suddenly
we're transported to Omaha beach, it is June 6th 1944. Landing crafts are
breaking the dark waves. Men are silently praying, some are throwing up,
partly of fear, partly of seasickness.  A shaking hand is reaching out for
the water cannister.
"30 seconds...God be with you...". A soldier kissing a silver cross in the
sun light and then all hall breaks loose. The unprepared soldiers are met
with overwhelming gunfire. Now the camera, masterfully handled by Director
of Cinematography Janusz Kaminski , is running, twisting on the beach.
Chaotic flashes of light, the ground going up and coming down, confused
soldiers, half crazed by fear, are helplessly trying to stay alive. Some of
these scenes will forever burn into your mind. A soldier picking up his
severed arm, wondering off in shock. A German bullet fired from the bluff
above gazes a GI helmet, making a harmless clang, but before the soldier can
registrate his luck, another bullet catches him in the forehead, tearing out
the back of his scull. Another soldier, a young boy, is lieng on the ground
with his belly wide open, holding his silver cross. Burning men thrown many
feet in the air by mines and grenades, land with missing body parts. Whether
you live or die is a matter of luck, not survival tactics or experience.
Severed heads, limbs, terror, screams and panic are everywhere - this is the
real apocalypse now. No one dies heroically, pretty or mercifully. There are
no John Wayns or Rambos. These soldiers are ordinary men in extraordinary
sercomstances and they behaved extraordinary. When
ends with success and the gun fire stops, Kaminski's previously furious
camera, elegantly flyes over the beach. The sea water is red with blood and
the shore is covered with uncountless bodies. And while the majestic and
powerful score kicks in, you can whipe off your cold sweat and start
breathing normally after the most intense, graphical, terrifying as well as
artistic combat sequence ever created. This is the beginning of  Steven
Spielberg's  nightmare vision of the "last good war" - "Saving Private Ryan"
.. Slowly the plot begins to take shape.
Capt.John Miller ( Tom Hanks ) and his troop: a sensitive army medic
 Giovanni Ribisi ), a language specialist that has never been in combat
 Jeremy Davies ), a jew that takes the subject of war very personally ( Adam
Goldberg ), an understanding and loyal sarge ( Tom Sizemore ), a Godfearing
southern sharpshooter ( Barry Pepper ), a Brooklyn loud-mouth ( Edward
Burns ) and an Italian-American ( Van Diesel ) have survived the carnage of
the D-day assault and have been ordered new mission: to find and retrieve
Pvt.James Ryan ( Matt Damon ), whose three brothers have been killed in
action. Ryan is a paratrooper that has been dropped somewhere behind enemy
line, in the german territory. Miller's men openly question why the life of
an unknown soldier should be more valuable then their own. As they move
deeper into hostile territory, difficult decisions must be made. Should they
save a little French girl from a war torn village at the expense of their
mission? Should they execute a German POW for killing their fellow soldier
or should they let him go at the risk that he will rejoin his forces and
continue fighting?
Actually the whole film is one big moral dilemma.
You can say that the plot is pure Hollywood - risking the lives of seven men
to save one. But it is extremely effective as it displays the meaningless of
war itself.
The cast could not be better, consisting of a few well known actors and
fresh, new talents. Spielberg has masterfully recreated the bondage between
the soldiers in the squad. We get a peek into their confused minds and
tortured soals; we get to know them. This makes it extremely hard
(emotionally) to see them die before our eyes for nothing and no one.
The visuals are breathtaking and award worthy. Incredibly original
cinematography by Janusz Kaminski ("Schindler's List") bases itself mostly
on handhold cameras that plases you right in the middle of the carnage of
battle. This creates a much stronger effect than if you film from the air as
in "The Longest Day" and several other films. Tom Sanders' historical art
direction is equally spectacular - ancient churches and historical buildings
ruined by explosions. Sanders has been very careful with details. The
dramatic score by John Williams is not disappointing, however it sometimes
pushes to hard. Williams' work in "Amistad" I enjoyed much better. The sound
is as nothing I've ever heard before - you feel bullets around you, you have
to turn around and check if the person beside you is still alive. The visual
effects are likewise spectacular and absolutely convincing. But in
comparison to last year's Oscar winner "Titanic", the real strength of
"Saving Private Ryan" lies not in its visual beauty and marvelous effects,
but in its deep and emotional plot and wonderful performance of the cast
(especially by Tom Hanks and Giovanni Ribisi).
When the film ended I sat, cold sweltering and deeply moved by what I have
just seen, or better described - experienced. "Saving Private Ryan" is
probably the best and most powerful war film that has ever been made. Its
achievement lies in its openness, its uncovered, graphical display of
insanity and heroism of ordinary people that made the difference and
eventually won the war. It's a monument to those who fought and died and to
those who survived. It's purpose is not only to show us how the war was
like, but also to realize that behind every cross there is a man, a life,
dreams, hopes and family. "Saving Private Ryan" is a tale about humanity and
self-sacrifis among the horrors of war.

Author
Richard Matich
down with a large crowd of both young and old. They
probably did not know the fragments of film history
that I knew, yet we sat there as Americans of diverse
ages and backgrounds. All where expecting history. An
old man sitting in front of me greeted a freind who
just happened to be sitting across the way. He yelled
to him, "They say this shows a thing or two about
patriotism!". He and his freind were in for quite a
shock. The film proves to be the best war films[showing
much combat] ever made. The
cinematography, by Oscar winner Janusz Kaminski, is
done in a newsreel style. Some of the movements are
done in slow motion, without sound, or with just a
"signifagent" sound effect to add dramatic texture. The
films cast, headed up by Tom Hanks, is another element
to talk about. They almost all get signifagent screen
time to stretch their acting muscles. Without this
element, all the action and carnage in the world would
not make a difference. But Spielberg keeps it as
intiment as its possible to get in a brutal war epic.
That is what makes it worth seeing. In King Vidor's The
Big Parade[1925] the action seems to stop as the
soldiers rest for the night toward the middle of what
proves to be a long film. The action lags and lags!
Spielberg probably knows this. His freind Francis
Coppala seemed to have trouble finding an ending to
Apocalypse Now. Brando mumbles it to a close! One of
Spielbergs movie heros was David Lean. The Bridge On
The River Kwai had a great acting pace to it also. It
was a model for this movie you can be
sure. Also you may recall elements of The Longest Day.
It does not hold a candle to Ryan though. Saving
Private Ryan will stand the test of time. It stays with
you like the Robert Capa photographs that inspired the
movie's look. Film, after all, is a visual medium. No
war film since All Quiet On The Western Front[1930] is
as grand a cinematic war experience as this. The old
"patriotic" man was standing up by the door during the
last 45 minutes. Maybe he was in a hurry to leave. Or
just maybe the film got him. It
was not the "star spangled"/"gung-ho" fighting flick he
was expecting to see. John Wayne or Robert Mitchem were
not in this one. Their movies did not show heads
exploding apart. Nor did they show blood soaked
screeming,crying,begging, and praying young American
boys dying. Their severed limbs, sreams of agony, and
constant confusion aparent to all who view this
powerful screen treasure. This is not your father's war
movie! I cringed and looked away during many parts of
the movie. It just gets to you!
Jean-Luc Godard made Weekend in 1967. At the end appear
the words "The End Of Film" followed by "The End Of
Cinema". Godard did not think that he had any more to
say in film after that. It would have been appropriate
for Steven Spielberg close his war movie with "The End
Of The War Film". After this nobody can make one
better. Right? Thats what people seeing All Quiet On
The Western Front, The
Deer Hunter, or The Big Parade might have thought.
There was a young man in the crowded theatre who
clapped loudly in one section of the movie when planes
come to rescue of the battered troops. That young man
was me. I usually don't do that sort of thing in
public. It just got me "patriotic".

Author
David N. Butterworth
        The great American philosopher Ralph Waldo Emerson once said that
"war educates the senses," and that statement has never been truer than
when applied to Steven Spielberg's "Saving Private Ryan."
        Nothing can quite prepare you for the opening thirty minutes of
this remarkable film.  Following a brief, present-day exposition, the film
takes us back to June 6, 1944; American troops are preparing to land on
Omaha Beach.  Taking full advantage of today's digital sound and sound
effects editing techniques, Spielberg doesn't allow for a casual witnessing
of the invasion from afar.  Instead, he plunges you headlong into it,
forcing you to become a sensory participant in the incredible, cataclysmic
męlée.
        The explosions are deafening.  Bullets whistle through the air,
zinging off metal, fizzling through water, thudding into human flesh.
Mortars pound.  Magazines empty.  Machine guns rattle at ferocious speed.
The cacophony of sound is overwhelming.
        "What the hell do we do now, sir?" yells a young Ranger during a
rare lapse in the chaos, plainly confused and confounded.
        Hemmed in, pinned down, under fire and out of options, men drop
like flies.  Arms and legs are blown off every which way.  Huge wounds rip
open.  Blood pours with the exuberance of a vintner uncorking his newest
vintage.
        By the time this amazing, uncompromising sequence is over, the tide
flows red with blood, and thirty-five men under the command of Captain John
Miller (Tom Hanks) are dead.  The camera tracks down the beach riddled with
corpses, body parts, and dead fish, finally resting on the pack of a slain
soldier bearing the stamp "PVT. RYAN."
        No other film so immediately captures the intensity, the brutality,
and the utter senselessness of war.  The opening establishes the mood for
the rest of the film; the audience cannot relax for one minute.  A walk
across a pretty, open cornfield, for example, could result in sniper fire,
a land mine, or a Panzer attack.
        Before he can catch his breath, Capt. Miller is given another, more
critical assignment: round up a handful of men to locate and bring back
Private James Francis Ryan of Iowa.  His three brothers have all recently
been killed in action and the State Department has decreed that their
mother receive some good news along with the bad.
        Hanks gives a wonderfully focused performance at the film's core
and is more than ably assisted by a solid supporting cast that includes Tom
Sizemore, Edward Burns, and Matt Damon as the title character.
        But the picture is Spielberg's all the way.  It is the work of a
master craftsman at the very top of his game; the director manipulates and
pushes the medium of film to its limits.  "Saving Private Ryan" comes
closer than any other film to graphically depicting the harrowing
experience of military combat.  It renews respect and admiration for those
who fought, and those who died, for freedom.

Author
Billy Newsom
This movie gave me a headache!  The photography, I must tell you, is unique. 
The camera is never still during battle scenes.  It made me nauseous watching a
70' screen shake as the cameraman follows soldiers around a battle scene. 
Spielberg purposelessly made the camera vibrate rather than damping it, a la
Shaky Cam.  If Spielberg likes this effect, I don't.  Not for every single shot
in every single battle.
Besides poor camera work, the plot was somewhat thin.  It was a complex plot for
a war movie, but it was still lacking.  I would give the screenwriting a "C"
only because there was some good comic relief.  But the entire movie was so
predictable, that the length (over two hours) made the movie languish.  Toward
the end, all I wanted was for the men to find Ryan, finish their little war
game, and send him home -- so I could go home.
The characters, well, what can I say.  They are stereotypes, what the movie
script writers call "composite" characters.  The guy who freezes up.  The guy
whose every other line is a half-audible prayer.  The intellectual.  The guy
who's the gung-ho no-frills ground-pounder.  The guy everyone looks up to.
I could almost see the script as I watched the film.  It was because the
characters, even though they are well-developed, are still one dimensional. 
They are almost completely static, too.
Outstanding directing, average screenwriting, excellent realism and effects,
average music, and superb sound make this movie one of the best of 1998.  But I
watched this movie the same day as I saw Gone With the Wind, and I'm sorry,
there's just no comparison.  7 out of 10.  Go see Vivien Leigh again.
This movie is going to be awesome on DVD.  I hope that I can get used to the
shaky camera tricks on a 4' screen.  But I'm really looking forward to those
booming artillery shells -- I want to make my neighbors think that a war is
going on in my house!  But to be honest, this movie must be seen and heard in a
movie theater to get the full effect.  Just bring some Dramamine or Tylenol.
People seem to think that the gore in this movie can make up for its weak
storyline.  Sorry, it just can't.  The gore didn't keep me interested like a
plot would have.  A bad trade-off, in my opinion.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie trivia, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Director Steven Spielberg takes us through another destructive time in our
human history. World War II is the setting, and the American Armed Forces
are the group sent in to fight for their country. This most devastating and
realistic portrayal of actual combat earned Spielberg an Oscar for Best
Director.
PLOT:
A troupe of eight soldiers is given a mission to rescue one James Francis
Ryan from the depths of the war. This order is trickled down directly from
the top, after it is learned that the Ryan family has lost their three only
other sons in the same war.
CRITIQUE:
Absolutely genuine, graphic, testament of the actual horrors of war given by
the way of skilled direction, a solid cast of performances, a genuinely
touching conclusion and an unapologetic portrayal of the humanity and
inhumanity suffered by all. Now despite having seen this film after all of
the hoopla was over, I still managed to be extremely impressed by its
gripping tale, authenticity and ultimate raw power. The first and last
scenes were the ones that had me clenched heartily to my seat, feeling the
intensity, the bravery and the insanity within all of the panic. While other
sequences had me literally crying for their pain, their loss and their lives
given away to free and save others. Unlike THE THIN RED LINE (6/10), this
movie actually had a plot and drawn-out characters to whom we could relate
and invest our attention.
Its biggest compliment relates to its extensive three hour run-time, which
didn't seem to phase me one bit. This film had me by the balls from the
get-go and kept pounding me with an interesting array of characters, solid
guidance and a cast that was primed for the occasion. Standouts included
Giovanni Ribisi and Tom Sizemore in my eyes, but all were extremely integral
to the whole of the story. I commend Spielberg for bringing out the best in
his players, and bringing to screen a variant version of "just another War
movie". I did find that the fast-action camera technique was a tad overused,
but who am I to argue with a genius of American cinema. All in all, an
engaging film about a bleak subject told via a simple story, great
characters, realistic and gruesome combat scenes, and a vision of a man
graced with the talent to direct it all into a coherent and emotional page
of human and cinematic history.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars: (Some facts courtesy of
the IMDb)
There is only one woman who has a speaking part in this film (Need
confirmation on this.)
Don't blink, or you may miss actor Ted Danson and Dennis Farina's very small
roles in this movie.
All the principal actors in this movie underwent several weeks of grueling
army training, except for Matt Damon, who was spared so that the other
actors would resent him, and would convey that resentment in their
performances.
Director Steven Spielberg considered casting Matt Damon only after viewing
his performance in 1996's COURAGE UNDER FIRE, but thought that he was too
skinny (Ironically, Damon had specifically lost 40 pounds for his role in
the film and become quite ill after the filming because of his newfound
weight). But after fellow actor Robin Williams introduced Damon to Spielberg
on the set of GOOD WILL HUNTING (8/10), Spielberg changed his mind, and cast
the hot, young star in the role of Private Ryan.
This movie is actually based upon the true story of the Niland brothers. One
was killed on D-Day while in the 82nd Airborne, one was killed on Utah Beach
with the 4th Infantry Division, and a third was killed that same week in
Burma. Mrs. Niland received all three death notification telegrams on the
same day. The fourth son was serving with the 101st Airborne and was pulled
out of the front lines.
The Edith Piaf song that the soldiers question the meaning of before the
final battle is the same song that the commandos of 1967's THE DIRTY DOZEN
question in their tents.
There was some uncredited rewriting done on Robert Rodat's original script,
by the director of THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (8.5/10), Frank Darabont.
Rodat's previous screenplay was for the Jeff Daniels/Anna Paquin goose
story, FLY AWAY HOME.
Real amputees were used for the shots of people with limbs missing.
The last film that the three producers (Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon and Gary
Levinsohn) from this film produced together was HARD RAIN (7/10).


Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Steven Spielberg
Cast:  Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies, Vin Diesel,
Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi, Matt Damon
Screenplay:  Robert Rodat
Producers:  Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn
Runtime:  169 min.
US Distribution:  DreamWorks/Paramount
Rated R:  extreme and graphic gore and violence, profanity
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Saving Private Ryan is perhaps the first film I've ever seen that
called me back for a second viewing before I even decided the way I felt
about it.  I knew it had invaded me the first time, for I had
ultra-violent nightmares the night after I saw it.  I couldn't stop
thinking about the film for three days; the graphic viscera of every
scene imprinted images on my mind, images that aren't likely to ever
leave me.  I doubt there are many films in existence that are as
visually powerful as Saving Private Ryan, and I know there's not one
that's more horrifyingly violent.
As everyone knows, this is Steven Spielberg's latest war film, though
his first attempt at actually capturing the horror of warfare.  I've
never been in war -- and it's not likely that I ever will be -- but I
think experiencing Saving Private Ryan is the closest I'll ever come. 
After watching this film, I felt like I had survived a war.  I was
tired, exhilarated, battered, and disturbed.  It's not a pleasant
experience, but it's a profoundly powerful one, and I recommend that
everyone see it.  It puts the realism back into violence.
After a short prologue, Spielberg jumps right into battle, with a truly
amazing recreation of the invasion of Omaha Beach on June 6th, 1944.  We
meet our characters, Captain Miller (Tom Hanks), his Sergeant (Tom
Sizemore), and their men, Privates Reiben (Edward Burns), Mellish (Adam
Goldberg), Jackson (Barry Pepper), and Wade (Giovanni Ribisi).  They
forge the beach and, after about a half hour of watching their comrades
undergo intense attack from the Germans, they manage to take the beach. 
It's at this point that Miller gets a new assignment:  he and his men
are to go inland and search for Private James Ryan; Ryan's brothers have
all been killed in combat, and the powers-that-be want to get the
remaining man back to his mother in Iowa.  The film progresses from
there, with Miller and his men engaging in various battles and risking
their lives to find a man who may not even be alive.
Saving Private Ryan is the most violent film I've ever seen.  Paul
Verhoeven has a knack for gory violence, but his films are cartoons by
comparison.  And horror films that bank on gore are nothing compared to
this, because here it all feels real.  Spielberg is entirely responsible
for the look and feel of this film, and it proves that he can paint a
portrait of pure terror without holding back.  In general, the style is
sharp, and every scene appears to be in deep focus (one can see every
dust particle that goes flying into the air with each explosion).  I
read that Spielberg drained 40% of the color from the film, and what
results are images that look stark and harrowing, particularly in the
ravaged town where the final battle takes place.  In addition, the sound
effects editing and special effects are so good that viewers simply
forget that they are watching a film.  
The violence is not exploitative, and that's why it feels so real.  We
get glimpses of a man lying on a beach, holding his entrails, calling
for his mother.  We see men explode into bloody fragments of human
waste.  We see soldiers get blown to pieces by machinegun fire, while
their mangled limbs disperse about the ground.  Nothing I can write here
will prepare you for the images in Saving Private Ryan, and nothing I
say can describe it in a way that feels as realistic as Spielberg has
made it.  I've never experienced a film that feels as real as this one.
The film is long, and Spielberg manages to form his characters
effectively.  Hanks gives a touching, subtle performance as the Captain,
whose identity is concealed from his men.  He is convincing in this
role, even though he doesn't initially seem like a military type
(although I imagine that this is the point, seeing as how most people
drafted into war aren't the military type).  Sizemore is excellent,
giving a powerful performance as the loyal Sergeant.  Jeremy Davies is
terrific as an interpreter who gets forced into battle, and his subplot
is fascinating.  Other supporting performances by Burns, Goldberg,
Pepper, Ribisi, and Matt Damon (as Private Ryan) are all surprisingly
memorable.
Many people accept Spielberg's name as solid gold, as if his attachment
with any motion picture assures its quality.  I think he's talented,
but, like all directorsb he has his ups (Schindler's List, Empire of the
Sun) and his downs (Always, Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom). 
There are elements common in all of his films that I don't like, and he
frequently uses sentimentality at the worst times.  Saving Private Ryan
has some serious problems in this arena; the first and last scenes, for
instance, are truly unbearable, and should have been cut from the film
entirely.  On the whole, however, the sensitive material here is handled
with surprising honesty, and a few of the scenes are powerful because
Spielberg is almost cold in his observations of them.  
There are other flaws, aside from the occasional sentimentality.  Even
though the film looks disturbingly real, the story still has that
contrived Hollywood feel.  The general idea is a good one, and the
framework is effective, but a lot of this relies on chance and luck, and
I don't like it when stories need to fall back on luck.  There are also
some character developments late in the film that had me puzzled.  Most
frustrating, however, is that, for all the realism in the war scenes,
the main characters who die are all given quiet, cinematic death
scenes.  That's not to say that they aren't engrossing or moving scenes,
because they are, but it's moments like these that remind me that I'm
watching something that isn't real.  It would have been far more
effective to kill characters for whom we feel something in the same
graphic manner that floods the rest the film.
In addition, I'm not sure how Spielberg wants us to feel in the end. 
It seems that he wanted to make a film that was simply about war, but
Saving Private Ryan spends more time on the characters and story than it
does on the horrors of war.  The first and last shots are of an American
flag, but I'm not sure why.  The film feels oddly indifferent to the
purpose of World War II -- in some scenes, the Germans are almost
sympathetic, and sometimes Spielberg demonizes the American soldiers.  I
actually like this element, but it makes me confused about the moral
center of the film.  And even though it's so violent, I'm not sure that
it's particularly anti-war.  I like that the film stimulated my thought
in this manner, but I would have preferred a little more guidance.
It's not often that I bother with negative criticism when I recommend a
film so highly.  Saving Private Ryan, as a whole, is not even close to
perfection -- there are flaws in its execution that are too large to
ignore.  But as a war film, as a violent, forceful, and aggressive
vision of some of the most violent moments in human history, it is as
close to perfect as it could have been.  So many of the images in this
picture are stamped on my brain, and have forced their way into my
subconscious in a manner no film ever has.  And for all the violence,
for every mind-numbing shot of a human being undergoing intense physical
torture, this is still a film that I will want to watch in the future. 
Spielberg may be overrated, but it takes a unique talent to make me want
to repeatedly endure a film this unpleasant.

Author
Wallace Baine
Every combat veteran knows something the rest of us will never -- can never
-- really understand ... what it was like. The vet will likely try to
explain, but no matter how vivid the stories, words eventually fail. 
This is the territory Steven Spielberg attempts to traverse in the
straight-no-chaser near-masterpiece called `Saving Private Ryan' ... what
it was like, not only the chaos and the carnage, but how combat exists on
an entirely different plane of experience where morality, purpose,
rationality and decency all take on a different shape.
The first half-hour of `Saving Private Ryan' is a bone-jarring experience,
so horrifying it sometimes feels like the movie screen won't contain it. It
is a rendering of the legendary invasion of Normandy, what we've grown up
calling `D-Day,' June 6, 1944, the most decisive campaign of World War II.
>From the first minute that the first personnel carrier empties on the
beaches of France, we are witness to a massacre of staggering proportion as
the lapping ocean literally turns red with blood.
The camera is at grunt's eye level, sometimes shaking with the frenzy of
fear, always recording the gut-shaking details, the sound of empty casings
falling to the ground or of a bullet ripping through the surf at GIs lost
in the chaos, hiding underwater. There's also waves of the kind of butchery
that war films have always had problems with showing convincingly: limbs
blown away, entrails spilling into the sand, fierce soldiers transformed in
an instant to so much hamburger.
In one of the most haunting scenes, our hero Capt. John Miller (Tom Hanks)
watches in dazed horror as a GI carries off his right arm with his left,
his right shoulder a fraying bloody stump.
The tone thus set, we settle in with Miller and his eight-man squad as they
take on an unusual mission in the days after Normandy. They are to descend
into the French countryside, behind German lines, to retrieve one Private
James Ryan (Matt Damon of `Good Will Hunting'). The reason? Ryan is the
last surviving of four brothers fighting in the war and the Army has
decided that the Ryan family will not lose all their sons.
Of course, as one of Miller's men points out, they have mothers too and
thus begins an ongoing dialogue on the screwy ethical choices that war
brings forth. Is it worth it to risk the lives of eight men to save one
Iowa family?
Besides Damon, `Saving Private Ryan' features a number of youngish rising
stars who developed their chops on the indy-film circuit. Edward Burns, the
wisecracking writer/director of `The Brothers McMullen' plays Reiben, a
testy grunt who questions the wisdom of the mission. Giovanni Ribisi, who
`Friends' fans might recognize as Phoebe's doltish brother, plays the
squad's medic. Scrawny Jeremy Davies, the star of `Spanking the Monkey,' is
Upham, a well-read but skitterish interpreter who becomes the film's
conduit to explore questions of cowardice and courage.
Holding it all together is Tom Hanks, turning in another remarkable
performance as the enigmatic commanding officer disturbed only by a
shaking-hand condition that's getting worse as he gets deeper into enemy
territory. Hanks is emblematic of a kind of moral complexity you don't
often see from the director of `Jurassic Park.' Miller clearly thirsts for
victory over the Germans, but unlike the guts-and-glory war heroes of
Hollywood's golden age, his motives are murky. He just wants the ordeal to
be done with so he can get back to his wife. He's more Eisenhower than
Patton.
What's striking about `Saving Private Ryan' is the flinty, unsentimental
tone Spielberg establishes. There is a minimum of grandiose dying scenes
and deathbed speechifying. The death is cheap, sudden, merciless,
matter-of-fact. One scene of a dying soldier is characterized by a panicked
race to keep him from bleeding to death followed briefly by a helpless
yelping for his mother. No dewy, choked sentiments, just terror receding
into the abyss. This portrayal of the murderous violence of war gives the
film its integrity.
The exception to this hard-hearted realism is the film's frame, a
contemporary scene of an aging man in golf attire standing solemnly at a
military cemetery (Miller? Private Ryan?), a handsome family standing
respectfully behind him, a family we are reminded that one stray
battlefield bullet or grenade could have prevented from coming into
existence.
It's here where `Saving Private Ryan' addresses its most compelling theme:
the meaning of sacrifice and gratitude. The empty pandering of politicians
over the years has made such notions clichés, particularly falling on the
ears of the soft, jaded generation that by accident of history has been
excused from military service, to say nothing of combat. This picture
attempts to bring about a fuller understanding of sacrifice on the
battlefield and in that respect it is a moving and dignified salute to the
fallen.

Author
James Sanford
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (Dreamworks/Paramount)
Directed by Steven Spielberg
"Saving Private Ryan" opens and closes with the image of a faded,
almost transparent American flag waving in the breeze. It's a vaguely
unnerving sight in a movie that has offers plenty of others even more
disturbing. Director Steven Spielberg's terrifying evocations of Holocaust
atrocities in "Schindler's List" and life in a Japanese prison camp in
"Empire of the Sun" were just a warm-up for the vivid, no-holds-barred
scenes of war in "Ryan."
>From the opening half-hour -- following the preparations for the
D-Day landing of American troops on Omaha Beach -- you can tell this is not
going to be your standard rah-rah-America war picture. These soldiers are
nervous, even nauseous, as they prepare to storm into France. And with good
cause, as it turns out: Almost as soon as the ship's ramp drops into the
water, bullets and carnage begin flying. Never before has a filmmaker so
graphically depicted death on the battlefield, but Spielberg isn't aiming
merely for shock value. He's making a blood-chilling statement about the
human cost of combat, which is brilliantly delivered with the help of
effective hand-held camerawork and outstanding editing by Michael Kahn.
It's to the credit of screenwriter Robert Rodat that this harrowing
beginning proves to be just the set-up of a largely riveting tale with
echoes of "Apocalypse Now." Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is assigned to
track down Private James Ryan, who parachuted into France and went
off-course. It's imperative Ryan be located and brought back home. His three
brothers have all been killed in action, and orders have come down from the
top that Ryan's tour of duty be curtailed. The search for Ryan exposes
Miller and his men to numerous perils and more than a few agonizing moral
questions along the way.
Hanks is perfectly cast as the sincere Miller, whose take-charge
attitude barely conceals his lack of confidence. In one beautiful scene,
Miller's men all notice their commander's hand trembling as he talks about
the next step in their mission, but no one says a word: They all seem to
silently share their hidden terror. Tom Sizemore and Jeremy Davies also cut
memorable figures as soldiers with their own agendas. Only Edward Burns
rings false, partially because the actor seems capable of only one facial
expression, a kind of cynical pout that looks woefully out-of-place.
The other major stumbling block in "Ryan" is the title character
himself, played by Matt Damon, and it's not Damon's fault that Rodat's
script gives Ryan next to no personality and saddles him with a hideous
monologue besides. Still, "Ryan" has been made with so much care, right down
to the lusterless colors that recall tinted photos of WWII battles, that
overlooking its flaws is not difficult.
James Sanford

Author
Matt Williams
Spielberg has done it again.  He revisits his familiar stomping grounds
of World War II to deliver his latest masterpiece.  This time, he
tackles the war itself, delivering a vivid portrait of modern warfare
from the common soldier's point of view.
Set during the invasion of Normandy, and in the days which follow,
Saving Private Ryan tracks the mission of the 2nd Ranger Battalion of
the 29th Infantry Division. Led by Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks),
seven of his surviving men are given an unusual mission:  to locate a
soldier, missing behind enemy lines, and send him home.
Within days, three brothers of the Ryan family were all killed in
combat, and a fourth, Private James Ryan, has gone missing somewhere
around Normandy.  To ease the suffering of the boys' mother (and to
avoid a public relations fiasco), the top brass want Private Ryan found
and sent home.
In the squad sent to find him, there is trusty Sergeant Horvath (Tom
Sizemore), who lends a needed ear to the captain, and keeps the men in
line.  Pvt. Reiben (Edward Burns) is the chief griper of the group.
Pvt. Caparzo (Vin Diesel) also has doubts. Sharpshooter Pvt. Jackson
(Barry Pepper) places his faith in God and his gun.  Pvt. Mellish (Adam
Goldberg) is a Jewish soldier who has a personal stake in the war.  Wade
(Giovanni Ribisi) is a medic, frustrated by the hopelessness of his task
during wartime.  Rounding out the group is Cpl. Upham (Jeremy Davies), a
meek mapmaker who's never seen combat, but speaks fluent French and
German.
A lot has been said of the violence in the film.  While not the goriest
film around, people expecting a traditional Steven Spielberg or Tom
Hanks film should prepare themselves for the extremely graphic scenes.
Unlike most movie violence, the violence here comes coupled with
considerable emotional impact. This is the most intense modern war movie
ever made...every casualty onscreen truly feels like an actual life, and
the impact is staggering.
The extended battle sequences are some of the most powerful moments ever
put on film. From the very start, you can barely breathe as the action
unfolds on the screen. Using discomforting handheld shots, various film
speeds, and ample use of surround sound, the result is terrifyingly
realistic.
The story of Saving Private Ryan has been very well structured. It
begins by delivering grief at a personal level:  that of Mrs. Ryan,
confronted with the loss of three of her sons (and the possible loss of
her fourth).  However, from that initial shock, the audience is able to
grasp the emotional impact of any and every soldier losing his life.
The results are staggering.
The film raises no judgments about the war itself.  These aren't men
disillusioned in the cause, but they are frustrated in that they are
placed in jeopardy for what seems like a purely public-relations stunt.
All they really want it to help quickly end the war and get home.  Why
should Pvt. Ryan be the lucky one...all of these men have mothers and
loved ones who would grieve for them?
Tom Hanks delivers a strong performance, which, while not his best, is
certainly among them.  He has to rationalize the potential and actual
loss of every man under his command, and to keep himself from cracking
under the considerable pressure. Hanks' everyman persona helps to draw
in the audience with a sense of familiarity amid the chaos.
There are a few cameos placed here and there (Matt Damon pops up as a
soldier encountered by the squad), but most of the actors in the film
are portrayed by relative unknowns.  This actually works out well,
adding an element of uncertainty (particularly in the early scenes, when
you're truly unsure of who is going to survive that first reel).
However, the entire squad gives memorable performances, and it is
difficult to single one or two actors out above the others. Tom Sizemore
is debatedly the best of the bunch, but it is a close call.
It would be difficult to say that this is Spielberg's best film
(considering his remarkable filmography).  But it is certainly among his
best...and one of the best films of this decade.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
Each person sees a movie a bit differently.  It comes from bringing our
own backgrounds and experiences to the movie house, perhaps shaded a
little by how good dinner was, or whether the subway was crowded.  I went
to "Saving Private Ryan" with a sort of international politics background
(well, school, not flying between Tel Aviv and Damascus negotiating
Mideast peace; note that this is not a practical subject unless you're
in certain places) and a diet of recent Stephen Ambrose books about the
war in Europe.  This is a Big Picture background: the goals of Allied
Grand Strategy, the scope of American wartime production, and so on.
Ambrose described D-Day as the essential act of American foreign policy.
That's a bit of the flavor of this thinking: the war in the context of
international relations theory, the war as the Last Crusade.
"Saving Private Ryan" takes the point of view of the foot soldier.
The war from there is gory and loud, a confusion of random, sudden death.
Reports about the first half hour of the film are true: Spielberg doesn't
hide behind the Hollywood illusion that bullets and explosions merely
cause a painless spurt of cosmetic blood.  They disfigure.  This is in
contrast to the cool technical mastery of, say, Tom Clancy's "Patriot
Games" -- war as bloodless video game, conducted from air conditioned
control rooms -- or the calm efficiency of movie SWAT and Special
Forces teams.   An early gasp from the audience came when disembarking
GIs ducked underwater, only to be killed by German machine guns: only
for James Bond do bullets stop at the water's surface.
One interesting thing is that there is no long, establishing shot of
the beach assault.  In films of this scale, there's some effort made do
dramatize the size of the events.  "The Longest Day" had any number of
shots of hundreds of infantrymen storming across the beaches and
glimpses of the invasion fleet stretching from horizon to horizon.
Ambrose's books mention the never-to-be-repeated view of hundreds of
landing craft heading to shore, as seen from passing aircraft.  "A
Bridge Too Far" showed the air armada flying overhead, and the
wide-ranging battle across all of Holland.  Concerning a different era,
"Gone With the Wind" had the famous shot of the Confederate wounded in
Atlanta.  Big, important things are afoot.
"Ryan", on the other hand, shows only one or two landing craft at
once.  It's only well after the landings have been complete do we catch
a quick panorama of the men and equipment being unloaded on the
beaches.  Prior to this, but after the objectives were taken and the
battle won, there was a shot of the dead and wounded on the beach, but
the focus is, again, on the individuals who make up this horrific
composition.  Later, Tom Hanks mentions, vaguely and hand-wavingly, in
one of those off-the-cuff conversations, the sequence of events that
have to happen before the war ends: first Caen has to be taken, then
such-and-such, then Paris, then Berlin.  Then they go home.  From the
infantry's point of view, all this takes place on a different planet.
They're concerned with the here and now, with accomplishing their
immediate mission.  And, as the title and the tag lines suggest, the
mission is about just one man.
Well, that's the framework for this movie: after the beach assault, Tom
Hanks must lead a squad of men through Normandy, to find Pvt. Ryan,
whose three brothers had just been killed in the war, and whose mother
had received three telegrams from the War Department in one afternoon.
He gets to go home, to spare the family the loss of all its sons.
Ryan, though, is someplace in the battlefield, far from where he's
supposed to be because of the confusion of the parachute drop.  While
searching for Ryan, Hanks's men find themselves in a variety of
situations, some of which are meant to put on film previously glossed
over moral ambiguities in this most moral of wars.
The German soldiers in the film are just sort of there.  Only two have
speaking roles, one of whose consists of two or three lines of
taunting.  The ambiguities do not come directly from them -- they're
props as much as anything -- but from the conduct of the Americans in
relation to them.  Further, the Americans take on a number of roles
through the film.  In the beginning, GIs are assaulting heavily
defended positions.  At the end of the film, the Germans are on the
offense, and the Americans are holed up as the German beach defenders
were, with their enemy walking into pre-planned killing zones.  In the
first half, a German sniper fires on the GIs from a bell tower.  The
roles become reversed by the end.  Generally, we don't see a German
point of view.  The emphasis is clearly on how the Americans act.
And the actions of Americans range from cruel to something more noble,
from cowardice to courage, from unthinking to compassionate.  The high
points are what we've come to expect and believe about GIs as crusaders
in the Second World War, the low points flirting with what we may
consider reprehensible conduct by our soldiers.  And I suppose
Spielberg should be commended for pointing out that in an enterprise as
large and as complicated as war, we won't always hit the highs, and the
lows are sometimes comprehensible.
It should be noted that there have already been morally questioning war
films.  For Americans, Vietnam is the standard setting: clearly there
were atrocities committed by US soldiers there, in awful contrast to
shining American ideals.  World War 2, though, has been relatively
sacrosanct.  In a real sense, this was the Last Crusade, when we were
clear on who the bad guys were, when we could have at them on the
battlefield and when we could come out winners.  Nazis became great for
cinematic evil:  spiffy uniforms and historic menace in one
goosestepping package.  This sort of moral clarity is certainly dead by
the end of the Vietnam war; with few exceptions, the only clear cut
good vs. evil war movies involved giant space bugs and Doogie Howser,
or environmentally incorrect alien invaders and Apple Computer saving
the world.
Is it possible to make a morally unambiguous war film today?  There's
been perhaps one Gulf War movie, which was as much about Denzel
Washington's inner guilt over a friendly fire incident as anything
else.  The dilemmas in "Courage Under Fire" are caused by accidents
rather than deliberate conduct.  But then, what would be the point of
such an unambiguous film?  The world is different now, or perhaps we've
realized there are gray areas, and valid reasons for and against.
Does Spielberg succeed in showing that war is a tangible hell, that
Americans weren't always in the moral clear?  I'd argue, yes, from the
effect on the audience alone.  At the end, in what would normally be a
woo-hoo moment as the last Tiger tank is killed, there was hardly a
peep from the sold-out audience.  The rah-rah had been exhausted.
There are of course faults with the film.  From a pure wince
perspective, the final few minutes contains an awful, awful speech,
where the war veteran makes a terrible, predictable, cloying speech.
He asks his wife if he's led a good life, if he earned the long-ago
sacrifices and the right to go home.  I suppose he represents America
after the war, asking if America has "earned" the Second World War
sacrifices through its post-war conduct.  It was a truly bad scene,
where all the stereotypes about the Spielberg sentimentality come on
display.  While thematically it's not out of place, it just feels
poorly done.  But, while clumsy, this is more than anything else
fumbling towards the conclusion that, perhaps, yes, America has earned
it, and the sacrifices were more severe than had previously been shown
on the screen.

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies, Vin
Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi, Matt Damon,
Dennis Farina, Ted Danson, Paul Giamatti
When I was a little kid (before I even started school), I used to
think that war had spectators like a sporting event would.  I thought
that there were bleachers or something similar where people from
opposing countries would sit and watch (look, I was just five years
old, ok?)  Well, Saving Private Ryan makes you feel like you are a
spectator in World War II, sitting just far enough away as to not get
killed.  It's the first war film I've ever seen that seemingly
presents war as it probably was, instead of how Hollywood thinks it
was.
The film starts with the invasion of Normandy during World War II.
And right away you'll know that you're not about to see just another
war film.  We see one of the invasion boats open up it's doors and
within a second at least ten soldiers are brutally killed.  It's such
a powerful jolt, and I've never seen anything like it.  Compare it to
a scene from another great WWII movie The Longest Day where during the
invasion of Normandy, Sean Connery jumps out of his invasion boat,
falls into the water, and it's treated like a wacky little moment.
Nothing against The Longest Day, but I think that Saving Private Ryan
is probably a little closer to reality.
After an incredibly brutal 20-30 minutes, we come to the plot of the
film.  Three brothers have been killed and their mother is about to
receive all three telegrams announcing their deaths.  It's learned
that there's a fourth brother, Private James Ryan, who is somewhere
behind enemy lines.  A squad of soldiers (led by Tom Hanks in another
outstanding dramatic performance) is ordered to go and find him, so
that he can be sent home.
The plot however, just isn't too crucial to the film.  Saving Private
Ryan isn't about finding a man and sending him home, it's about war,
about what soldiers go through, and the overall devastation that war
causes.  The violence in the film is shockingly brutal.  It may seem
gratuitous, but then again, so is war.
I didn't really care for the film's wrap-around scenes, the scenes
which open and close the film.  In them, an elderly Ryan visits the
graves of the fallen soldiers from the film.  While the scene's
intentions are good, they just don't mesh with the rest of the film.
To me they came off like cheesy TV-movie type theatrics.  That's
pretty much my only gripe though, and it can be easily overlooked
thanks to the excellence of the rest of the film.
So it all comes down to this: is Saving Private Ryan a good movie?
Yes, it most certainly is.  But it's more of a great film, or rather
an example of great filmmaking, than a great story.  It's certainly
not something I'd call entertaining, not something that I'd want to
watch over and over again.  It's powerful, moving, and clearly the
front-runner for an Academy Award in so many categories.  It's easily
the best film Spielberg has ever made, maybe not the best story he's
ever told, but the greatest film he's ever put together.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Author
Kevin Patterson
It has been my impression that most war movies fall into one of two
categories: overtly anti-war pictures, be they the grim seriousness of FULL
METAL JACKET or the pointed satire of GOOD MORNING VIETNAM, or
action/adventure stories with a bit of flag-waving, melodramatic fluff.
Steven Spielberg's SAVING PRIVATE RYAN wisely positions itself somewhere in
between: it neither protests World War II nor glorifies it. Instead,
Spielberg portrays the war as an ugly necessity, asking the audience to
recognize the tremendous human cost of fighting Nazism, paid both by those
who were killed in battle and by those who survived it.
The opening sequence, which depicts the D-Day invasion at Omaha Beach with
unflinching realism, has been called the best battle scene ever filmed by
some critics. I haven't seen enough war films to make that call, but in any
case this extensive set piece touches upon an important observation: that
survival in war is often more a product of dumb luck than of fighting
skill. Hundreds of Americans pour onto the beach, hundreds of Germans are
there waiting for them, and they shoot at each other until one side comes
out ahead. The death scenes are often gruesome, as well they should be. As
Spielberg has said in interviews, being killed in war is not necessarily
quick and painless, and certainly does not occur in slow-motion with a
swell of strings in the background.
Among the survivors are a company led by Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks),
whose squadron is then assigned to locate a Private James Ryan (Matt
Damon), who lost two brothers at D-Day and another in Africa, and bring him
back home. Many war films might have played this out as a simple
action/adventure yarn, but SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is smart enough to
acknowledge that this is a questionable undertaking. Is this a public
relations stunt designed to make the military look good, or is it a mission
of compassion to Ryan's family? And even if the commanders' hearts are in
the right place, can they justify asking eight men to risk their lives for
one?
The aspect of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN that everyone will remember, I think, is
its disturbing examination of the savage chaos of battle and how supposedly
good people can get caught up in the frenzy of violence and anger at seeing
their friends die. Spielberg does not romanticize the American "freedom
fighters," as several of them shoot German soldiers who have already
surrendered, seemingly for the sake of revenge. The one character who seems
to stay in touch with his conscience all the way through is Miller, who
exudes the air of a tough, no-nonsense commanding officer, not because it's
his nature but because he knows that's what his men need. He even refuses
to discuss his job and family life from back home, then finally reveals
himself at the moment when the rest of the squadron most needs to hear it.
The most accessible window into all of this may be the character of
Corporal Upham (Jeremy Davies), a young officer who's never been in battle
before and is selected for the mission because he can translate German and
French. He finds himself scared senseless when the rest of the squadron
engages in battle with the Germans, unable to act partly out of fear of his
own death and, it seems, partly because he doesn't want to take a human
life. Spielberg plays his scenes in a way that makes his reaction
understandable, rather than making him into a simple coward and an object
for the audience's scorn, yet by the end even he turns out not to be immune
to the oppressive atmosphere of violence and rage.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is not at all "entertaining" in the usual sense of the
word: it is difficult to watch and will leave most viewers feeling
exhausted and wrung out when it ends. Which, considering its subject
matter, means that it has done its job very well: as I said, this is not a
film about patriotism or glory but about the ordeal endured by World War II
soldiers. I cannot, however, imagine anyone regretting having seen it: it
is a story that deserved to be told and is sure to be remembered as a
classic piece of filmmaking.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.

Author
Anna G. McDougald
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (DreamWorks - 1998)
Starring Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies,
  Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi,
  Matt Damon
Screenplay by Robert Rodat
The "meatgrinder" of Omaha Beach has rarely been as vividly portrayed
as it is in Steven Spielberg's SAVING PRIVATE RYAN. Horrific war
imagery is not a new cinematic device: it's at least as old as the
floating severed arm (and oblivious owner) in Cornel Wilde's 1967
classic, BEACH RED. What IS new is Spielberg's portrayal of
shell-shocked GI's weeping hysterically, or gleefully blasting
surrendering Germans: as I watched the scenes of carnage unfold, it
seemed to me that we were at last going to gain some new insights into
the physical and moral convulsion known as war.
Spielberg is merciless in his portrayal of what happens to the bodies
(and minds) of men under continuous, withering fire. But once "Captain
Miller" (and the story) move off Omaha Beach, things change...almost
as if Spielberg has had a "change of heart", not toward war, but
toward those who participate in it and prolong it.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN has been touted as "anti-war" simply because it
DOES confront us with those ghastly images. But a TRUE "anti-war" film
should feature characters that are morally doubles for those images;
but Captain Miller (Tom Hanks) and his little Squad would not be out
of place in a John Wayne epic.
Perhaps Spielberg is exploring his own ambivalent feelings about
war. As a citizen of the "enlightened nineties" he cannot help but be
disgusted with the waste and the suffering it epitomizes. But he is
also aware that without men like Captain Miller rushing deliberately
into harm's way at Omaha Beach, "Schindler" and the constuitents of
that famous "List" might well have been reduced to ashfall in a Polish
meadow.
Are the American GI's (and their British and Canadian Counterparts) to
be seen as ordinary, decent men--or just simple-minded, suicidal
pawns? Spielberg, for all his revulsion towards war, simply cannot
bring himself to condemn those who don military uniforms. It almost
seems as if he is trying to atone for the way his generation presented
returning Viet Nam vets with bags of dog excrement: certainly the
quest for the elusive "Ryan", with its objective of "saving" instead
of "slaying", seems almost too perfect a reversal of the premise of
Francis Ford Coppola's APOCALYPSE NOW.
Again and again, Spielberg brings us to the brink of
revelation....only to draw back at the last second. He cannot, like
Richard Attenborough in A BRIDGE TO FAR, bring himself to show us the
"Ryan Rescue Mission" as a pointless, bloody debacle. Nor can he, like
Michael Caton-Jones' 1990 version of MEMPHIS BELLE, make Miller and
his brave band mere fodder for the cold-blooded machinations of a
Public Relations Department. Had he done so, we might have had some
subjects for serious debate here, and not simply "discussion points",
and might have found some answers.....
How does a man who dispatched 94 men to their deaths, avoid becoming
himself a dehumanized killing machine? How does the Company Sniper (a
nod to Howard Hawks' SERGEANT YORK?) reconcile Scripture passages with
his murderous specialty? SAVING PRIVATE RYAN gives us no
"answers"...only more questions.
In William Wellman's 1949 classic, BATTLEGROUND, a Chaplain begins his
Christmas Sermon to the battered Bastogne defenders with the words,
"Was this Trip necessary?" One might almost ask, of SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN, "Was this Movie necessary?" The answer in both cases is an
unequivocal "YES!" Yes,--because for all its reluctance to "take
chances", SAVING PRIVATE RYAN comes about 20 years after
Attenborough's epic--and may enocourage a generation to think about
the sacrifices that made its very existence possible, and hopefully to
look at the work of other, earlier directors who risked their souls
(and careers) to explore this brutal and bloody phenomenon that seems
so unthinkable--and yet at times, so very tragically "necessary".

Author
Louis Proyect

The only thing surprising about "Saving Private Ryan" is how conventional
it is. I fully expected a much more "noir" vision of WWII along the lines
of Oliver Stone's "Platoon." What I saw was an updated version of such
1950s classics as "Walk in the Sun," written by Robert Rossen, the CP'er
who named names.
"Walk in the Sun," also known as "Salerno Beachhead," just about defines
this genre. A group of GI's are out on a patrol and they get killed off one
by one. The enemy is faceless and evil. Our soldiers, by the same token,
are good boys who are just trying to get home. The reason that CP'ers were
so adept at turning out this sort of patriotic pap is that they had bought
into the myth of FDR's "fight for freedom." So patriotic were the CP'ers
that they also backed the decision to intern Japanese-Americans.
The buzz about Spielberg's movie is clearly related to his decision to make
battle wounds much more graphic than ever before. This decision roughly
parallels the breakthrough made by Bertolucci in "Last Tango in Paris" to
depict sexuality openly and honestly. The question of what is more
jarring--Brando in full-frontal nudity or a soldier's intestines spilling
out of his midsection--I will leave to others.
A war movie ultimately relies on the same dramatic tensions as slasher or
science-fiction movies. The audience is at the edge of its seat waiting for
the next sniper's bullet to tear through the flesh of one of the "good
guys." The suspense is similar to that which awaits us for the next moment
when "Halloween's" Michael Myers will come barreling out of a closet with a
kitchen knife in hand. Who will get slashed in the throat next? The most
interesting variation on this theme is the film "Aliens" which blends
monsters from outer space and "Walk in the Sun" war movie conventions. The
acid-spitting  monsters of this film are stand-ins for Nazis or Japs. All
the soldiers want to do is complete "their job" successfully and return
home, in this case planet Earth.
Since the aesthetic dimensions of "Saving Private Ryan" are so
underwhelming, the more interesting question becomes one of Steven
Spielberg's motivation in turning out such a retro movie. What would compel
a director working in 1998 to recycle themes from the immediate post-WWII
period?
It is not really too hard to figure out. When Spielberg is not turning out
escapist fantasies like the lovely "ET" or "Close Encounters of the Third
Kind," he is functioning as a latter-day Frank Capra spinning out morality
tales to mold public opinion.
Movies like "Amistad," "Schindler's List" and "Saving Private Ryan" all
basically put forward the same message, namely that the wealthy and the
powerful are the ultimate guardians of what's decent and humane. In
"Amistad," this role is assigned to John Quincy Adams who stands up for the
slaves. In "Schindler's List," it is the industrialist who delivers the Jews.
General George Marshall, while a secondary character in "Saving Private
Ryan," puts the dramatic narrative into motion through his decent and
humane decision to remove Private James Ryan from the battlefield after his
three brothers have been killed in action. Marshall tells his fellow
officers that he didn't want to be in the same situation that faced Lincoln
when he informed a mother that all of her sons had been killed in Civil War
fighting.
Once this decision is reached, Captain Miller (Tom Hanks) and a group of
soldiers are sent on their way to track down Private Ryan and send him back
home. Their trek through hostile territory is familiar territory to anybody
who has sat through the 1950s classics. Unfortunately, "Saving Private
Ryan" does not even achieve the level of character development of a film
like "Walk in the Sun." The stories about life back home are much more
interesting in Rossen's screenplay. This should not come as any great
surprise because the Hollywood Reds were some of the most accomplished
writers ever to work in tinseltown.
Standing above this film like a canopy are a whole set of assumptions about
American "decency." Not only is General George Marshall decent enough to
rescue a single GI from the fighting, the GI's themselves are also more
decent than the despicable Nazis. There is one plot device that drives this
point home. Hank's men have captured a German soldier. They want to kill
him but Hanks says that this would not be right and sends him off. In the
climax of the film, this soldier turns up again and plunges a knife into
one of the "good guys" in hand-to-hand combat. After he is captured once
again, a GI shoots him in cold blood. The moral of the story is that it is
forgivable to shoot Germans in this manner because they are embodiments of
pure evil, just as they were in "Schindler's Tale,"
There is no doubt that Spielberg decided to make such a patriotic movie
because he is concerned about the widespread erosion of confidence in
elected officials in American society. Warren Beatty, another Hollywood
mover-and-shaker, tackled the same job in "Bulworth." "Bulworth" attempts
to restore people's belief in the system by holding up a "contrary"
politician as an example. This politician decides to tell the truth no
matter what. This, of course, is pure Capra territory.
The reason that WWII is so important to Spielberg is that this period was
the last time when genuine national unity prevailed. People rallied around
their President and were willing to lie down their lives. Good workers were
like good soldiers. They went to work in the factories without demanding
"excess" raises. Anybody who struck during WWII was a traitor. After WWII
the "bad guys" changed identity. No longer was it the sneering blond beast
of the Wehrmacht. Instead it was the fanatical Chinese soldier or Russian
superspy.
In order to get people thinking in this mode once again, Spielberg can not
churn out conventional narratives of the 1950s style. Instead they have to
be gussied up with trendy camera work and a pulsating film score. It is
also necessary to draft the most likable actor in Hollywood to play the
lead. If there is one thing you can say about Tom Hanks, it is that the
public finds him easy to like. Although speaking for myself I would have to
say that after Hanks's recent gee-whiz promotion of Nazi party official
Werner Von Braun's NASA and this lateest patriotic pap served up by
Spielberg, it seems like he is angling to become the new John Wayne.
(http://www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html)

Author
Homer Yen
I feel very lucky to be living in an age where society's greatest war is
that on drugs and on AIDS.  I can only nod my head in grateful silence
when I think about those who have given their lives for the security of
their children, for the subsequent betterment of society and for a life
free of tyranny.  And although these ends are noble and are worth dying
for, war has a strange way of eroding away the soul of a man and
replacing it with anger and emptiness.
"Saving Private Ryan" is a raw and powerful film that takes us right
into the bowels of WWII when allied forces staged their daring invasion
upon Omaha Beach, which we now know as D-day.  The film immediately
projects a mixture of raw tension and helplessness.  Like an animal
desperately trying to escape from a trap, thousands of men await in
their troop transports as they get ready to storm the beach.  Meanwhile,
the enemies have readied all of their artillery on them, waiting to
indiscriminately kill anything that moves.  Director Steven Speilberg
takes this masterfully shot battle scene one step further by allowing us
to see through the eyes of a soldier struggling to make it ashore as his
comrades fall prey to bullets, grenades and explosions while the color
of the ocean grows more red from the blood of the other soldiers.  
Countless lives were lost on D-day.  And throughout WWII, many more sons
lost their lives fighting for their country.  These kinds of losses are
insufferable for the parents of children killed in action and especially
for a widow named Ryan.  During the course of a month, 3 of her 4 brave
sons are killed.  One is possibly still alive.  He is Private James Ryan
(Matt Damon), a paratrooper that disappeared behind enemy lines after a
botched drop.  The War Dept. assures the mom that they will do whatever
they can to save him and to return him to her.
This assignments falls on the shoulders of Capt. John Miller (Tom
Hanks), who survived the invasion but is astounded to find out that he
has been selected to lead this trivial search and rescue mission.  The
group that he leads, in essence, is a microcosm of the ideas of war.
Three of them stood out for me.  There is Miller himself, whose
background doesn't lend itself to Captaincy, and the harsh reality of
war makes him worried that his wife will never again recognize him.
There is Pvt. Reiben (Edward Burns) who questions the practicality of
the mission.  And there is the meek Cpl. Upham who is an excellent
translator but has never fired a rifle or seen the brutality of war up
close.  But as they trek across the countryside in search of Ryan ("he
better be worth it," says one of them) and face snipers and machine gun
nests, they begin to learn more about one another.  Their time spent
traveling across the scenic French landscape allows them weigh the
importance of saving Private Ryan and allows them to finally internalize
the significance of the mission.  For these men, it is a way for them to
inject some of the humanity that has been stripped away through war,
blood, vomit and death.
This is not only a superior war film, but at it's moralistic center, it
is a dramatic story about a group of men in search of a form of
redemption that is as hard to find as Ryan himself.  There are some
disturbing scenes of carnage such as bodies exploding, people whose
limbs have been shot off, or even the intestines of a still-alive
soldier.  But all of it is appropriate given the backdrop of WWII and
the fierce battles that took place.
Indeed, during this time when men are reduced to animals that
indiscriminately kill to stay alive, when men undergo a startling
transformation from farm boys to killing machines, when men must band
together to overcome their greatest fears and most sorrowful of regrets,
finding and saving Private Ryan may be the one decent thing that they
can do - it may be the one positive thing that they can take away from
this war.  As each of the men who are assigned on this odd mission begin
to connect with it's moral importance, they realize that saving Private
Ryan means that in some way they can also save themselves.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
EDITORIAL: Saving Private Spielberg
by Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Through the years, Steven Spielberg has proved that he can not only
deliver special effects fueled thrillers (Jaws, Jurassic Park), but also
emotionally invigorating films (ET, Schindlers List).  Although his
other recent piece, Amistad, was one of the worst films he has made in
the 80's and 90's, Spielberg has received much critical acclaim for
Saving Private Ryan.  With any luck, this film will strengthen the
notion that mainstream cinema can still produce its fair share of
masterpieces, and that movie-goers do not necessarily have to resort to
watching Indie or art house films for a good amount of substance.
Recent examples The Truman Show, Titanic and Gattaca have proved that
brilliance can still be found in popular films.
The film depicts the tale of eight men on a mission to save one during
World War II.  If Spielberg has pieced it together correctly, Saving
Private Ryan may just install similar shell-shocked responses that films
like Gallipoli and Schindlers List were renown, and feared for.  If you
have seen either of these films at the cinema, you may have experienced
something similar to what I did - as the credits rolled onto the screen,
the audience was silent. Silent perhaps because of the sheer power of
the subject material, silent because of guilt that the human race could
ever have allowed these horrific events to occur, or simply because no
one wanted to spoil the moment.  And what a moment it was.
Unlike some of his early films, Spielberg has a wide range of talented
crewmembers to strengthen his creation.  Hollywood icon Tom Hanks is
amongst one of the finer actors in the industry, having excellent
performances in Philadelphia and Forest Gump (as well as many others)
under his belt.  In the production side of things, Spielberg has chosen
some of the best: cinematographer Janusz Kaminksi (Schindlers List, The
Lost World), composer John Williams (all three Star Wars films, JFK,
Jurassic Park) and film editor Michael Kahn (Empire of the Sun,
Schindlers List).  As you can see, their records are impressive to say
the least.
Spielberg began his directing career in the late fifties with The Last
Gun (a barely known western) in a very different industry.  Back then,
the phrase "you'll never work in this town again" actually meant
something - the studios were family based and perhaps a perfect example
of corrupt-but-correct organizations.  Although anyone could not just
make a film without any problems (or rather, any person not affiliated
with the industry); all that a potential director needed to do was share
his or her ideas with a small bunch of people.  Nowadays, there are
hundreds of people who can say no for funding a film, and a small group
of people who can say yes.  And this is for obvious reasons, with the
amount of crap that manages to barge its way into contemporary cinema.
But any film with the name "Spielberg" attached to it is bound to get
the go ahead.  From first looks, Saving Private Ryan seems like it may
be some of Steven's best work.  But that would be an awfully hard feat
to accomplish, as this man has carved some unforgettable screen moments,
revolutionary accouchements, and a few truly magnificent masterpieces
that demonstrate the versatility and power of the whole cinematic
experience.  Hopefully, Private Spielberg will deliver the goods once
again.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN PRODUCTION INFORMATION:
Cast: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Matt Damon, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies,
Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi
Director: Steven Spielberg
Producers: Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn
Screenplay: Robert Rodat
Cinematography: Janusz Kaminski
Music: John Williams
Australian distributor: United International Pictures
Australian theatrical release date: November 19

Author
David Sunga
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies, Matt
Damon
Ingredients: Philosophy, World War II, humans trapped in carnage, rescue
mission, cowering, crying, killing
Synopsis: 
At the bottom of Nature's food chain, population in prey animals is kept
in check by predators. But among the top creatures there are no higher
predators. Often the top creatures themselves - - whether they be lions
or wolves or primitive humans - - keep their numbers low mainly through
vicious regionalism and territorial resource competition, using crude
weapons such as teeth and claws, or spears and arrows. The setting of
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is World War II, an era in history when Germany's
(and Japan's) "Manifest Destiny" included resource expansion and racial
exclusion on an immense scale involving advanced 20th century weaponry
and populations of millions, resulting in continuous, gruesome carnage
and psychological denial.
Among the countries resisting Germany and Japan was the United States,
at that time an economic heavyweight and regional power, but militarily
inadequate compared to the great powers. For example, Japan had the
world's most powerful and technologically advanced navy at the time of
Pearl Harbor. As a result of the United States' relative inexperience, a
situation occurred where ordinary American men such as kindly
schoolteachers and terrified, fresh-faced kids (today some would be
below the legal drinking age) found themselves responsible for
penetrating hostile territory to battle killing machines in an attempt
to stem the tide of Nazi expansion. Many combatants made the ultimate
sacrifice, dying like flies in a hailstorm. 
In SAVING PRIVATE RYAN Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is not a
professional soldier; he is more likely to read Emerson than to pack a
machine gun. But because it is wartime, Miller and a small squad of men
are unfortunately given an unwise suicidal mission behind enemy lines to
locate a lost but relatively unimportant soldier named Private James
Ryan (Matt Damon) and return Ryan to safety. Although the men question
and resist their mission, they eventually decide it is the only way
they'll ever be allowed to return home from the War, and so they
courageously do their duty. Finding and rescuing Ryan becomes a kind of
Holy Grail, symbolizing the desire of every man to protect innocent,
ordinary life from the brutality of war, even if the heroes themselves
risk being consumed, body and personality, by warfare.  
Opinion:
You can always tell a four-star movie because when the audience comes
out of the theater after seeing it, they look a little dazed, as if in
their minds some part of the movie is still playing. SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
is one such movie.
Most of us live pleasant lives of convenience, unmindful of gritty,
value-laden, life -and-death decisions that others have to make. We go
down to the grocery store refrigerator and select meat for our
consumption, our minds far removed from the physical act of having to
butcher the food ourselves. From plush, comfortable couches some of us
can push buttons that enable long range bombs to fly far away, and go
down the chimney to incinerate a cartoonish villain, or demolish an
electrical power plant in a rogue state. Or we may clap our hands when
we see it on TV. Like watching a video game.
But the exact same executions would have an entirely different effect on
us if we had to do them face to face. For example, what if we had to
stab and kill thirteen-year-old enemy soldiers ourselves instead of by
push-button? What if we had to live in the same building with civilian
families dying from lack of water, and eating rotten, non-refrigerated,
food as a result of the local electrical power plant being bombed? Or
suppose we were responsible for deciding from among our friends and
family, which member must die in a hail of gunfire in order to take out
an enemy station. In that case things wouldn't be so easy. Life would
take on a gritty texture. We'd be forced to clarify our values, who we
are, and what we stand for.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN explores this idea. Ordinary men are sent into a
situation of utter carnage - - not to swagger and easily save the
universe as per usual summer blockbuster - -  but so that the film may
allow us to vicariously examine how Joe Everyman might feel in a FUBAR
situation such as the war our grandfathers faced half a century ago, a
war which we may yet fight again, if vigilance falters and human
inattention allows history to repeat itself.
Behind the scenes, somebody, somewhere is responsible for slaughtering
the food animal; somebody does engage the enemy; somebody does make
courageous, forgotten sacrifices in defense and nurturance of the common
good. The "dirty work" happens in history and every day behind the
sanitized curtains of our convenience in order to make possible our
pampered and privileged lifestyles. Accustomed to free entertainment,
facilities, and civil liberties, we only rarely ponder - - as the
characters do in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN - - the politically incorrect and
often disturbing concept of sacrifice.
While watching the movie inside the theater I noticed a father consoling
a teenage boy who had covered his face with his shirt because he could
not stomach the frightening, gut-wrenching visual detail of the war
scenes (bleached colors and on-foot camerawork along with periods of
deafness and slow motion make the audience feel as if it is partaking in
the mayhem). It is a tribute to Spielberg, his cast, and crew that
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN successfully captures the realism and emotion of
war. 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is a classic that is easily as good if not better
than the best previous movies of Tom Hanks or Steven Spielberg. 
Copyright Š 1998 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
David Kerr
After being bombarded by Dreamworks SKG advertisements, I eagerly 
awaited Spielberg's latest movie about World War II: Saving Private 
Ryan.  After the opening scene (which seems like they added it in at the 
last minute), the audience is treated to the invasion at Omaha Beach.  
Subjected is probably a better word, for when the plank is lowered on 
the first boat all the men on board are slaughtered by German machine 
guns, spraying blood on the camera lens.
This first horrifying scene led me to expect more of the same.  Ten 
minutes in I was so utterly engrossed with the movie that I was 
convinced, "this is going to be the best war movie ever".  Unfortunately 
it soon degenerates into your standard Hollywood flick about a band of 
charismatic war buddies.  While the movie becomes basically average 
after the first half hour - getting repetitive and boring, then 
exciting, then looping round again - the superb opening sequence and 
technical excellence pushes the rating from an average two stars to a 
decent three.  While Saving Private Ryan is probably the best war movie 
since Platoon, it has many shortcomings.
The problems I have with this movie are: it is a predictable Hollywood 
movie that takes little risks and comes dangerously close to glorifying 
war.  I shouldn't let my political ideologies get in the way of this 
review, but it seems to me that the intention of Spielberg was, at 
least, to show that war is ugly.  If that was his intention, he failed.  
For example, a few gruesome death scenes are played for laughs.  Three 
scenes in the opening battle come to mind: a man picking up his arm and 
running around with it, a man shot in the head after just being 
medically stabilized, and a man shot in the head after being saved by 
his helmet.  The latter two caused an uncomfortably high amount of 
laughter from the audience.  Throwing in funny scenes in the middle of a 
tragic battle is what I call "glorifying war".  This reminded me of the 
sad "watch people bounce off things as they fall" gags in Titanic.  I'm 
not opposed to having such scenes in movies, I just think they destroy 
the overall message and are a cheap way to make audiences like the 
movie.  Consider the emotional impact that Titanic would have had if the 
person twirling off the rotor blade was the young woman whose falling 
death was the only one not shown.  The same should have been applied to 
Saving Private Ryan.  If you are going to show a funny death scene that 
isn't supposed to be funny, then give the audience an emotional 
attachment.  Otherwise people will laugh.
To make war look even more fun, all the noble characters are happy to 
fight, and if they aren't noble enough to fight they eventually become 
go-lucky war heroes by the end.  The dramatic music cues when our heroes 
do the right thing kind of gives this away.  A lot of this movie would 
have been better without these cues (or possibly no soundtrack at all 
since this is all it is used for).
Finally we see the brave Christian sniper who is having a heck of a time 
praying to his god before each kill.  It would be very interesting to 
know if Spielberg is showing that theism can be abused or if he is 
trying to show that the allies in WWII actually had God on their side.  
There are plenty of shots showing the U.S. troops carrying crosses and 
praying yet presents the Germans as godless heathens.  I think a less 
biased, less forced, and less ignorant approach to this subject is 
needed.
Perhaps these scenes went above my head and were played satirically to 
show the insanity and stupidity of war.  If so, it went over the heads 
of most of the audience as well, and I wasn't even laughing!  Saving 
Private Ryan being an extreme satire certainly is a possibility - it 
happened recently with Paul Verhoeven's Starship Troopers.  Verhoeven 
wasn't actually pushing the fascist message of the film, but trying to 
show how ridiculous it was (see the directors commentary on DVD).  
Ironically, a lot of people came out agreeing with the "message" of the 
film - I hope the same doesn't happen with Saving Private Ryan!
Another tiresome device used by Spielberg is making sure the audience 
goes through a long drawn out process of making sure we know someone 
essential to the plot is going to die, while anyone given little screen 
time has a quick and unexpected death.  
These gripes aside, let me dwell on what I liked about the movie.  
Usually reviewers talk about what they like first and what they didn't 
like second.  Not me.  The technical excellence of this movie is 
incredible; from staging incredible pyrotechnic battle scenes to using a 
multitude of film stock, war on film hasn't look more realistic.  The 
camera gets a bit MTV-ish at times but it is almost always used as a 
good confusion effect.  Overall the cinematography by Janusz Kaminski is 
perfect.
The weapons and tanks all look incredibly realistic, and I mean 
realistic.  I wonder if they used actual equipment from the period.  I'm 
also wondering if there were any computer generated effects - if there 
were I couldn't tell.  Some of the bullets whizzing through the air 
leave a yellow streak though - this seemed a bit strange and was 
probably a computer effect.  Since these streaks all match the various 
film stocks you have to commend the effects team for a wonderful job.  
The sound is also loud, thunderous, and uses multi-channel effects well.  
Furthermore the guns all have distinct sounds, and this also impressed 
me.
A couple classic lines: "If one of my men dies, doesn't that mean I've 
saved two more?"  "If God is on our side, then who could be on the 
other?"
Where Spielberg does take some risks and shows his directorial talent is 
showing some insignificant characters in pain and suffering.  Most war 
movies just show casualties lie down quietly and peacefully as if they 
had spontaneously fallen asleep during the battle.  I have to thank him 
for making this decision as this gives the movie a needed dose of human 
realism.  Another bonus is that some of the characters are not cardboard 
stereotypes.  Tom Sizemore, Edwards Burns, and Tom Hanks are good in 
their roles and both  make unpredictable decisions (a lot of POW killing 
in this movie).  Yet there are even more cardboard characters: the 
humanistic wimp who becomes a tough soldier, the lovable young hotshot 
sniper, and of course the rest are tough and rambunctious grunts who 
don't seem to have any thoughts about war at all.
This movies message basically boils down to: pro-patriotism, 
pro-American, and leans slightly towards pro-war.  Whether you have a 
problem with those things is your own concern.  If you'd rather not see 
them, I suggest some real anti-war movies: Platoon, Paths of Glory, All 
Quiet on the Western Front, or even Spielberg's own Schindler's List.  
If you are a war movie buff like me then by all means rush out to see 
it.  The battle scenes, at least, are technically excellent and the 
chance to see the opening fifteen minutes on a big screen shouldn't be 
passed up.  Heck, it even has a cameo by Captain Dale Dye!


Author
Stephen Wong
There is an eerie surrealism as we descend from the gloomy skies over  
Omaha beach. The redundant waves mercilessly beat upon the transport  
boats carrying the first wave of American soldiers, each silently
staring at their inevitable destiny. Some begin to vomit, a combination
of seasickness and fear that can only mean one thing, war. The date is
June 6, 1944, otherwise known as D-Day, the single most important battle
of the last great war. And as the US LCVP boats finally begin to drop
their doors to let the soldiers pour out onto the beach, a cold shock
comes over you. You are no longer watching a war film. You have been
transported onto those boats, and all the horrors of war that you have
only read about suddenly become reality. What ensues is the most 
ferocious and horrific sequences in all of film history. Bullets rip 
through the air with wanton lust, tearing apart the first three lines of
troops attempting to make it to shore. The camera is jolted as if to
suggest that there is nothing anyone can do to stop this madness. German
75mm machine cannons relentlessly bombard the shoreline as rounds tear
through the backs of helmets and blow off limbs. This is not Hollywood's
glamorization of death, this is death in its truest form. Bodies drop by
the hundreds, completely limp upon impact from the bullets. Soldiers lie
screaming on the sand with only their hands keeping their insides from
falling out. Medics begin treating the wounded and before long, become
the wounded. The shore is soaked red in blood, yet the Americans continue
on. And for nearly half an hour this onslaught carries forth, until
finally, the beach is taken.
For Spielberg, the point is simple: War is Hell. There's no glory on the 
battlefield. Heroes die. Good men die. What we read in our history books 
means nothing. They merely consist of statistics of death tolls and fancy 
plans laid out by four star Generals. Saving Private Ryan is war 
seen through the eyes of a  soldier, and what better choice to do that 
than with a man whose demeanor alone elicits courage and honor. Tom Hanks 
plays platoon captain John Miller who, after courageously leading his
troops through the hell of D-Day, is sent on a mission to find and bring
home private James Francis Ryan (Matt Damon). The reason: Ryan, who was
dropped behind enemy lines in France as part of the Airborne infantry
attack, is the only surviving brother of four enlisted in the war (his
mother will be receiving all three telegrams at once), and the chief of
Staff of the US military is determined to "get him the hell out of
there." So Miller assembles his best men to help him traverse the French
countryside in search for the fourth Ryan. His platoon includes stubborn
Brooklynite private Reiben (Edward Burns), the strong-willed Sgt.
Horvath (Tom Sizemore), shell-shocked translator Corporal Upham (Jeremy
Davies), wisecracking Jewish-American private Mellish (Adam Goldberg),
Medic Wade (Giovanni Ribisi) and sharp-shooting private Caparzo  (Vin
Diesel). 
As the men march on, we begin to see the true destruction of war-torn
France.  Towns are filled with the rubble of smashed buildings, and
scattered gunfire snaps through the deserted streets. Along the way we
slowly get an intimate glimpse of each of the characters, and we become
closer and closer to the platoon. When one of them dies, we feel as if we
have lost a close friend. But despite the tragedies there's always a
feeling that things are still OK because of Captain Miller's presence.
Hanks' performance is brilliant. He is the quintessential every man's
hero, exuding both fatherly poise and human vulnerability, and is the
binding force behind Spielberg's film. When the epic final battle
concludes, Hanks and Spielberg leave us with a hauntingly powerful
admonition of the truth of war. There is no happy ending. We are left
only with a simple reminder that in war, good men die so that good men 
may carry on the flame. In what is no doubt the greatest war film ever 
made, Spielberg has shown us that even in the darkest moments of 
humanity, there is still hope.
Visit the Entertainment Insiders at:
http://einsiders.home.mindspring.com

Author
James Brundage
At the time I am writing this, I have seen Saving Private Ryan three times.
Each time, I have resolved myself to write a review on it, but was not able
to do so. To sum up the greatness of this film would be like writing a
letter to the mother of a dead soldier. No words I can say can express the
tragedy inherent in the film. I could batter you with cliché after cliché,
trite phrase after trite phrase, but what would that accomplish? "Best film
of the year", "finest war movie ever made", and "an incredible experience"
are truths, but they do not tell the story.
Saving Private Ryan is a film about the agony of war. It is not told, as
most war films are, from a third-person, as the eye that sees but does not
care, but as a first-person (though I cannot reveal who), showing what
happened in World War II. The one cliché I will give that actually does do
the movie justice, and hear me out, is that it is the most violent movie of
all time.
Why does this do Saving Private Ryan justice? Because that is war. War is
when you have a man searching for his arm on Normandy while the world goes
to hell around him. War is innocent soldiers screaming for their mothers
with their guts hanging out, their final words being unintelligible because
of the pain. War is brutal. Saving Private Ryan IS war.
The basic plot is this: a squad of eight men is sent to retrieve one, a boy
who has lost his three brothers on the field of battle and now is lost
himself somewhere behind enemy lines. The eight men, Army Rangers, are
war-hardened individuals, but still strikingly human. Each character, from
the victims who are shot down in the first second of the invasion of
Normandy (which a re-enactment of occupies the first half hour of the film),
to Capt. Henry Miller (Tom Hanks) to Private James Ryan himself, are
beautifully developed, and perfect illustrations of the effects of war upon
man.
This is the justice I offer: The first time I watched it, I saw an old man
walking out. Upon asking him why he was walking out, seeing him in the
lobby, he informed me this: he had been at Normandy.

Author
Steve Kong
Saving Private Ryan is a haunting and moving movie that will live in my
head for a long time to come. There are good movies that come around only
once in a long time and Saving Private Ryan is one of those. 
I never write a review immediately after seeing a movie. I like to let the
movie sink in for a day or two before setting out to write the review.
After Saving Private Ryan, I'm sitting here two hours later writing the
review. The movie is so unsettling that I feel that writing this review
might help me come to grips with some of what happened during the film. 
Saving Private Ryan opens with a 30-minute sequence of the Omaha Beach
D-Day invasion; this is a war sequence is so realistic and raw that I will
be remember it for a long time. I must warn you now, Saving Private Ryan
deserves its R-rating. This is not a movie for young children and if you
are squeamish, you might want to cover your eyes here. The opening sequence
is so extremely violent and realistic that it not only leaves you
breathless, but it leaves you unnerved and senseless. I have not seen
anything like this before and I doubt that I will see anything close
anytime soon. Spielberg shoots this opening sequence with such intensity
that I was left to wonder why all these unnecessary atrocities were committed.
What we find out is that three brothers from the Ryan house were killed
during the war, and all three telegrams are being delivered to the mother
on the same day. However, there is a fourth still in the war. A group of
eight soldiers led by Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is sent out into the
middle of the war to find Private James F. Ryan (Matt Damon) and bring him
home to his family. The journey is long and hard, and about halfway through
the film I was already reeling.
Those of you who read my reviews know that I rarely cry at movies. And even
when I do cry, it usually comes at the end. Saving Private Ryan is the
first movie where I found myself crying halfway through. There are many war
movies, and many of them are about the Second World War. But, most all of
them are candy coated.
Spielberg takes the gloss out of the war; he strips the war down to its
most natural form, and he shoots this war from the point of view of a
soldier. Having done this, Spielberg has made less of a war movie and more
of an anti-war movie. Saving Private Ryan left me wondering why we fight wars.
Is there anything to criticize about Saving Private Ryan? No. In every
sense, this is a perfect movie. Spielberg, who pumped out some mediocre
stuff lately (Lost World, Amistad), comes back strong with Saving Private
Ryan. This movie will make my top ten list this year, and will likely be
the number one film on the list.
Things to note about Saving Private Ryan range from the score to the
acting. The score by the ever-talented John Williams is just as raw as the
film is. It takes our emotions and leads us in all the right directions,
all the while not being overly melodramatic or distracting.
The acting is top-notch, from the leads (Tom Hanks and Tom Sizemore) to the
supporting cast (Matt Damon, Jeremy Davies, Edward Burns, Adam Goldberg,
and Barry Pepper). Spielberg is able to get great performances out of
everyone onscreen. 
Kudos to Robert Rodat for writing this powerful and moving movie. Kudos
also to cinematographer Janusz Kaminski for shooting this film in the way
that it is. The film is not a colorful film, nor is it bright. Kaminski
strips the colors out of the film leaving us with just enough colors to
live with, leaving us feeling slightly uncomfortable. Kaminski's work is
some of the best I've seen this year. Pay close attention to detail during
the first thirty minutes or so. That shows just how good Kaminski is.
Saving Private Ryan is one of the most shocking and memorable films of this
year - and of this decade. There is imagery from this film that I will
never forget and there are characters that will haunt my memory forever.
This is a motion picture that doesn't make war look like a glorious thing;
it shows war as it is, a stupid thing. Don't Miss Saving Private Ryan.

Author
Christopher Null
     At this point, I don't know what I'd say about SAVING PRIVATE RYAN,
even if I hadn't liked it.
     Undoubtedly this year's hype leader among "quality" pictures, RYAN
hasn't garnered a word of bad buzz aside from the stern and dire warnings
about its overwhelming violence content.  It's no lie: RYAN may be one of
the goriest films ever made - it will certainly be the goriest to ever win
an Oscar (which will come in droves: I predict seven).
     An excellent companion piece to SCHINDLER'S LIST, Spielberg has
obviously poured his heart into this movie.  The well-known story of a small
group's search for James Ryan (Damon), whose three brothers were killed
nearly simultaneously, is as simple and as powerful as they come.
     The battle scenes, which encompass probably 100 minutes of the circa
160-minute running time, are epic in proportion.  The idle moments in
between are also worth your attention, although, in the end and in
retrospect, they can seem a bit pithy on occasion, especially the bookend
scenes of the elderly Ryan returning to Normandy to pay his respects.  For
Speilberg, there's no such thing as going too far to get you to cry.
     Still, RYAN's easily a top contender for best film of the year, thanks
to the gut-wrenching realism that pervades every scene of the picture.  I
only hope Spielberg can come to grips with the remnants of JURASSIC PARK
that still must linger in his blood, making him take the easy-cheesy way out
(eg. the planes from above that save the day) when working through the
actual story gets a bit too hairy.
Director: Steven Spielberg
Producer: Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn, Steven Spielberg
Writer: Robert Rodat
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Matt Damon, Jeremy Davies
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Steven Spielberg
Writer: Robert Rodat
Starring: Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies, Adam
Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi, Van Diesel, Matt Damon, Dennis
Farina, Harve Presnell, Ted Danson, Leland Orser, Paul Giamatti
There are two ways that a war film can go, both of them tragic mistakes: 1)
they can glorify it and make it seem like everything the soldiers do is a
great and heroic thing (see John Wayne's "The Green Berets" - a pro-Vietnam
flick); and 2) they try to be totally political about it and ignore the
fact that there's such a thing as heroism, even in the barbarism of war. 
The latter are usually made by people who never had to go through this and
are just viewing from what they've seen on the news and heard from a couple
people.  There's a scene in "The Best Years of Our Lives" that illustrates
what's wrong with the latter.  In it, a soldier who was come back from
World War II with no hands is told he is a "sucker" for going to war by an
everyday schmoo activist, prompting the soldier to attack him in a fit of
rage.  What's wrong with the activist is he's never had to go into battle
and fight for something he believed in, therefore he knows nothing.
And neither did I until about a week ago before I saw "Saving Private
Ryan," perhaps the most realistic, gritty film ever put together by a major
studio.  In the film's opening half hour, we are "treated" to a long,
accurate, and gory depiction of D-Day, namely the Normandy beach siege,
which, from the looks of it, was almost a suicide mission.  We're there in
the boat when it's about to dock with soldiers acting nervous, throwing up,
and the lot.  When the doors open, the first couple rows of soldiers are
gunned down immeadiately, and the remaining soldiers hide behind the blocks
on the beach made so the boats wouldn't be able to drive up onto the beach
any further.
With machine guns blaring all over the surround sound system, jerky camera
movements, people dying left and right, and a group of soldiers trying to
form a little plan at the last minute to complete their mission and stay
alive, we are introduced to one soldier in particular: Captain John Miller
(Tom Hanks), who's hands were shaking before the boats docked, and who's
job it is to command whatever men he can find to try and stop the opposing
army from shooting.  When hiding behind the blocks, the camera closes in on
him, the sound drops, motion slows up, and he looks around as everyone is
quickly and gruesomely being killed.  He even notices one soldier in
particular who, missing his arm, goes back to pick it up and carry it with
him.  Welcome to the inferno.
The film was directed by Steven Spielberg, one of the best directors still
working today, although this film finds him in a career slump: following
the wild successes of "Jurassic Park" and "Schindler's List," as well as a
long hiatus from directing, he made three films in a row, two which opened
last year - "The Lost World" and "Amistad" - and both which were big
disappointments: The former was little more than a cheap way to make money,
and it showed; the latter was too overly ambitious for its own good.  Not
many people realized how important it was that his third film in this trio
really was.  Luckily enough, "Saving Private Ryan" finds him more than back
in his old form, but that he's still as powerful a director as he ever was.
You want to see how great a filmmaker he is?  Look how intensely amazing
the opening Normandy sequence is.  It's probably the most unnerrving thirty
minutes ever caught on film - so unnerrving that I couldn't wait for it to
end, a damn good thing if you're trying to create a war sequence in all its
"glory."  Any other filmmaker, or at least most of them, would falter after
this.  It's such a strong sequence that it could all go down hill from
there.  But Spielberg decides that not only is he going to keep moving on,
but that he's also going to expand his themes, and the result is an
emotional rollar coaster through a realistic debate on duty versus
humanity.
He does this by bringing up a fictitious composite: the Ryan boys, four
brothers who went to war, and three who were found to be killed after
D-Day, with one missing, either dead or alive.  When discovering this, the
heads of the military decide to take strict action: they will send a
platoon to find the last Private Ryan (later played by Matt Damon, who made
this long before he became a star) and bring him home alive.  So following
Normandy, we find that Miller and a group of his en have been chosen to
find him, whether they like it or not (they don't).
The men are a bitter, cynical bunch, showing their anger in several ways:
Sergeant Horvath (Tom Sizemore) shows it by obeying every order and
bitching about it in confidence while Private Rieben (Edward Burns, the
writer/director who needed the good attention anyway) acts completely
sarcastic about everything, hiding his timidness.  Our entry into this
group is with one of the film's many masterstrokes, Corporal Upham (Jeremy
Davies, from "Spanking the Monkey"), a French/German translator who is
assigned to the platoon, and who's never stepped foot in battle before. 
Played to perfect comic nervousness, he becomes the viewpoint of the
audience, wreaking of ignorance and pleading for a little humanity in some
of the film's more frightening scenes, as well as sometimes the only guy
who doesn't know the lingo and attitude that the soldiers have become
accustomed to when being with eachother.
Lingering over all this is Captain Miller, who has the terrible burden of
not only feeling exactly like these soldiers but having to convey a sense
of leadership and emotional stature for the rest of the platoon.  Watching
Miller have to deal with the mighty paradox of commanding when he's as
afraid as the rest of them becomes the film's most human aspect, and thank
god he's played by Tom Hanks who gives what has got to be the best
performance he's ever given.  His is devoid of gloss or cliche; he makes
him into a fully-developed character, worthy of our sympathy, and worried
that his wife will not recognize him because he's been through so much hell
while being in the army.  In his most human moment, he confesses to Sgt.
Horvath that he thinks his mission is bullshit and that Private Ryan
"better be worth it."
"Ryan" could easily be the most anti-war film ever made, what with its
total gory depiction of war and sense of loss we get whenever one of the
soldiers is killed (look at how saddening the scene where Giovanni Ribisi
dies).  But at the same time, this could have been an over-glorification of
soldiers, with everyone gung ho about getting Private Ryan (this premise
could have easily been another vehicle for John Wayne back in the hey day
of war films).  What it is, however, is much better than that: it's a
realistic portrait of this situation that refuses to take sides.  It merely
asks us to look at it for what it is, and make our own conclusions.  He
does this not by having the characters speak the ideas of the filmmaker, as
many films make the mistake of doing, but by showing it through action,
prompting the audience to not see it as propaganda for some personal view,
but to see it as totally and utterly emotionally devastating.
What can be said about the battle scenes in this movie that wouldn't seem
redundant?  What can be said about that shot of the Ryan mother seeing the
army car pull up to her house and the priest getting out that can't be said
just in emotions?  It may not seem obvious right now, but Spielberg has
done and said a lot more about war in this film than any other film in
history ever has.  He has not glamorized it or taken a side with it, and he
has found a new way of hating war and a new way of honoring the men who
risked their lives to fight for their country: these men weren't really
fighting anyone in particular; they were fighting to defend their fellow
men seflessly.  But the most important thing about this film is that it
defies explanation and becomes the one thing that so many films try to be
but never become: cathartic.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Ryan Davis
        I have sat through endless history classes where the teacher attempts
to explain to the class what went on during WWII. But all those years of talk
didn't teach me anything about what happened, although in about three hours,
Spielberg showed me all. `Saving Private Ryan' reveals all the courage,
hardship, and sacrifice that kept our country free.
        Tom Hanks plays Captain John Miller, who is assigned to lead a small
group of men through enemy territory to find Private Ryan (Matt Damon). Ryan's
three brothers have all been killed in action and the Army doesn't want their
mother to lose all of her sons.
        Miller's crew consists of a number of extremely well acted and
memorable characters, which range from a bible-quoting sniper to a cowardly
translator, with lots of interesting people in between. The most fully
developed character in the group is Corporal Upham (Jeremy Davies), a mapmaker
and translator, who is made to join the crew because he can speak French and
German. He doesn't want to be there and has never been in an actual combat
situation before.
        The first twenty-five minutes are incredibly brilliant. The battle
scenes are like nothing I have ever seen before. You feel as if you are in the
war; the camera acts just like a soldier and crawls along with the company as
it makes its way up the beach. All the battle scenes are breathtaking and very
realistic.
        The acting is marvelous. The whole ensemble is entirely outstanding.
Tom Hanks gives the best performance of his career, his first truly Oscar
worthy role. Everything else is extraordinary too: Cinematography, sets,
special effects, and costumes. `Saving Private Ryan' is one of the finest and
most powerful films of the year. It was re-released in February in time for
Oscar nominations on Tuesday, February 9th.  If you missed it the first time
around catch this war masterpiece now in theaters.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Christian Pyle
"Saving Private Ryan" will certainly be remembered among the best war movies
ever made.  It does what a great war movie should-it looks realistically at war
and examines war intelligently.  The plot is deliberately insane:  eight men
are sent into enemy territory to rescue one solider, Private Ryan (Matt Damon).
 Ryan is the last surviving son in his family; his three brothers have all died
in action recently.  Gen. George Marshall (Harve Presnell) is moved by the
plight of Mrs. Ryan, who will learn about the three deaths on the same day, and
orders that the last Ryan be returned safely home.  The hitch is that Ryan
parachuted into Normandy on D-Day, and the Army has no way to know if he is
alive or to bring him out except to send a team in after him.  So, Capt. John
Miller (Tom Hanks) and his squad of Rangers, who have just survived the bloody
battle of Omaha Beach, are ordered to risk their lives to bring Ryan back.
Naturally, the eight soldiers on the rescue team must examine why Ryan's life
is valued over their own.  Ryan serves as much as a symbol as a character; he
comes to represent all the people that soldiers sacrifice their lives for.  The
plot allows "Saving Private Ryan" to explore the complex emotions the soldiers
feel about being asked to lay down their lives and those of their buddies for a
stranger.
In addition to this theme of sacrifice, "Saving Private Ryan" examines the
effects of war.  These eight men are not professional soldiers; they are
everyday guys from a variety of backgrounds who have been plucked out of their
civilian lives.  The men have a pool going about what their captain did for a
living before the war.  When he finally tells them, Miller comments that back
home people quickly guess his occupation and wonders if he has been changed by
the war, so changed that his wife won't recognize him.  Miller justifies the
mission as a purification, declaring, "If [saving Ryan] earns me the right to
get back to my wife, well then that's my mission."
The performances are excellent, and the characters are varied and interesting.
 (This is a major difference between "Private Ryan" and its rival WWII epic
"The Thin Red Line," where the characters tend to be indistinct and to blur
into each other).  The rescue team includes a seasoned sergeant with a
collection of dirt from all the places he's fought (Tom Sizemore), a grumbling
malcontent (Edward Burns), a sharpshooter who prays before firing (Barry
Pepper), a Jewish soldier who enjoys showing his Star of David to captured
Nazis (Adam Goldberg), a sensitive medic (Giovanni Ribisi), and a naďve
translator who's never been in combat before (Jeremy Davies).  Robert Rodat's
screenplay is rich in detail and gives the fine cast a good deal to work with.
"Saving Private Ryan" also features the most harrowing war sequence ever
committed to film.  After a brief introductory frame, we are taken to Miller
and crew on a boat headed for Omaha Beach.  As soon as the gate drops, machine
gun fire begins to tear men to ribbons.  Some dive into the water, but bullets
still slice into them indiscriminately.  Many viewers may be offended by the
violence, but it is doubtless a realistic depiction of the battle (as veterans
have affirmed).  This violence is also quite different than the glamous
shoot-'em-ups we've seen so often in action films-the hundreds of soldiers who
die in this brief scene never had a chance.
Despite its many strengths, "Saving Private Ryan" also has significant
weaknesses in choices made by director Steven Spielberg  and cinematographer
Janusz Kaminski.  Spielberg and Kaminski first collaborated on another movie
about the era of WWII, "Schindler's List" (1993).  What made "Schindler" such a
powerful picture was the clash between Kaminski's stark black-and-white
photography and Spielberg's tug-at-your-heartstrings style of epic
storytelling-either style without the other would have failed.  For "Private
Ryan," Spielberg bleached out 60% of the color in post-production.  While the
black-and-white of "Schindler" served well to suggest the bleakness of the
subject matter and to give a sense of the period (most 1940's movies were in
b&w), the bleached look of "Private Ryan" seems stylized and that undercuts the
movie's aspirations for realism.  Another odd choice-Kaminski's camera often
shakes.  He probably went this way to give the audience a feeling of the chaos
and confusion of battle, but the effect it has is to remove us from the scene
and remind us of the camera.  These strange decisions keep "Private Ryan" from
being the masterpiece that "Schindler" was.
Š 1999 Christian L. Pyle
">http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Christian+Pyle>

Author
Josh Schirmer
"Schindler's List", arguably the greatest movie in film history, knew what
it was doing when it told the story of one man who valued life as it
should be valued, saving hundreds of innocent Jewish men, women and
children for certain doom from the German Nazis that lurked around every
corner. It touched every aspect of our emotions; it made us smile and cry
at the same moment, and made you not sure why you felt the way you did,
only knowing that the way you felt was right. It made you turn your head
in disgust as, in cold blood, the non-threatening Jews were shot down. It
made you, above all things, question why. It hit the nerve it was meant to
hit, designed not to be a movie, but rather, an experience. And this, a
World War II movie of some aspect, never even touched the subject of the
war.
Steven Spielberg is a master filmmaker, the one who Hollywood turns to if
they want the job done right. "Schindler's List" instantly became his
masterpiece, showing the world that his lighthearted, family-enjoyable
romps (such as the "Indiana Jones" trilogy, "Hook", and the unforgettable
"E.T.: The Extra- Terrestrial") were a mere understatement of the work he
was capable of doing. The work before "Schindler's List" was undeniably
fantastic, an impossibilty for any other director to improve upon. But
Spielberg did it. Flawlessly.
"Schindler's List" should be shown in every school, every last History
class spanning the whole world around; EVERYONE must see it, to learn, to
understand, and most of all, to assure that we do not bury the horrible
past that this world has seen. It is, and will remain, the primary teacher
of what the Holocaust was really about.
This time, he takes us away from the Nazi prison camps, away from the
downright horror that millions faced, away from Oscar Schindler's heroics,
and puts us in the middle of the war zone. And from the moment the film
begins, you will not be able to look away, for it grips you like nothing
else and pulls you into the carnage.
This movie, like "Schindler's List", is not meant to be a movie, but an
experience. "Schindler" gave us a black-and-white film to bring us deeper
into the story, with only minor color (most notably, the parka of a
wandering Jewish girl, who journey's aimlessly through the massacre
surrounding her). And now, with "Saving Private Ryan", Speilberg uses his
expertiece to show us what we have been afraid to picture.
The battles are long, in real time, filmed with handheld cameras chasing
soldiers through their suicide runs. It shows what other war movies have
been afraid to show: a soldier lays on the ground, his entrails scattering
along the beach; a man desperately searching for his arm that he lost in
battle; a dying young man whimpering, pleading to go home, to see his
"mommy". True emotions of panic and hatred grace the screen, and you will
be swept up in all of it, and be angered you are futile to try to stop it,
much as the soldiers must have felt during the endless massacre.
I am a fourteen year old child, grandson of a survivor of World War II,
nephew to a man who went through Viet Nam. They have only been words to
me, places in a history book that happened forever ago, that might as well
have been works of fiction. Until now. As "Schindler's List" heightened my
awareness of the true horror of the Holocaust, made me sick to think
anyone could be so inhumane and cruel, "Ryan" has shown me, truly, that
war is Hell. Never again will I think of my grandfather or uncle in the
same manner.
"Schindler" was a teacher, one that everyone listened to. And "Ryan" is
it's counterpart, to show everyone that WWII, the last "Good War", had
nothing good to show. That you can live your life, and try to make a
difference, and you end up dead on a beach, screaming for your mother.
Tears flow unstoppable during the film; even the laugh lines do not bring
too much a smile.
Bring the children, in spite of the rating. Show them what they need to
see. To learn. That's what this film is; a teacher. And it give
"Schindler's List" a run for it's money. Not an easy task to accomplish.

Author
Victory A. Marasigan
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
Review by Victory A. Marasigan
http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~vmaras1/reviewsidx.html
Steven Spielberg, the so-called Peter Pan of cinema, was thought to have
reached the pinnacle of his filmmaking career with Schindler's List, his
docudrama of the Nazi Holocaust. Critics declared that he had finally
grown up. Saving Private Ryan, his brutal examination of another aspect
of The Last Great War, solidifies this declaration once and for all.
After a brief modern-day prologue,Spielberg takes us to the open holding
area of a seaborne landing craft, where we are huddled with a group of
American troops. A closer look at these men reveals that most are young,
barely out of their teens. An air of dread hangs over all of them as
they sit there hoping for the best, expecting the worst. Those who
aren't vomiting look like they are a boat-rock away from doing so. Our
heartbeats quicken pace along with theirs as the announcement is made
that they will be exiting the craft momentarily. And once the landing
ramp opens on Omaha Beach, the worst hell ever filmed begins and does
not end for twenty-four nerve-jangling minutes.
Never before has the terror of war been depicted so graphically, and
never before has the
boundary between cinema and reality been dissolved so cleanly as in
these opening
moments. The sounds and sights bombard us with a jackhammer frenzy, and
try as we
might, we cannot stop ourselves from the urge to duck our heads. The
blood and guts are
terrifying, but not as terrifying as the reactions of these soldiers --
some of whom we saw in detailed close-up just before the invasion -- to
the surrounding carnage. What would you do if one moment, you were
talking to the guy next to you, and the next moment, his head looked
like an exploded watermelon?
Tom Hanks is introduced in this opening sequence as Captain John Miller,
whose ability to
lead under the toughest of circumstances is put to the test as he and
his men storm the
German opposition's bunkers. After the threat is neutralized and the
battle won, Miller
receives new orders from higher-ups on the military chain: to find and
retrieve a Private
James F. Ryan. The reason? Three of the four Ryan brothers have been
killed within the
past week, and the U.S. government will be damned if it will let another
death notice be sent to their mother. Seven additional men are assembled
to help carry out the mission, including The Brothers McMullen's Edward
Burns and Heat's Tom Sizemore. Giovanni Ribisi does an effective turn as
the crew's medic, as does Barry Pepper as their crucifix-kissing,
cool-headed marksman. Adam Goldberg and Vin Deisel (actor/director of
1997's Sundance entry Strays) make their own memorable contributions to
the company. The odd-man-out of the bunch is Jeremy Davies' (Twister)
Corporal Upham, whose inexperience in combat is reluctantly ignored by
Miller because of his fluency in German. As the film progresses, the
uninitiated Upham comes to represent the lost innocence of his fellow
soldiers, and by the end, we know how the others got to be the way they
are.
Many war movies have suffered from fundamental flaws in
characterization. The soldiers are usually drawn in two ways: as
vengeful, heroic adventurers or as weeping boys who are so scared all
the time you'd wonder how the hell they made it through boot camp let
alone through a single battle. The soldiers in Saving Private Ryan are
presented as real people whose anger and fear can constantly be seen
lurking just below the surface, even as they perform such heroic acts as
throwing bombs at a tank or firing on the enemy from the safety of a
bell tower. Anger, fear, and even relief drive the eight travelers to do
what they do. They are boys, yes, but the horror of war has clearly
hardened the skin on the outside. Only in the dead of night, when they
are in the safety of darkness and seclusion, do the soldiers' pent-up
longings for home come through.
The search for Private Ryan moves the story along as Miller and his men
traverse the
French landscape. Janusz Kaminsky's beautiful but inobtrusive camera
work is
showcased throughout their harrowing journey. Several shots illustrate
how unfortunate it
was that the American soldiers had to experience the grandeur of rural
France with a rifle
rather than a camera on their shoulders. Even the images of bombed-out
towns suggest the beauty which was once there.
Spielberg remains for the most part invisible in the film, but even in
the few moments when
his touch is apparent, it does not push the audience away. Take for
example, a sequence
where an approaching line of German tanks approaches heard but not seen.
The effect is
just as canny as the approaching T. Rex in Jurassic Park, and even more
scary. And the
tour de force action climax shows that his training as conductor of
films like Raiders of the
Lost Ark and Jaws has been put to good use. Everything Spielberg has
learned and
perfected over his 25+ year career as a professional filmmaker has
culminated in this, one
of the most viscerally engaging movies ever made.
The script, a truth-inspired work of fiction by Robert Rodat, is
well-paced and logically
sequenced. There are no clear resolutions or fully-bared souls, a fact
which may frustrate
audiences at first. One must realize that Hollywood has accustomed us to
distinct
morals--solutions real life are never so pat. When Miller and his boys
find the lost private
and don't get what they expect, they don't flip out or get angry.
Rather, they are
understanding, and the reason for their understanding is subtly revealed
in their subsequent
interactions with Ryan. Audiences may at first be put off by the
blandness of Private Ryan's character, but the film's finale drives home
the point that it does not matter that his character was so thinly
portrayed. The point is that he was a man, and that his life was just as
important as all those around him.
The emotions in the film are neither forced nor manipulated. There is
one wrenching
moment halfway through the film where the usually opaque Captain Miller
steals away and
sobs. It is an easy thing to make a filmgoer feel the pain of a gunshot.
It is not quite so easy to make someone empathize with a soldier's
dismay at the realization of what kind of
person he has become. Saving Private Ryan succeeds at both of these. It
is a testament to
Ryan's power that, even days after watching it, the film continues to
haunt. Who will ever be able to forget the image of a disoriented
soldier stooping down to pick up and carry away his severed arm? Think
of it: images like these have haunted WWII veterans for the last 53
years.
Reviewed July 24, 1998 at Loews White Marsh Theater, White Marsh, MD.

Author
Bob Bloom
Saving Private Ryan (1998) 4 stars out of 4
 Saving Private Ryan is a brilliant, savage piece of filmmaking, a soaring
paean to the courage of man - as individual and as family.
 And director Steven Spielberg, with the aid of cinematographer Janusz
Kaminski and film editor Michael Kahn, has created the most intense,
riveting 30 minutes of combat footage in the history of cinema.
 Silence, except for the fluttering of a pale, ghostlike flag, greets you
at the outset of this marvelous movie. The prologue follows a World War II
veteran as he shuffles through the allied cemetery at Omaha Beach in
Normandy.
 The movie then flashes back to D-Day, June 6, 1944. And here the
audience's senses and emotions are bombarded with the sights and sounds of
war.
 A chaotic choreography of carnage is what Spielberg and his team have
thrown at us. Kaminski's hand-held camera darts through the death and
destruction, capturing moments of terror, confusion, fright and most of all
blood.
 It's everywhere. Death comes unexpectedly, swiftly, randomly. Spielberg
spares none of the horror that was D-Day.
 The documentary-style footage will make you wince and perhaps turn away.
These battle scenes are stomach-churning in their realism. And the film's
main story has not yet begun.
 As the GIs earn a toehold on the beach and methodically begin decimating
the German bunkers, Kaminski's camera slowly pans back down the beach,
lingering on a dead GI named Ryan.
 It is that image that propels the plotline of Saving Private Ryan. The
dead Ryan was one of three brothers killed.
 A fourth brother, a paratrooper who was dropped into France the night
before the invasion, is believed to still be alive somewhere behind enemy
lines.
 The big brass in Washington, with equal parts of mercy and attempts to
avoid a PR disaster, order that this fourth brother, James Francis Ryan, be
found and returned stateside.
 Ranger Capt. John Miller (Tom Hanks), who survived the D-Day invasion with
only a few of his men, draws the assignment of finding this needle in a
very huge haystack.
 Spielberg deftly establishes the moral dilemma faced by Miller and his
squad. Why is this Ryan so special? Why does his right to go home outweigh
anyone else's? How does finding him aid the war effort? Is it worth risking
and possibly sacrificing the lives of others just to find one man?
 As the film progresses, these questions are answered.
 Saving Private Ryan is not your gung-ho, John Wayne-Randolph Scott war
movie. These GIs' main focus is not defeating the enemy so much as staying
alive and returning home. If finding Ryan will achieve that goal quicker,
then so be it.
 The men in Miller's squad do what GIs have done since the beginning of
warfare. They gripe, second-guess their superiors and insult each other.
Yet, when thrown into battle, they are a unit, protecting their
brother-in-arms.
 Hanks gives a sterling performance as Miller. He is low-key, a bit
mysterious (his squad has created a continually growing pool trying to
guess what the captain does in civilian life) and very much frightened.
 Despite his fears - his hand continually shakes - and his doubts about
their mission, Miller leads his men on, at times either cajoling, bullying
or sweet-talking them forward. Hanks ably embodies the Everyman-ordinary of
warfare. He is no professional soldier.
 Miller and his men eventually find Ryan, portrayed by Matt Damon as a
sturdy and willful young soldier.
 Among the other cast members, Tom Sizemore is wise, tough and
compassionate as Sgt. Horvath, Miller's second-in-command. Jeremy Davies as
Cpl. Upham, the translator drafted by Miller to leave the safe confines of
the now-secure beach and possibly come face-to-face with the enemy,
represents us, the audience. He is constantly scared, recoiling at every
sound, avoiding combat at any cost.
 Saving Private Ryan is a magnificent achievement. It shows Spielberg as a
more mature filmmaker, a man willing to gamble. How else do you explain why
he uses what could be the grand finale of any other film as the opening
gambit to cast the audience into the story and its characters?
 This is not a movie for the squeamish. Spielberg refuses to compromise.
Death is not pretty. With an unblinking eye, the director shows the misery,
the horror, the tragedy and the human toll of war.
 But the movie's magic is that, while it does not glorify war, it glorifies
its reluctant warriors, not because they are heroic, but because they
trudge on and do their duty, overcoming their fears and own instincts for
survival.
 Saving Private Ryan is an unrelenting, emotional experience that deserves
its "R" rating. Yet it's a movie that young adults should see with their
grandfathers who served in World War II to better comprehend and understand
their sacrifices.
 In Act IV, Scene III of Henry V, Shakespeare had King Henry deliver a
speech to rouse his troops. Part of it went like this:
 He that outlives this day and comes safe home
 Will stand a-tiptoe when this day is named ...
 And gentlemen ... now abed
 Shall think themselves accursed they were not here,
 And hold their manhoods cheap ...
 There is no comparison between the battle of Agincourt and the beaches of
Normandy. But that special bond that is forged and exists between men who
have walked through the gates of hell and returned, must be timeless and
universal.
 And that is the majesty and power of Saving Private Ryan, for it has
captured that camaraderie and shown it to us in all its horrifying
brutality and spiritual splendor.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies, Matt Damon,
Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel. Screenplay:
Robert Rodat.
Producers: Steven Spielberg, Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon & Gary Levinsohn.
Director: Steven Spielberg.
This true to war epic must be seen by every generation, to remind us why
we must settle our differences diplomatically, without resorting to
violence. Steven Spielberg once again amazes us with his ability to tell
a story, this time, without manipulating the viewer's emotions. This
movie attempts to explore the soldier's personal, emotional and physical
conflicts in battle, when conscience is constantly being checked by the
questionable acts of war. War has a tendency to blur the fine line
between what is considered right and wrong, mixing black and white into
an awful looking grey. The haunting images of men been slaughtered on
Omaha beach, will not only leave one shell shocked, but it will linger
in your memory for many years to come. There will probably never be
another movie that makes a more poignant point about the value of human
life  even if it is for one man  Private Ryan. This is a movie about
ultimate sacrifice, with no greater love than when one man, or should I
say several men, lay down their life for their brother.

Author
Rob Strong
Starring:  Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Matt Damon,
Vin Diesel, Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Jeremy Davies, Giovanni
Ribisi, Ted Danson, Harve Presnell, Paul Giamatti
        Director Steven Spielberg is one of the most successful men in
Hollywood.  His name is one of the most recognizable and his films are
some of the best known in history.  Jurassic Park, E.T., Raiders of
the Lost Ark, Jaws: all were done by him.  However, while most of
Spielbergs films are for mass entertainment, he also has shown the
ablility to make dramatic, moving films that are extremely powerful.
The two that spring immediately to mind are 1993s Schindlers List,
a story of the Holocaust, and 1997s Amistad, a tale of the horrors
of slavery.  Now, to this list we must add his latest effort, the
World War II epic, Saving Private Ryan.
        I hesitate to use the word masterpiece when describing a
film, because there are few movies that have been made that can
deservedly wear the title.  Saving Private Ryan is most definitely one
of those.  The film combines outstanding performances, excellent
direction, smart dialogue, and wonderful photography, locations, and
costumes and gives you an unforgettable two hours and forty-five
minutes.  When you emerge from the theater, you will be changed.  This
film hits you in the head, heart, and gut.  Weeks after you see it,
you will still be able to vividly recall scenes from the movie.
        The opening shot of this film is an American flag, fluttering
softly in the breeze.  Then we learn where the flag is.  It is flying
over the cemetery above Omaha Beach in Normandy, France.  For those of
you who are woefully uneducated, Omaha Beach was the scene of terrible
carnage on June 6, 1944 when Allied soldiers invaded in an attempt to
get through Hitlers Atlantic Wall.  We see an old man walking
through the cemetery.  Then, when he locates the grave hes looking
for, he falls to his knees and begins weeping.  From this point until
the end, when the last five minutes comes back to the present day in
the cemetery and we learn the old mans identity, the story takes
place during World War II.
        The next shots are of the beach and its foreboding defenses,
just minutes before landing.  Next, landing craft are seen, filled
with soldiers, speeding through the rough waters toward the beach.
Men become seasick and throw up.  Then, a pair of shaking hands are
seen as they screw the lid off a canteen.  The owner of the hands
takes a drink, and thus is introduced Captain John Miller, superbly
played by Tom Hanks, who should win another Best Actor Oscar. (This
film also deserves consideration for Best Picture, Best Director, Best
Supporting Actor, Best Orginal Dramatic Score, Best Costumes, and Best
Original Screenplay) Miller is the most intriguing character in the
movie.  As captain, he must put forth utmost confidence and never
waver or falter.  But, there are signs that he is slowly losing
control.  His hands shake uncontrolably at random, his eyes are those
of a person who has seen too much, and in one scene, he looks around
to make sure no one is watching and breaks down crying.  Also, there
is a very nice technique used by Spielberg, where all sound is reduced
to a dull roar and men seem to move in slow motion as Miller looks
bewilderedly around.  Clearly, the war is getting to him.
        He and his right hand man and best friend, Sergeant Michael
Horvath (Tom Sizemore), issue last minute instructions to the troops.
Then, as the saying goes, all hell breaks loose.  The ramps on the
landing craft go down and the men stumble forward into a barrage of
German machine gun fire.  The first five rows of men in the boats are
killed before they can get more than a step or two.  Soldiers dive
over the side of the boat, but their luck is no better.  Weighed down
by sixty pounds of equipment, many drown or are shot underwater.
Spielberg uses point of view shots in this scene to great effect.  He
lets you see from the German machine gunners point of view to let you
know that they could see exactly who they were shooting at.  The
Americans, by contrast, could only see concrete bunkers and sandbag
piles.  Spielberg also lets us see the American point of view.  These
shots are nothing less than brilliant.  The camera is used to make it
feel like you are a soldier scrambling up the beach.  It dips in the
water and rises out, shakes and whirls to give the effect of a man
stumbling and looking about.  This scene, which is thiry minutes of
pure carnage, has been called the most realistic battle scene ever
filmed.  While I cant say this if thats true, having never been in
combat myself, I can say this: Id be greatly shocked if it wasnt.
This isnt the battle scenes of the old John Wayne war movies.
Spielberg pulls no punches in his depiction of combat in this, or any
other battle scene.  Men are blown in half, blown into bits, arms are
shot off, legs are blown away, people burn alive, men are disemboweled
and decapitated.  They lie on the beach and scream and cry, and beg
for their mothers.  The incoming tide is turned deep red with blood.
It must be noted that this isnt horror movie gore.  Spielberg is
never exploitive in his depiction; he is simply honest.  Adjectives
flow from my mind in an attempt to describe this scene, and indeed the
rest of the movie.  Brutal, savage, visceral, raw, powerful,
unforgettable, amazing, and dramatic all come to mind.  Finally, after
what seems an eternity, Miller and the other men clear the beach and
gain a foothold.  The scene ends as it began, with Miller taking a
drink from his canteen. Quite a view, Sgt.  Horvath remarks.
Yes, it is, replies Miller as he looks down at the beach with
bodies strewn everywhere.
        We are then taken to a Washington office where a legion of
secretaries work at typing up the telegrams that will be used to
notify the families of the men killed in action.  Something is soon
discovered.  Three men, Pvts. Sean, Peter, and Daniel Ryan were all
killed in action within a week of each other.  That doesnt mean much
until you realize that the men are brothers.  To add to that, their
mother will be receving all three telegrams on the same day.  Also,
there is a fourth brother, Private James Ryan.  He was part of the
paratrooper force that parachuted in behind German lines the night
before D-Day.  His status and location are unknown.  He could be
alive, he could be dead.  All of this news quickly goes up through the
ranks, until it reaches the ears of Chief of Staff George C. Marshall.
General Marshall (Harve Presnell), has a letter written from Abraham
Lincoln to a Mrs. Bixby in Boston.  Mrs. Bixby lost all five of her
sons in the service of the Union Army in the Civil War.  When Marshall
hears the news, there is no question in his mind as to what must be
done.  He orders a squad of men to go into enemy territory and track
down Pvt. Ryan and bring him back home. Some of his advisors argue
against this, saying that James is most likely dead, and anyone sent
into enemy territory to find him, will probably die too.  Marshall,
remains adamant however.  We gain a sense that he has a noble,
detached view of war.  The viewers, having just witnessed the hellish
inferno that is war, know better.  Incidentally, the scene where
Mrs. Ryan receives the notification of her sons death is staged
without a bit of dialogue, but still works brilliantly.  We see her
watch with trepidation as the Army car pulls up her driveway, and
then, when a chaplin and an officer get out, she collapes in front of
them on her porch.
        Back to Normandy.  Miller reports to his superior officer
about a recent assignment he was given.  We see him gaze enviously at
the hot water for shaving, real food, and hot coffee the men behind
the lines have.  After taking his report, the superior officer hands
Miller another assignment.  It is, of course, to go save Private Ryan.
In addition to Miller and Sergeant Horvath, the squad also consists of
a cynical New Yorker, Pvt. Reiben (Edward Burns), the Jewish Private
Mellish (Adam Goldberg), the Italian Pvt. Caparzo (Vin Diesel), the
Bible quoting Southern sniper, Pvt. Jackson (Barry Pepper), and the
medic, Wade (Giovanni Ribisi).  Also along is an interpreter, who is
the second most intriguing character in the film, Corporal Upham,
wonderfully portrayed by Jeremy Davies.  Upham has never seen combat,
in fact, he hasnt even held a rifle since basic t raining.  He is
along because he speaks fluent French and German.  He is a awkward
man, somewhat nerdy, who is kept out of combat.  All of these
supporting cast members are fleshed out to some degree at least.
Spielberg deserves a lot of credit for this.  Never does he allow his
characters to become the cardboard cutout squad members of the old
fashioned war movies.  Each in given at least one character
development moment.  Some of these are dramatic, such as when Mellish
takes a Hilter Youth knife from a dead Nazi and weeps over it, or when
Wade mournfully reminisces about his mother.  Others are comedic, such
as Reibens recounting of an experience while working in his
mothers dress shop. That is a particular strentgh of Robert Rodats
script.  The battle scenes are so overwhelming and devastating, they
could make the entire movie too much to watch.  Rodat sprinkles in
touches of humor to lighten up the mood, to keep it from becoming too
dark.  Something else Spielberg should be commended for, is that he
resists the temptation to bludgeon you with Dramatic Moments--he lets
scenes speak for themselves.
        The men trek across the French countryside while debating how
little sense the mission makes.  It risks the eight of them, just to
save one man.  Particularly oustpoken against the mission is Private
Reiben.  When Jackson remarks about Ryans mother, Reiben replies,
Hey, I got a mother.  I mean, you got a mother, Sarge has a mother.
Shoot, I bet even the Captain has a mother--okay, maybe not the
captain, but the rest of us got mothers. This comment is
significant.  We learn that Miller is a highly secretive man, who
doesnt tell anyone what he did or where he lived before the war.  In
fact, the men have a pool going on it.  The first to find out wins 300
dollars.
        Millers men journey from one dangerous situation to another
in their quest.  They travel from a devastated village, to a field
hospital, to a German radar installation, and finally to a climactic
defense of a strategic bridge.  The unit slowly begins to be killed
off.  Each surviving man becomes more and more resentful of Ryan as
their friends die.  Theyre fighting and dying to save a man they
know nothing at all about.  At one point, Miller remarks, This Ryan
better be worth it.  He better go home and cure some disease or invent
a longer lasting lightbulb. By the time Ryan is found, two hours
into the movie, he has become a symbol to the men.  As Rosebud was a
symbol of innocence lost in Citizen Kane, Private Ryan is a symbol to
the men of how little sense anything seems to make anymore, a symbol
of the futility of war.
        When Private Ryan (Matt Damon) is found, he is not eager 
to go home.  Not at all.  In fact, he refuses to.  It doesnt make 
any sense.....why do I deserve to go? he wonders out loud.  Damon 
does an effective job of conveying the confusion and bewilderment 
of a man who doesnt understand why he is so special; why men have
fought and died just to rescue him.
        When it comes down to it, Saving Private Ryan is simply awe
inspiring.  Its the little touches that make it all come together, 
though.  John Williams outstanding score, which underscores without 
intruding, to Janusz Kaminskis wonderful, drained out cinematography 
that gives it a newsreel like quality, to Corporal Uphams terrified
bewilderment at the conflict all around him, and Reibens wordless 
glance at Ryan in which he forgives all.  There are scenes that 
uplift, and scenes that tear your heart out. 
        The best scene in the movie, I think, is when Miller elects 
to let a captured Nazi go, rather than execute him.   Near mutiny 
breaks out, but Miller is able to diffuse the situation in the most 
surprising way possible.  During his speech, which is the best in the
film, he remarks I dont know anything about Ryan.  But if finding 
him earns me the right to go home to my wife--then thats my
 mission.......just know that every man I kill, the farther away 
from home I feel.  Later in the movie,  Sergeant Horvath 
says, Maybe someday well look back and realize that saving 
Private Ryan was the one decent thing we were able to pull out 
of this whole godawful mess.  Those are two of the key lines in the
film.  When you walk out of the theater, the realization hits you 
that it wasnt just Private Ryan that Captain Miller and his men 
were fighting to save.  They were also fighting to save
themselves.

Author
Marty Mapes
**** (out of 4) The first 20 minutes of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN had been so
hyped that I wondered if anyone had questioned whether it fit with the rest
of the movie. I knew it would be amazing, but I wondered if it would be
gratuitous, Spielberg's way of showing off his technical skill, a little
treat before the rest of the movie got underway.... 
The sequence is rightly praised for it's grim depiction of the chaos and
casualties of the invasion of Normandy. Spielberg's approach is to portray
the confusion and violence of battle on a personal, not a tactical, level.
There are no establishing shots or god's-eye views of the beach. We never
know how the battle is being played out because the hand held camera has a
personal point of view, following only a handful of the film's main characters. 
In a sense, the first sequence IS gratuitous, and Spielberg most certainly
is showing off. The sequence is full of small details that must have been
extremely difficult to set up. For each soldier the camera watches die, it
seems two others are killed in the corners of the screen. Yet this whole
sequence has little to do with the plot of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN. If it were
cut, the story could be summarized in the same way. 
But the film's plot is not what the film is about. It is merely a thread
that ties together the patches that make up the rest of the film. SAVING
PRIVATE RYAN is really a tour of the life of American soldiers in Europe.
There are distinct vignettes in the film, each one showing a small part of
the big picture. In that sense, the taking of Normandy is an important part
of the tour, and therefore, its depiction is not gratuitous. 
The plot is that Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) must find and return
Private James Ryan (Matt Damon) to the States. Ryan's three brothers died in
combat and his mother received the news of all three deaths on the same day.
A general back in Washington, feeling sympathy for the mother and possibly
seeing an opportunity for some good P.R., ordered that James Ryan must be
saved. 
But as I said, the film is not about its plot. It is about the war in
Europe, and more deeply, about the value of human life. The film follows
Miller from his landing at Normandy to the fields of northern France. From
the rainy town threatened by a sniper to the wreck of an American plane.
>From an isolated nest of German machine-gunners to the rubble-strewn bridge
in need of defending. 
In each episode, Spielberg finds a way to explore the value of human life. 
At Normandy, one soldier suggests that they hide behind the defenses on the
beach, because advancing costs so many lives. Miller points out that if they
don't advance, even more soldiers will die and it will have been for
nothing. By advancing, their lives buy two things: precious ground against
the Germans and more meaning, a higher value, if you will, for the lives of
those already killed.  
When Miller and his seven men learn of their mission to save Ryan, they are
outraged at the thought that so many lives should be risked for the sake of
just one. Yet Ryan's life is worth so much more, at least to his mother,
because his three brothers have died. An exponential curve is at work,
making the last son's life worth more than the first three combined. 
At the site of the plane crash, we learn that 22 soldiers died because one
general wanted extra protection for himself. He ordered a steel plate to be
welded to the plane under his seat to protect him from flak. But the weight
of the steel made the plane fly "like a freight train," and the pilot was
forced to crash-land, killing and wounding dozens of soldiers in the process. 
While talking to his men one night, Miller recounts the number of lives lost
under his command. He believes there must be a formula, some factor by which
each lost life can be multiplied, whose product is the number of other lives
saved. Losing 96 men must mean that at least 960 other lives were saved.
True or not, it is one way Miller can assuage his guilt. 
In one of the film's most interesting dilemmas, a single German gunner
remains alive after a battle. Most of Miller's men want to kill the German,
slowly and painfully, but, as Upham (Jeremy Davies, in a very interesting
role) points out, that would be against the rules. They cannot take him
prisoner because he would hinder their mission, so Miller must weigh the
moral costs of killing an unarmed man against the possibility that, once
released, he might live to kill more U.S. soldiers, perhaps even Miller's
own men. 
The movie is very well made. That's not surprising considering the skill of
the director. Thankfully, this time Spielberg refrained from including his
sermon and his directorial signature. InAMISTAD, there were signs throughout
the movie that reminded you what a clever director Spielberg was. It was
downright distracting. In SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, there are no directorial
flourishes, just good filmmaking. 
During battle scenes, the camera is hand-held. The picture is jittery, but
not blurry. It's as though Spielberg and cinematographer Janusz Kaminski
used a camera with a very fast shutter speed, or else shot at double speed,
then used every other frame. I can't say what the intent of this was, but it
made the film feel sharper, edgier, less soft. 
The film also pays very close attention to sound, making us feel much closer
to the events on screen. As Miller prepares for the invasion of Normandy,
the landing boat's motors are clear and distinct. It's a detail that makes
the scene seem mundane and real, not heroic and romanticized. For a time the
camera goes underwater and the sound becomes more distant, more dreamlike,
but as soon as it breaks the surface, the nasty whizzing of bullets and
screams of dying men return. At two points in the movie, the sound takes the
point of view of Miller, mentally and aurally drifting away from the
battlefield, before coming back to insistent reality. 
Finally, the casting of Tom Hanks as Captain Miller was an extraordinary
stroke of genius. At first he seems unlikely to lead a pack of soldiers in a
war movie. He's too much the nice guy. His voice is a gentle tenor instead
of a cussing bass. And yet, that seems to be exactly the point that
Spielberg was making in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN: that World War II was fought by
normal, everyday men. There were gruff generals and posturing politicians,
but the men on the front lines were average Joes with wives, jobs, and rose
bushes back home. And that makes the violence of the battle scenes all the
more horrifying, the cost of 96 lives all the more painful. 
One final comment is worth making. I believe this film raises the level of
acceptable graphic violence in mainstream movies. Soldiers are disemboweled,
decapitated, and blown to bits on screen. Perhaps the most difficult scene
is a closeup of a German soldier slowly and gently stabbing a G.I. in the
heart. It is hard to imagine this film getting anything less than an X
rating as little as a decade ago, yet it got an R rating from the MPAA on
the first try. Spielberg handles the subject matter well. He deals with a
gruesome subject matter honestly and appropriately. One scene reminds us not
to treat death lightly, even when it is too widespread to be comprehended.
No scene glorifies the mass slaughter of enemy soldiers. Still, the standard
has been raised, and the next war movie will have to be even more gruesome
to make its point. 
Let us hope the next filmmaker will be as thoughtful, careful, and serious
as Spielberg.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Vin 
Diesel, Giovanni Ribisi, Jeremy Davies, Matt Damon, Ted Danson, Paul 
Giamatti, Dennis Farina. Written by Robert Rodat. Directed by Steven 
Spielberg. 168 minutes.
Rated R, 5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send your subscription 
requests to pbbp24a@prodigy.com
After a brief prologue, "Saving Private Ryan" goes straight into the 
battle scene to end all battle scenes, a 24 minute recreation of the D-
Day landing at Omaha Beach on June 6, 1944. The images are absolutely 
brutal, showing in explicit detail the massacre of countless soldiers as 
the Allied Forces storm the beach. "What the hell do we do now sir?" 
shouts one private, while others strip ammunition and weapons off dying 
comrades. One soldier scoops his severed arm off the sand, staggering on 
in a desperate attempt to keep up with his squad. As young bodies explode 
from enemy fire, the Allied Forces still somehow sweep forward, through 
the noise, confusion, and death all around them. Watching the unspeakable 
carnage, you wonder how any of the soldiers could possibly have survived 
the battle, let alone triumphed. 
That's just the beginning of one of the most powerful, visceral war 
movies ever made. Steven Spielberg's "Saving Private Ryan" is an 
experience that left me shaken and deeply moved. Even though the screen 
is filled with the faces of familiar actors, Spielberg makes it seem real,
 thrusting the viewer right into the center of the nightmarish action. 
Hand-held cameras create a quasi-documentary feel. Occasionally the sound 
fades out and the action shifts into slow motion, giving you the eerie 
sense of sharing the experience of a soldier in shock. The film is 
remarkably effective at creating a horrific "you-are-there" feel.
The brilliant "Apocalypse Now" used war as a vehicle for a surreal 
journey into the depths of insanity. The battlefields of "Platoon" served 
as the landscape for a morality play, with the forces of good and evil 
vying for the soul of a young soldier. "Saving Private Ryan" is about war,
 period. The film stays focused on what war does to the body and soul, as 
the men fight to stay alive, to accomplish their mission, and to somehow 
retain their humanity during a situation that screams for them to just be 
animals. 
Only after the staggering extended battle sequence does Spielberg 
introduce you to the characters and story. Still reeling from Omaha Beach,
 Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is given another assignment. Within days,
 three of the four Ryan brothers have been killed in action. The youngest,
 Private James Ryan (Matt Damon), is alive somewhere behind enemy lines. 
Miller is to take his squad to find and retrieve the soldier. 
The film accompanies the men on their harrowing search, as they 
increasingly question their mission. While they understand the reasoning 
behind the assignment, they also see the cold reality. In order to soften 
the terrible blow for Mother Ryan, the military is putting their eight 
lives at great risk. Is the compassionate gesture worth the potential 
body count?
As they travel, we see the dynamics of the squad. Captain Miller is a 
strong, down-to-earth, but cryptic leader. Even the men closest to him 
don't know what he does for a living in the civilian world. Private 
Reiben (Edward Burns) is an outspoken New Yorker who doesn't hide his 
resentment over the mission. Giovanni Ribisi plays Wade, the empathic, 
skilled medic, while Jeremy Davies is Corporal Upham, a timid young man 
"drafted" to replace the squad's slain interpreter. Having never 
experienced combat first-hand, Upham is the fish-out-of-water who serves 
as a sort-of representative for the audience.
It's a strong cast. Ribisi, who plays Phoebe's brother on "Friends," 
leaves a lasting impression as the dedicated medic, and Davies is also 
memorable, although the "Going All The Way" actor needs to widen the type 
of roles he plays, lest he find himself forever typecast as a skittish 
introvert. As Private Ryan, Matt Damon nicely fleshes out his character 
despite his relatively limited screen time. And the remarkable Tom Hanks 
delivers yet another outstanding performance, making Captain Miller a man 
instead of an icon. Don't be surprised if he gets another Best Actor 
nomination next spring.
Steven Spielberg films are often heavy-handed, but he displays great 
restraint here. The harrowing war scenes never feel like directoral 
grandstanding, and the sentimental moments are heart-wrenching without 
becoming drippy. Similarly, John Williams' haunting score beautifully 
accents the film, a welcome change after his overly manipulative turn in 
"Amistad." I suspect both men were tempted to lay things on a little 
thicker. Thank goodness they held themselves back from emotionally 
bullying the audience.
A crowning cinematic achievement, "Saving Private Ryan" doesn't 
romanticize or condemn World War II. It is far more effective by 
presenting war with simple, stark honesty. Spielberg told the Los Angeles 
Times that he made the film for the men who survived, as well as those 
who perished. "It is to honor them with the truth and to hopefully teach 
something," he said. "Audiences today go to the movies, and they are 
often thrilled by violence. This is intended to show the other side of 
what violence does to human beings." 

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        Film criticism may well be the Art of the Fool, the last refuge
of those who wish to be involved in the movie industry but lack the
talent or drive needed to actually create something.  How does the
expression go?  "Those who can, do; those who can't, criticize."
While this may be a bit harsh (and is certainly not true in every
case), I think it does have some basis in reality.
        I hope to get involved in the film business one day, though I
have not yet produced anything except some experimental footage that
I'd be reluctant to screen for any but my most non-critical friends.
I am still learning what makes a shot work, the effects that different
types of lighting can have, and the many ways in which a storyline can
be revealed to the audience (with "The Truman Show" being one of the
finest examples I've ever seen).  Film criticism, to me, is part of the
learning process.  By subjecting myself to as many films as possible,
then writing my comments while the film is still fresh in my mind, I
have learned a great deal about what makes a particular film "good" or
"bad," at least in my eyes.  I notice the frequency with which certain
cliches (such as "I have a BAD feeling about this" or "I'm sorry, I
was wrong.  Can you ever forgive me?") crop up in different movies.
Sharing these observations with all of you helps my film education,
just as it hopefully offers new insight for you, the reader, as well.
        But it's important to remember that no matter what credentials a
critic has, everything boils down in the end to one person's opinion.
Despite the fact that I personally adore "Star Wars" and consider it one
of this century's most incredible cinematic achievements, I know people
who hate it.  "Citizen Kane," the best movie ever made according to the
recent American Film Institute survey, is not universally adored.  (I
like and respect it, but I still think "Casablanca" is superior.)  My
favorite film critic, Roger Ebert, cited this year's "Dark City" as a
cinematic masterpiece, praising its visuals and sinister feel; I, on the
other hand, found the film mediocre at best and less than that much of
the time.
        The point is, there's no "right" or "wrong" in this field; all a
critic can do is explain why he or she thinks a film is or isn't worth
seeing.  As often as not, you'll disagree with the opinions they provide.
That's fine.  In my short time reviewing films on the Internet, I've
received a mountain of correspondence from people who have seen (or opted
not to see) films based on my recommendation, as well as those who saw a
film before reading my review and later dropped me a line to tell me how
much they did (or did not) agree with me.  It's flattering to know that
people can decide to go to a movie they had no intention of seeing, based
on your recommendation.  I enjoy reading the responses my reviews
generate, even the ones that dispute what I have to say.  Believe me,
there are plenty of them.
        Nothing I've written, however, has generated more feedback than
some offhand comments I made about Steven Spielberg's latest film,
"Saving Private Ryan."  After casually mentioning how disappointed I was
by the movie on both my favorite IRC chat room and a "general talk"
newsgroup, I was flooded by a number of intelligent, well-thought-out
rebuttals.  I debated the film's merits or lack thereof with several of
these filmgoers, and ignored the vulgar messages I received from a
half-dozen or so others which questioned my sanity and insulted my
heritage.  Clearly, people respond to this movie in a way almost without
precedent.   For these reasons, I specifically decided I would not
review the film.  When so many people disagree with me (and indeed,
I've yet to come across a single other person either on the internet or
in "real-life" who shares my opinion on the movie), then maybe it's
just me, you know?
        Ego intervened, however.  I've received three different e-mails
this week from readers asking for my opinion on the film.  "We haven't
seen it, because we want to know what you think about it first,"
explains one particularly kind letter.  So I've decided to compromise.
Rather than write a completely new review of the film, I'm going to
plunder the e-mails and posts I've already written about the movie,
cobbling together a Frankenstein-esque review from these many "parts."
As always, if people have comments or questions, I'm all ears.  If
people have insults and ridicule for my opinion, that's fine too; just
don't expect a response.  It's my greatest desire not to get into
another violent arguments over this movie.  Thanks.  --AJB
        In case you missed the point of "Schindler's List," Steven
Spielberg would like you to know that World War II was a bad thing.
His new movie, "Saving Private Ryan," is a shockingly violent yet
surprisingly boring drama which begins during the D-Day invasion of 1944
(giving the director the chance to throw blood and entrails in our face
for half an hour and call it "art") and ends with... well, pretty much
the same scene, except on a bridge rather than a beach.
        Tom Hanks plays Captain John Miller, the leader of a small troop
of American soldiers in the midst of this hell.  Miller has clearly
seen enough violence and destruction to last him the rest of his days;
his hands shake violently when he tries to do something as simple as
take a drink of water.  Isolation is his defense against his
environment-- so secretive is he about his private life that the troop
has a running bet: will the war end before Miller reveals any personal
details about himself to them?
        After surviving a nightmarish battle, Hanks and his soldiers
are given a new mission: to find a soldier named James Ryan and escort
him to safety.  The reason?  It appears that all three of his brothers
were killed in combat on the same day.  The army, figuring that poor
Mrs. Ryan deserves a consolation prize, decides to send the surviving
son home.  The problem is, no one is quite sure where Ryan is, so it's
up to Hanks and his crew to find the poor boy.  For much of the film,
they "search" for him by dashing up to random people and yelling
"Private James Ryan!  Do you know him?"
        The basic premise of the movie is laughably bad.  Raise your
hand if you think the army would feel sorry for a woman whose sons had
died in combat.  From the army's perspective, that's what they're there
for!  Would the military *really* risk the lives of a whole squadron of
people in an attempt to rescue a wayward son, especially when the movie
takes place in June of 1944?  From my rememberence of history, the war
wasn't going particularly well for the Allies at that time.  They'd
surely be making the best possible use of all their resources, not
assigning them to frivilous projects.
        The excuse used to justify the plot: the army thinks it will
be a great morale boost if Ryan can be found and sent home to his
mother.  Beg pardon?  Let me get this straight: you've got thousands
of American soldiers risking their lives in combat every day,
fighting on foreign soil.  They haven't seen their loved ones in
months, or even *years*.  All of a sudden, they learn that Private
James Ryan is going home.  That's supposed to inspire morale?  I'd
think it would inspire resentment and jealousy.  But no matter.
It's the plot of the movie, and we'll let it be.
        After our opening bloodbath, we watch our "heroes" (and I use
the term loosely, since we learn so little about these guys that it's
hard to feel anything at all for them) hike around the countryside and
shoot things for a couple of hours.  During this time, they talk at
great length about very little, tease the "new guy" mercilessly, and
hedge bets on where their captain is from.  These exchanges reek so
badly of cliche' that we immediately know: (1) the new guy will
eventually do something brave and daring, thereby earning the respect
of his peers, and (2) sooner or later, Miller will unveil his life
story to the troops, probably during a moment of great tension.
        As always, Tom Hanks's performance is spectacular.  He does
such a fine job with his role that it's possible not to noice how
poorly written his character is.  With his convincing facial gestures
and a world-weariness that seems beyond genuine, Hanks *becomes*
Captain Miller; the problem is, Captain Miller's not very interesting.
The tactic of keeping him aloof from the audience and his troops was
probably intended to make him seem mysterious.  It made me not like
him very much.  Why am I expected to bond with a character that I
know absolutely nothing about?
        Indeed, that's the biggest problem with the film: we're given
absolutely no reason to care about anything happening on the screen at
all.  The members of Miller's troop may as well be played by department-
store mannequins for all the emotion and depth they show.  From time
to time, someone dies.  Does it bother us?  Not once.  We've not been
given a reason to be.
        Also, on a semi-related note: have we become so desensitized
as a society that extreme violence is now funny?  You won't find
another movie with violence this realistic, but at the screening I
attended, the audience greeted much of this footage with giggles and
titters.  One soldier loses his arm and bends down to pick it up.
*audience snickers*  A soldier removes his helmet; immediately his
head explodes in a round of mortar fire, drenching his companions
with brains and bloody goo.  *audience giggles*  And the biggest offense:
Hanks and his men eventually find Private Ryan, after slogging their
way through enemy terrain, losing much of their party in the process.
But get this: it's the WRONG Private Ryan!  The audience shrieked with
delighted laughter at this scene.  I sat in stunned silence.  'Yeah,
that's really funny.  These guys have fought hard for their cause,
shed plenty of blood, seen some of their companions killed... and why?
Because the tip they had on Ryan's whereabouts was wrong!  Boy,
that's a knee-slapper.'  But the audience continued to hoot in utter
delight, as though it were the best practical joke they'd ever seen.
Never have I wanted to slap so many people.
        Spielberg opted to shoot much of the film with hand-held
cameras to capture a documentary/in-the-field look; as such, the
picture shakes badly during many scenes (imagine watching a "movie"
shot by a four-year-old with a camcorder).  I got a splitting headache
while trying to follow the action, and that's the honest truth.  Tripod,
Steven.  You know you want one.
        Let's go back to the film's beginning again.  The story opens
with 30 minutes of nonstop carnage.  That in and of itself is not a
problem, but during these scenes nothing that is relevant to the plot
happens, certainly nothing that requires this much screen time.  We
learn nothing about the characters.  Just because I recognize the
wonderful actor Tom Hanks in the lead role does mean that I will
automatically care what happens to the person he is playing if I
haven't been given any kind of emotional hook into his psyche.
Spielberg spent an awful lot of money on these scenes, but it's a lot
of footage that seems to have no point other than conveying the horrors
of warfare.  I already know that war is a bad thing, and the fact that
the film rubs our nose in it for so long detracts from the pace of the
story.  We don't even learn what the movie is about until we're nearly
an hour into it.  Spielberg seems so in love with the grotesqueness of
these shots that he forgets to include a petty item like "story."
        Contrast this with Spielberg's other WW2 film, the equally
long "Schindler's List" (one of my favorite movies, EVER).  All of
the characters, including the villains, had depth to them.  We felt
the turmoil Oskar Schindler went through.  We saw how his attitude
changed and grew over the course of the movie, and we understood the
decisions he made.  I didn't get any of that from the characters in
"Saving Private Ryan."  No one really changes emotionally, and I've
got to believe that warfare, especially warfare THAT graphic, will
have psychological effects on people.  Apart from Miller's shaking
hands, no one seemed the least bit off-balance.  They're made of
sterner stuff than I.
        In a nutshell: I didn't like Spielberg's approach.  It's
almost as if the movie is saying "Look!  I am showing lots and lots
of very realistic warfare.  Therefore, I am a GREAT FILM.  You will
TAKE ME SERIOUSLY.  You will CRY WHEN I TELL YOU TO.  YOU MUST LIKE
ME!"  Many are calling the film "brilliant"; I'm calling it "the
Emporer's new clothes."  So many critics are raving about the movie
that the majority of cinemagoers are being brainwashed into thinking
it's far better than it really is.
        "Saving Private Ryan" tries much too hard; "Schindler's List,"
apart from the final cemetary scene, played upon your emotions very
subtly.  You never realised just how much you cared about Oskar, but
when the ending rolls around you're blinking back tears.  "Saving
Private Ryan," on the other hand, seems like it was conceived from
the outset as a GREAT FILM.  There's no restraint; everything is so
in-your-face that I frequently found myself closing my eyes-- not to
shut out the visuals, but to simply distance myself from the movie,
which seemed to want to climb into my lap.
        Many will say that's the point: Spielberg is trying to thrust
the horrors of war upon us.  I don't know.  I found myself caring about
good ol' Forrest Gump's war buddies a lot more than these guys, partly
because they (especially Bubba and Lt. Dan) were so well-developed.
When a character dies in "Ryan," I simply shrugged-- just another
"nobody."  I never got the feeling that they (apart from Hanks, near
the end) had anyone back home praying for their safe return.
        When I complained about the film's lack of subtlety on a news-
group, one of the film's many admirers chimed back with, "Does anyone
remember any subtlety in World War II?  Neither do I."  Touche'.  But
you know, I don't recall World War II being billed as entertainment.
        Unfortunately, I can't think of a single reason to recommend
this film, and considering the name of the director, whose work I
usually enjoy, that's surprising.  The characters are uninteresting,
the photography is difficult to watch, the music is generic, the pace
is nonexistant.  It's a shame, but I guess Spielberg needs his failures
to make his triumphs that more powerful.  Forget about "Saving Private
Ryan," friends.  Save your money instead.
This review was written in spurts from July 25, 1998 to August 14, 1998.
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        

Author
Michael Turton
Saving Private Ryan Produced by Mutual Film Company / Mark Gordon Productions
/ DreamWorks SKG / Amblin Entertainment / Paramount Pictures. Directed by
Steven Spielberg. Starring Tom Hanks (Captain Miller), Edward Burns (Private
Reiben), Tom Sizemore Sergeant Horvath),  Barry Pepper (Private Jackson) Vin
Diesel (Private Caparzo), Adam Goldberg (Private Mellish), Giovanni Ribisi
(Private Jackson), Jeremy Davies (Corporal Upham), and Matt Damon (Private
Ryan).        Runtime: 170.  Reviewed by Michael Turton.  ** out of *****.
Weighed down by tired plot lines and Spielberg's reliance on formulas,
_Saving Private Ryan_ is  a mediocre film which nods in the direction of
realism before descending into an abyss of cliches.
There ought to be a law against Steven Spielberg making movies about truly
serious topics.  Spielberg's greatest strength as a director is the polished,
formulaic way in which every aspect of the film falls carefully into place to
make a perfect story.  But for a topic of such weight as combat in the second
world war (or the Holocaust) this technique backfires, for it creates
coherent, comprehensible and redemptive narratives out of events whose size,
complexity and evil are utterly beyond the reach of human ken.        In this way
Spielberg trivializes the awesome evil of the stories he films.
_Saving Private Ryan_ tells the story of eight men who have been detailed on
a "PR mission" to pull a young man, Ryan (whose three other brothers were
just killed in fighting elsewhere) out of combat on the Normandy front just
after D-Day.  Ryan is a paratrooper who dropped behind enemy lines the night
before the landings and became separated from his fellow soldiers.  The
search for him takes the eight soldiers across the hellish terrain of World
War II combat in France.
There's no denying Spielberg came within shouting distance of making a great
war movie.  The equipment, uniforms and weapons are superbly done.  The
opening sequence, in which Captain Miller (Tom Hanks) leads his men onto
Omaha Beach, is quite possibly the closest anyone has come to actually
capturing the unendurably savage intensity of modern infantry combat. 
Another pleasing aspect of the film is Spielberg's brave depiction of scenes
largely unknown to American audiences, such as the shooting of prisoners by
Allied soldiers, the banality of death in combat, the routine foul-ups in the
execution of the war, and the cynicism of the troops.  The technical side of
the film is peerless, as always.  The camera work is magnificent, the pacing
perfect, the sets convincing, the directing without flaw.  Hanks will no
doubt be nominated for an Oscar for his performance, which was utterly
convincing, and the supporting cast was excellent, though Ted Danson seems a
mite out of place as a paratroop colonel.
Yet the attempt at a realistic depiction of combat falls flat on its face
because realism is not something which can be represented  by single
instances or events.  It has to thoroughly permeate the context at every
level of the film, or the story fails to convince. Throughout the movie
Spielberg repeatedly showed only single examples of the grotesque wounds
produced by modern mechanized devices (exception: men are shown burning to
death with relative frequency).  For example, we see only one man with guts
spilled out on the ground.  Here and there men lose limbs; in one scene
Miller is pulling a man to safety, there's an explosion, and Miller looks
back to see he is only pulling half a man.  But the rest of the corpses are
remarkably intact.  There are no shoes with only feet in them, no limbs
scattered everywhere, no torsos without limbs, no charred corpses, and most
importantly, all corpses have heads (in fairness there are a smattering of
wicked head wounds).  The relentless dehumanization of the war, in which even
corpses failed to retain any indentity, is soft-pedaled in the film. 
Ultimately, _Saving Private Ryan_ bows to both Hollywood convention and the
unwritten rules of wartime photography in its portrayal of wounds and death
in war.  Rather than saying _Saving Private Ryan_ is "realistic," it would be
better to describe it as "having realistic moments."
Another aspect of the "Hollywoodization" of the war is the lack of realistic
dialogue and in particular, the lack of swearing.  Anyone familiar with the
literature on the behavior of the men during the war, such as Fussell's
superb _Wartime: Understanding and Behavior in the Second World War_ (which
has an extensive discussion on swearing), knows that the troops swore
fluently and without letup.  "Who is this Private Ryan that we have to die
for him?" asks one infantrymen in the group of eight.  Rendered in wartime
demotic, that should have been expressed as "Who is this little pecker that
we have to get our dicks shot off for him?" or some variant thereof. 
Conversations should have been literally sprinkled with the "F" word, and
largely about (the search for) food and sex.  This is all the more
inexplicable because the movie already had an "R" rating due to violence, so
swearing could not possibly have been eliminated to make it a family film.
However, the most troubling aspect of the film is the Spielbergization of the
topic.        The most intense hell humans have ever created for themselves is not
emotionally wrenching enough for Steven Spielberg.  He cannot just cede
control to the material; he has to be bigger than it.  As if afraid to let
the viewer find their own (perhaps unsettled and not entirely clear)
emotional foothold in the material, Spielberg has to package it in Hallmark
moments to give the war a meaning and coherence it never had: the opening and
closing scenes of Ryan and his family in the war cemetary (reminscent of the
closing scene from _Schindler's List), the saccharine exchange between Ryan
and his wife at the close (every bit as bad as Schindler's monologue about
how his car, tiepin or ring could have saved another Jew), quotes from
Abraham Lincoln and Emerson, Captain Miller's last words to Private Ryan, and
an unbelievable storyline in which a prisoner whom they free earlier in the
movie comes back to kill the Captain.  That particular subplot is so hokey,
so predictable, it nigh on ruins the film.
Nowhere in the film is there a resolute depiction of the meaninglessness,
stupidity and  waste which characterized the experience of war to the men who
actually fought in combat (imagine if Miller had been killed by friendly fire
or collateral damage).        Because of its failure to mine deeply into the
terrible realities of World War II, _Saving Private Ryan_ can only pan for
small truths in the shallows.  2 stars out of 5.
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Joy Wyse
If you like war movies, this is probably the best one that you'll ever
see.  To say that it starts off with a bang would be putting it mildly.  
>From the very beginning of the film you are part of it.  As the troops are
preparing to invade the beaches of Normandy on D-Day, June 6th, you can
feel the thoughts going on in the minds of each and every soldier.
As the LCVPs pull onto the sand and drop the ramps, the men  become
sitting ducks as a barrage of bullets and heavy artillery rake across
them.  In the audience, you find it difficult to see clearly, or to hear
what is being said, much the same as it was for them.  You get quick
glimpses of carnage and blood, but you [the soldier] are driven by
self-preservation.  If you would stop to help a buddy, neither of you
would survive.  It was every man for himself.  But, you had to follow
orders.
Tom Hanks is the star of the film, but most of the other central roles are
played by lesser known [although experienced] actors.  This makes it even
more believable that they are real army.  There are cameos that pop up,
such as Harve Presnell, Ted Danson, and Dennis Farina, but that's all they
are....cameos.
It's a long movie, but you hardly realize it.  I'm one of those people who
was living during W.W.II.  My husband served in the Navy  while he was
only in his teens.  He was one of four brothers who were each in different
theaters of action.  Once or twice he happened upon one of them in some
unknown country.  Unlike Private Ryan, my husband was fortunate enough
that he and all of his brothers came home alive, and unharmed.
Even though I was aware of the war and the D-Day invasion, I have never
felt it so graphically as I did in this film.  The  violence that is shown
in this movie is, by far, more believable and real that anything you've
ever seen before.  It just affects you in a way that can't be explained. 
I dare anyone to watch this and not cry.
They say that our children learn from what they see in movies and on
television.  Just like Schindler's List, Saving Private Ryan is a must-see
film.  Maybe it could help stop the violence in the world today.
I did notice one blooper  in the film.  The squad goes from being 8 to 7
to 8 to 7 again.  Watch for it.  But, it doesn't stop me from giving this
an A.  It's by far the best film of the year.  I want to see it again.

Author
Michael Dequina
Saving Private Ryan (R) ****  (out of ****)
"War is hell."  No one questions the veracity this statement--over time,
it has become less a saying than a truism--but rarely does anyone ever give
serious thought to what exactly it means.  The opening 25-minute sequence
of Steven Spielberg's _Saving_Private_Ryan_ should change all that.
Depicting the invasion of France on D-day, June 6, 1944, as seen through
the eyes of Capt. John Miller (Tom Hanks), this section has a startling
visceral intensity that is cheapened by text descriptions.  To merely
describe the brutal, graphic violence, such as the severed limbs,
eviscerations, and the free-flowing and -gushing blood, is to discount its
sensory and emotional power; to describe it simply on those latter terms is
to diminish the bravery and honesty Spielberg exhibits in not shying away
from the raw carnage.  This bravura opening set piece is cinema in the
purest sense--the melding of audio, visuals, and all other individual
aspects of filmmaking into a greater whole: an experience whose effects are
not easily shaken, its memory not easily forgotten.  After the
well-intentioned but stately-to-a-chill _Amistad_, this explosive opening
announces that Spielberg has rebounded in a big way with this World War II
drama, a stunning piece of work that aims and hits the audience square in
the gut.
The "Private Ryan" that must be "saved" is one James Francis Ryan, the
only survivor of four brothers in active duty in the war effort; as some
type of humanitarian mission, Army Chief of Staff George C. Marshall (Harve
Presnell) dispatches a squad led by Capt. Miller to find Pvt. Ryan and send
him home as comfort to his grieving mother.  The mission, of course, is not
without its complications, not the least of which is the disinterest of
Miller and his squad, who are not terribly keen (to say the least) on
risking their lives for that of one man--a man they do not even know.
Not surprisingly, the lives of some Capt. Miller's men are sacrificed
before they finally locate Pvt. Ryan (Matt Damon), but their loss makes
only a moderate impact.  _Private_Ryan_'s main weakness is the rather
one-dimensional crew with whom writer Robert Rodat surrounds Miller: Sgt.
Horvath (Tom Sizemore), Pvt. Reiben (Edward Burns), Cpl. Upham (Jeremy
Davies), Pvt. Caparzo (Vin Diesel), Pvt. Mellish (Adam Goldberg), Pvt.
Jackson (Barry Pepper), and Medic Wade (Giovanni Ribisi).  Only the wimpy
kid Upham comes off as close to a fully-realized character, but most of
personality he exhibits can be attributed to Davies's vivid, anguished
performance.  The other actors do well, but their roles are more shallowly
written and developed, half boiling down to single characteristics: hothead
(Reiben), Jew (Mellish), Bible-quoter (Jackson); the remaining are
nondescript.  Maybe it was a conscious decision by Rodat and Spielberg to
objectify the squad much like how most who serve in military combat are
seen as walking statistics, but it makes the risk of their lives a gambit
curiously low in emotional involvement.
Compensating for the faceless squad members is the squad leader, Capt.
Miller,  _Private_Ryan_'s anchor in every way, ably leading his men and
serving as a strong, sympathetic emotional center amid the chaos.  Brought
to life in a well-modulated turn by Hanks, Miller is a consummate
professional and leader, but he is not immune to the psychological ravages
of war, which have now manifested themselves in the physical form of hand
tremors.  There are a couple of haunting wordless sequences where Miller
blankly watches the mayhem surrounding him like a lost child, bringing to
light a subconscious reason for his carrying out the "rescue" of Pvt. Ryan.
 It's not so much to follow orders and win a ticket home, as he says, but
rather to graft a purpose onto the senseless human toll, to put into
tangible human form the nebulous reasons behind the fighting--and his role
in all of it.
By the film's end, _Saving_Private_Ryan_ reveals itself to be a rather
ironic title.  If he is indeed "saved," he is actually more damned--alive,
yes, but living with the burden of the men who sacrificed and were willing
to sacrifice themselves for his life, and the lingering doubt that the life
he would go on to lead would fully amount to the ones it cost.  Ultimately,
it's not Pvt. Ryan's salvation that Capt. Miller and his crew are fighting
for--it's their own.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Jeremiah Rickert
Starring: Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Matt Damon, Tom Sizemore
Directed by: Steven Spielberg
     For the last couple of weeks, I have been bombarded with a pile of
very lyrical and moving reviews of Steven Spielberg's realistic war-tale,
Saving Private Ryan.  The reviews themselves were as moving as any film
I'd seen, telling me that this was a film about war and humanity and the
like, the greatest American War Film ever, the best American film of the
last 10 years, one after another I read them.  My local newspaper even
went so far as to give the film five stars out of four.  I had to see this
film and I had to see it soon.
     The opening sequence of Saving Private Ryan is one of the most
harrowing, accurate (from what survivors have said in print and on TV)
brutal, wet, muddy, desperate, bloody, tense scenes in the history of
American Cinema.  For those expecting the kind of scenes that made John
Wayne a star, you are in for a shock.  There is no trumpet-blowing and
flag waving to be found as German machine guns rip the landing American
soldiers to shreds, over and over for about 30minutes.  The camera sits
the audience right in the middle, there is no omnipotent camera in this
sequence, you see and hear exactly what the soldiers see and hear, and it
causes you to want to duck as the bullets whiz passed your head and clang
off of helmets and bone.  It's a very remarkable picture of war at its
most brutal...and honest.
     This scene introduces us to Capt. John Miller and his squad of
rangers as they slowly push onto the beach.  Hanks as Miller avoids
melodrama and cliche and just does his duty, sending men to their deaths
again and again until the objective is accomplished.  Hanks leads the
strong Ensemble cast that includes Tom Sizemore as Sgt. Horvath,  (Heart
and Souls, The Relic, Heat) Edward Burns (Brothers McMullen, She's The
One) as the vocal Pvt. Reiben, Matt Damon (Good Will Hunting, Rainmaker)
as Pvt. Ryan, and Jeremy Davies (Nell, Spanking The Monkey) as map-maker
turned squad interpreter, Corporal Upham. 
     After surviving Omaha, a clerk discovers that three of the four Ryan
brothers are dead, and a fourth has just parachuted into Normandy with the
101st Airborne.  General George C. Marshall (played with gruff elegance
by Harve Presnell) decides that in order to avoid not only a PR disaster,
but another heartbroken mother (the Sullivan brothers were all killed when
the ship they were all one was destroyed) he wants a squad to find Pvt.
Ryan and bring him back home.  Miller gets to pick his best men for the
job and head to where Ryan was to have landed.  On the way they bicker
among themselves as to whether this is all worth it, and is it worth
giving their lives to save one man?  Miller insists that it's their
mission and they must follow orders.  Can he keep his squad together for
this seemingly unimportant mission?
     Overall, the film is a start, realistic picture of war, but I have to
say that overall I was a bit disappointed.  While I'm sure this will make
me unpopular with some, I have to be honest.  The main purpose of the film
seemed to be to make a realistic war film.  On this level, Spielberg and
Co. succeeded.  However, realism doesn't make great cinema.  The plot and
characters more and more fall a distant second to the realism of the
images and sounds.  I found myself less and less interested in the
characters and more and more interested in the cinematography and details
of the costumes and such.  A truly great film doesn't allow you to be
distracted by the individual parts that make it great.  I didn't sit
through L.A. Confidential marvelling at the fact that the guns and ammo
were really the ones the LAPD used in the 50s. I was more interested in
the characters.  Saving Private Ryan failed to keep me enthralled with the
characters.  
     There was a great opportunity to explore a variety of themes that
were ever-so-slightly touched on in the film, but only barely.  I wanted
to be swept up in the conflict that arises when decent humane people are
forced to be in an inhumane environment and expected to survive.  Hanks'
character embodied this very theme, but he wasn't allowed to do much with
it.  I wanted to be moved by the cameraderie between fellow soldiers, but
this is just taken for granted, we're all brothers, they just say it,
their actions rarely speak for themselves.  Spielberg obviously took a lot
of care to avoid the cliches and flag-waving of earlier films, but he
failed to make this something that Americans can relate to.  It is
entirely possible to make people feel emotionally patriotic without
resorting to cliches and manipulative imagery and music and dialogue.
When I say emotional, I only mean that the audience needs to feel a
kinship with the characters, and when characters and audience come from
such different backgrounds/eras the only thing you can do is relate to the
things that are the same in everyone, humanity, and in the case of
American audiences, the country we live in.  I found it hard to relate,
and that's what was missing in this film.  Even though the camera sets you
right in the middle of the action, it's only your eyes and ears, and not
your heart that is into it.  They just went a step too far in setting the
parameters for the film and I was very disappointed because of that.
     The opening and closing scenes of the film, with the d-day veteran (I
won't say who) visiting the graves of his fallen comrades in France in the
present were far more moving than any other part of the film.  He looks at
the crosses and says with his face "why me? Why did I survive?" It was
that humanity that the rest of the film lacked, that emotion.  Perhaps
Spileberg and Co. wanted there to be emotional detachment, the same
detachment Miller has as he sends wave after wave of his troops to be
slaughtered.  If that was the case, the film was successful, but not
engaging.
     The technical aspects of the film are of course all top-notch.  The
Cinematography by Janusz Kaminski (Jerry Maguire, Lost World, Amistad) is
at times incredible, a real achievment.  The colors, textures, and scenes
are consistently stunning.  The musical score by John Williams is adquate
to the task, only subtlely in places, so as to not overcome the music of
war.  One thing that I also liked was the fact that during the entire
opening sequence, we don't see the faces of the German soldiers until the
characters see their faces.  Just a rain of machine-gun fire, greeting
them/us on the beach.  
     Overall, the film is realistic and technically superior to previous
war films, but in my opinion it lacked the any emotional connection to the
characters and the story.  I really didn't care if they found him or not,
as long as the characters caused me to be involved in the film at a
personal level.  That did not happen.  Therefore the film was to me a
disappointment.
Of the 3.75 I paid for it, it was worth $1.85
(c) 1998 jeremiah rickert
--

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     I am sorry that John Wayne is not around to see Steven Spielberg's
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN. Wayne made many films of the glory of war.
Perhaps during the war that was what was needed. But it presented a
totally artificial view of what war was really like.  In a John Wayne
film when someone is killed they fall over--usually bloodlessly.
Nobody has to deal with people who have been cut in half by machine gun
bullets, with wounded solders looking for their own severed arms. The
deaths in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN are anything but bloodless.  And at a
time when so many films show gratuitous gore, as a special effect
Steven Spielberg may be the only director who knows how to shoot blood
so that the viewer feels the pain.
     There are four boys in the Ryan family, or at least there were the
week before D-Day.  Mrs. Ryan will get three telegrams in one day about
the loss of three sons.  The last remaining son was airdropped behind
enemy lines and nobody knows if James Ryan is alive or dead.  The brass
wants to see him back safely with his family.  A squad of eight men is
sent to find Ryan and send him home.  But the squad is decidedly
ambivalent about the assignment.  Eight men are risking their lives in
highly dangerous territory to save the life of one private who is being
sent home in what may be only a public relations gesture.  Is he more
deserving of special treatment because of what happened to his
brothers?  When they find him is he even going to want to go home?
Might he be already dead and the whole mission pointless?  Are eight
people likely to be killed for some general's quixotic notion of mercy?
     No film in memory has ever taken such a gritty and un-romanticized
view of what the dog soldier experiences.  The battle scenes are as
vicious and unrelenting as any film has ever shown us.  The action
begins with a 25-minute subjective view of the squad landing on the
Normandy Beach-right in front of a nest of machine guns.  There are no
dramatics here.  It is just a bunch of men being delivered into to
mouth of a meat-grinder.  Most of the delivered soldiers last just
seconds before they die in any of a variety of ugly ways.  The
survivors of the squad are chosen for the Ryan mission and with some
trepidation they go off to find the private. Captain John Miller, a
blood-and- guts commander, played against type by Tom Hanks leads the
squad.  Unknown to the high command but suspected by the men, Miller is
starting to crumble under the stress of constantly dealing with the
dying and dismembered.  The squad is a heterogeneous mix of
personalities and ethnic types borrowed from any film like A WALK IN
THE SUN or THE BIG RED ONE.  It includes the loyal Sergeant Horvath
(Tom Sizemore), the uncooperative Private Reiben (Edward Burns), the
Jewish Private Mellish (Adam Goldberg), and a timid translator,
Corporal Upham (Jeremy Davies).  Among the issues contested by the unit
is the question of how to treat surrendering Germans and the
individual's responsibility to be sacrificed for the many.
     Spielberg has not returned to the black and white of SCHINDLER'S
LIST but he does some playing with the color and look.  At times he
will wash out the film, giving the feel of amateur photography of the
time.  During battle scenes he will use a special filter to tint the
scene.  Then he strobes the action so while the film is not slowed
down, it will give fewer images per minute.  In this way it looks like
the viewer is not able to take in all he is seeing.  He will use hand
held cameras to put the viewer into the action.  Miller's physical
state of shock is represented by near silence on the soundtrack in the
middle of a battle scene.  During some of the battle scenes we get
almost all of our information visually and the sound is reduced to the
din of battle.  Other times Spielberg lets the sound tell the story,
particularly in scenes where the squad is hearing the earthquake-like
rumble of approaching tanks.  Spielberg makes his point in the loud
numbing battle scenes or in quiet moments as when Mrs. Ryan just folds
up and sits on the floor of her porch when she knows she is about to be
given bad news.  He can make a point by letting his camera wander over
the geometrical lattice of a field of crosses in a military cemetery.
Curiously enough for so professional a production, there are some
inconsistencies in the Robert Rodat script.  Early in the film we are
told that the boys at first served together and were separated only
after the five Sullivan brothers died in the Navy when the boat on
which the five served was sunk by the enemy.  That true incident, by
the way, was probably the inspiration for this fictional story.  We see
a picture of the brothers all in uniform.  But later we are told that
when one of the brothers went to boot camp was the last time they were
together.  One more minor glitch if I saw what I think I saw, the men
invading Normandy seem to have guns covered in polyethylene to protect
them from the water. Nope.  That is a decade or so too soon for that.
What they did tend to use is latex, which would have been more tight-
fitting.  It also would be a product produced for another purpose.
(Information on polymers and WWII provided by Harold Leeper, Chemistry
Docent for the Tech Science Museum, San Jose, California.  He and I go
way back.)
     The honesty and realism of some of the scenes of this film may
forever change the war film.  This is not a pleasant film, but it is a
truthful one in a way that few war films have ever been truthful.  I
rate it a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Author
Dennis Schwartz
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (director: Steven Spielberg; cast: Tom Hanks , Tom
Sizemore, Ed Burns, Adam Goldberg, Jefferies Davis, 1998)
An instant classic. The WW11 story of the Americans landing on bloody
Omaha Beach for D-Day. Tom is the captain on the boat telling  his
ranger troops that he'll see them on the beach. This is an old-fashioned
war story, except for the bloody graphic details of the war that is
realistically shown. The film successfully takes aim at the horrors of
war, showing how the boys we knew back home have become killers, as we
witness how the war brings about unimaginable human suffering. For the
first 30- minutes of the film you see this carnage: the men drowning in
water that is too deep for them, arms and other body parts floating by
them as their only concern is to get to the beach alive, the utter fear
and indecisiveness of the moment, and the pain of being shot at and of
being shot, is vividly photographed. This scene of unrelenting horror,
brings us as close to the war zone as we can get without being there.
The sounds you hear, that makes the talk among the men almost inaudible,
are the guns of war, just like it is in actual combat. In fact,  95% of
the first wave of men to land on the beach were either killed or
wounded. (In the first two attacks on the beach only 15 men survived out
of 5,000, which should give you an idea of how bloody the actual battle
scene was).
>From this zenith in filmmaking history, the story continues on its
gripping pace as we follow Hanks and the men who were lucky enough to
survive with him, as they are given the almost impossible mission of
finding a private Ryan, who is in an airborne unit that just landed on
the vast battle scene in France. They are ordered to bring him home from
the war and spare his family any more grief than what has already been
experienced with the death of all his three brothers, in recent
skirmishes. This is an assignment that they do not relish (they would
rather be fighting the war), and they bitch and gripe about it, but they
carry out their duty, which is an important sub-theme of the film. The
men did what they had to do.
This is not really an anti-war film as Spielberg would like us to think,
but it is more likely a film about how difficult it is to be in a war
and how necessary it is for us to fight for our freedom when called
upon, in fact, it is just like all the other war films (waving the flag
and all that sort of stuff) except for the explicit battle scenes shown
in the opening. It is a film about the citizen soldier who just wants to
survive the war, who experiences chilling things in combat that are very
difficult to put into proper prospective. It is about a country that has
been involved in recent wars that were not fully accepted by the public
and has, perhaps, forgotten how gallantly the men of the WW11 generation
fought to preserve democracy. But ultimately, this is a war movie that
is really about war and how it can be so devastating, how returning
soldiers may find it difficult to explain to those who were not there
the psychological traumas they have gone through. There is no need for a
John Wayne type in this film (Tom is Everyman! And he is just great in
this role, you can feel his moods, the fears that he has-- and his need
to do the job and go home).
This film can in someways be considered a masterpiece because Spielberg
knows how to do one thing really well, that is, he knows how to tell a
story visually that can reach the masses. The flaws in the movie, minor
as they might appear to some, still reflect Spielberg's need for kitsch,
and since the film does make a concerted effort for accurate details it
should be noted that Tom would have covered his captain's bars in a war
zone, and the men wouldn't have had long and loud conversations when
walking through a battle area. But the most serious transgression, which
gave me pause to think that this is the same old sentimental Spielberg
returning, is when the translator (Davis) who is new to combat, loses
his nerve in the field, and what ensues are a series of events that
seemed to be too contrived to flow with the rest of the movie, not
because soldiers don't freeze in combat as he does, but because here it
happens so conveniently that the soldier can be spotted redeeming
himself for the American audience as he kills the only unhelmeted German
soldier on the bridge, of course, that is the one that Hanks let go for
humanitarian reasons (remember in SCHINDLER'S LIST the Jewish lady in
the concentration camp with the red dress as everyone else was shot in
black and white!).
This is a great war film, not because it has anything different to say
than other war films did, but because it tells its story visually well,
and it does so with much gusto, as seen through the eyes of what the
soldier saw in combat. You can talk to those who were there and they
will tell you to a man, that this is the way it happened.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Joy Wyse
If you like war movies, this is probably the best one that you'll ever
see.  To say that it starts off with a bang would be putting it mildly.  
>From the very beginning of the film you are part of it.  As the troops are
preparing to invade the beaches of Normandy on D-Day, June 6th, you can
feel the thoughts going on in the minds of each and every soldier.
As the LCVPs pull onto the sand and drop the ramps, the men  become
sitting ducks as a barrage of bullets and heavy artillery rake across
them.  In the audience, you find it difficult to see clearly, or to hear
what is being said, much the same as it was for them.  You get quick
glimpses of carnage and blood, but you [the soldier] are driven by
self-preservation.  If you would stop to help a buddy, neither of you
would survive.  It was every man for himself.  But, you had to follow
orders.
Tom Hanks is the star of the film, but most of the other central roles are
played by lesser known [although experienced] actors.  This makes it even
more believable that they are real army.  There are cameos that pop up,
such as Harve Presnell, Ted Danson, and Dennis Farina, but that's all they
are....cameos.
It's a long movie, but you hardly realize it.  I'm one of those people who
was living during W.W.II.  My husband served in the Navy  while he was
only in his teens.  He was one of four brothers who were each in different
theaters of action.  Once or twice he happened upon one of them in some
unknown country.  Unlike Private Ryan, my husband was fortunate enough
that he and all of his brothers came home alive, and unharmed.
Even though I was aware of the war and the D-Day invasion, I have never
felt it so graphically as I did in this film.  The  violence that is shown
in this movie is, by far, more believable and real that anything you've
ever seen before.  It just affects you in a way that can't be explained. 
I dare anyone to watch this and not cry.
They say that our children learn from what they see in movies and on
television.  Just like Schindler's List, Saving Private Ryan is a must-see
film.  Maybe it could help stop the violence in the world today.
I did notice one blooper  in the film.  The squad goes from being 8 to 7
to 8 to 7 again.  Watch for it.  But, it doesn't stop me from giving this
an A.  It's by far the best film of the year.  I want to see it again.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: July 24, 1998
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward J. Burns, Jeremy Davies, Matt
Damon, Dennis Farina, Ted Danson, Harve Presnell
Directed by: Steven Spielberg
Distributed by: DreamWorks Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (intense prolonged realistically graphic sequences of war
violence, language) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/saving.htm
It's a dismal day on the northwestern coast of France: the skies are
heavily overcast, the seas are choppy, the winds are high. At the Dog
Green sector of Omaha Beach, things are particularly gruesome: tens of
thousands of American infantrymen push relentlessly toward the sand in
troop transports. Then the army of boats land, and the ramps drop, and
there's a split second where everyone gets their first look at France.
Then the German gunners fill the air with rifle fire and troops are cut
down by the hundreds - some before taking their first step. Others are
killed on the beaches, or in the water, but eventually - if only by
sheer numbers - the Allied invasion force at Normandy wins the day and
gets a small foothold in Nazi France. 
Such is the opening scene in Steven Spielberg's latest epic masterpiece,
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, a scene which some thought might have earned the
movie an NC-17 classification if the movie had been directed by any
other man. Such claims are not far off base, in the sense that Spielberg
incorporates an awesomely stunning amount of realism into his latest
product. The intense violence, largely concentrated to the first twenty
or thirty minutes, is a no-holds-barred look at the Great War. Men die
explicitly and and in utter chaos. At first glance, it would be easy to
earmark such a crass depiction as nothing but gratuitous violence. But
after only moments of viewing, Spielberg does the near-impossible. He
puts every member of the audience there at Dog Green on June 6, 1944. 
Even after the opening-scene slaughter, everything remains authentic.
Mid-forties jargon, olive green uniforms, bulky grey helmets, original
automatic weapons, and more are all replicated in stunning detail and
attention to realism. On those terms, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is to World
War II what TITANIC was to its namesake oceanliner. If there's anything
about the movie that Spielberg does the most, it's in creating an
authentic, believable, and complete atmosphere for the story. Tramping
around the French countryside night and day, everyone watching is in a
complete sense of awe at the time travel they have just undergone. This
benchmark statement of set and production design is accented and
furthered by the acting corps. 
Tom Hanks (THAT THING YOU DO!), Tom Sizemore (THE RELIC), and Ed Burns
(SHE'S THE ONE) are the lead players in a squad of US Army Rangers with
the mission of locating Private James Ryan. Ryan has three brothers, all
of whom have already been killed, and the War Department, fearing a
scandal, gives Captain Miller (Hanks) and his team the job of finding
the remaining Ryan. Each and every member of the team is believable and
solid in nature, as the joke, laugh, cry, and suffer through war and its
facilities. Hanks is not outstanding but is wonderful as ever, exuding
an aura that only comes from a man who has two successive Best Actor
nominations. His lead is essential in this movie, and contributes
greatly to making SAVING PRIVATE RYAN Spielberg's finest film since
SCHINDLER'S LIST. In comparison to his last feature, AMISTAD, Spielberg
exchanges a more colorful set for a more action-filled script; this
works out for the better with a 170-minute running time. All-in-all, the
definitive must-see feature of the summer, and possibly the year.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SAVING PRIVATE RYAN": 4.0 stars - an excellent movie.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
Steven Spielberg is, perhaps, the greatest technical moviemaker of our
time.  He has made us believe in dinosaurs, extra-terrestrials, and that
the Ark of the Covenant could melt Nazis.  The hallmark of Spielberg
movies is that he makes you believe you are there -- whether it's a
ruined Egyptian temple or a concentration camp in Poland or a
raptor-ridden tropical island.  Every scene, every shot, tells us that
this is happening, right now, for real.  Only the best Hollywood
illusionists -- say James Cameron's painstaking recreation of the
Titanic, or Ron Howard's extraordinary weightless Apollo capsule -- can
be ranked with Spielberg in terms of sheer technical prowess.
However, just as someone can make a great cabinet without there being
anything inside, someone can be a great technical moviemaker without
making great movies.  And Spielberg's last two movies weren't great.
Although the dinosaur action in The Lost World was better rendered than
in Jurassic Park, the plot was a lifeless retread of the original
dino-classic.  Both the historical detail and the action scenes in
Amistad were outstanding, but the plot bogged down in legalistic
courtroom psychodrama.  From a technical standpoint, there wasn't
anything wrong with either of these two movies -- but they didn't live
up to the high standard that Spielberg has set for himself.
There was every reason to anticipate that the opening scene of Saving
Private Ryan -- the invasion of Omaha Beach by the Third Ranger
Battalion on June 6, 1944 -- would be a technical masterpiece.  And so
it is.  Veterans who were there say that Spielberg does a good job in
recreating the horror and agony of the Normandy invasion, and there can
be no higher praise.  Spielberg conveys the heroism and the confusion of
the landing spectacularly well, even recording some of the shots himself
with a hand-held herky-jerky camera.  With the resources of his own
studio behind him, and with Tom Hanks to serve as a visual anchor,
Spielberg has created one of the great war scenes in film history.
The "cabinet" of the movie is great.  The war scenes, while less
spectacular than the Omaha landing, are intricate and stunningly
well-designed, just as if Spielberg had personally placed every chunk of
rubble and debris in its proper place.  The set design is fantastic --
they even manage to recreate an authentic World War II glider, although
the originals were mostly smashed to bits on landing.  But what makes
Saving Private Ryan a great movie isn't the box the movie comes in.
This movie turns out to be bigger than its box.  Saving Private Ryan is
special because the story outshines even the quality of the filmmaking.
The story is simple:  Private James Ryan (Matt Damon) has lost two
brothers in the Normandy landing, and a third in the Pacific the week
before.  He is to be found and taken home to comfort his grieving
mother.  However, Ryan dropped behind enemy lines with an Airborne
division which was scattered behind enemy lines like so many spilled
needles.  Hanks, his top sergeant (Tom Sizemore) and a small crew must
infiltrate the German lines, find the lost soldier, and return him
safely home.
The quest for Ryan is accompanied by a long string of philosophizing
about the mission, punctuated by small-scale combat.  Hanks and his crew
don't like their task and don't appreciate the implication that Ryan's
life is somehow worth more than theirs.  This makes the movie sound a
bit talky, I know, but Saving Private Ryan frames its discussion of
these issues as real-life morality plays:  What's the duty of a soldier
to non-combatants?  Is it OK to shoot prisoners?  Is one man's life
worth sacrificing your own?
In doing so, Saving Private Ryan focuses on the Big Issues -- life,
love, sacrifice, honor, courage (and cowardice), death, defiance, and
duty.  By focusing on these issues, Spielberg transcends the conventions
of the war movie -- both as action movie and as horror movie.  Although
some of the excitement of combat and most of the horror of war are
displayed, the movie really isn't about either.  It's a celebration of
values -- and war movies should be about values, because the strains of
war places those values in sharp relief.
(And one of the things that separates Saving Private Ryan from the other
summer blockbusters it is that we can argue what the movie is really
about.  Try doing that with Armageddon.)
One thing that no one will argue with is the quality of the
performances.  Damon, so good as the cocky genius Will Hunting and the
sincere fledgling trial attorney in The Rainmaker, has a limited role,
but he doesn't allow the symbolism of his character to interfere with
his effective portrayal of a scared Iowa farmboy.  Sizemore is not so
much of an actor as he is a medium, bringing back the shades of all the
sergeants from every World War II movie ever put on celluloid.  The rest
of the squad seemingly falls into patterns -- wise guys from Brooklyn,
sharpshooter farmboys, sensitive writer -- but the young actors breathe
new life into all the old stereotypes.  The images of these actors --
the frozen, heartbroken countenance of Jeremy Davies, the hard stare of
Edward Burns, the cracker drawl and sharp eye of Barry Pepper -- are the
ones that will stay with you long after the last reel ends.  (Especially
Adam Goldberg, who confronts a line of German prisoners with the mocking
call, "Juden!  Juden!" as he fingers his Star of David.)
And Hanks?  If his competition so far is Jim Carrey's leaden performance
in the dismal Truman Show, we can declare the Oscar race over now.
There won't be a better performance this year by anybody.  The American
soldier is first and foremost a citizen, and Hanks uses his Everyman
quality to fill this ideal perfectly.  He's a hard-bitten combat veteran
with the eyes and spirit of a scared recruit -- but he's a formidable
and brave leader.  He's able to exhibit a fuller emotional range here
than he did as the muffled Forrest Gump or the steely-eyed missile man
of Apollo 13, which contributes mightily to the power of the film.
Saving Private Ryan is a fitting tribute to the virtues we hold dear and
to the men of our armed forces who exhibit these virtues in war and
peace.  As I said, no higher praise is needed.
Movie Reviews: http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Curtis+Edmonds
Hollywood Stock Exchange: http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/
"Baseball should always be played outdoors,
 on grass, with wooden bats."

Author
Thomas Glebe
Though I liked this movie overall, though there are some outstanding shots,
sequences, and effects, and though I would probably recommend it to friends
and acquaintances as one of the better cinema treatments about World War II,
my expectations were too disappointed to engage in high praise of this work. 
I had many serious "problems" with SPR from the very opening shot of the
American flag.        This image, which was also used at the end as a frame,
imparted upon the movie a kind of amoral "patriotism" which politically I do
not share, and which actually contradicted itself, in my opinion, during the
entire film.  In other words, either Spielberg was making some sort of subtle
sarcastic/ironic comment with this flag shot (which would "work" for me
within the context of the film itself), or he wasn't.  I suspect the latter.
The opening scene of Ryan as an old man visiting the Normandy cemetery was
fine except for one very annoying factor, which was to excruciatingly
reappear throughout the film, the music.  It was archetypal John Williams,
lush, overly-sentimental BS pretension, which we've heard 100 times already,
and in almost every scene in which this score swelled, I felt it was
inappropriate.        I would've much rather have heard no music whatsoever
throughout the film, or at least a very different style, from another
composer.  Some of the scenes in the film in which Williams' score was most
evident (and annoying), were very powerful and emotionally tugging in
themselves, and no music at all was needed. At the very least, an utterly
subtle form, quiet and unassuming, would've worked nicely.  However, with
most Spielberg films, and most John Williams scores, "subtle" is obviously
not in their respective dictionaries.
For instance, when we are in DC with the military brass, or when Ryan's
mother is being notified of her other three son's deaths, the music is quite
overblown and ridiculous.  Sometimes, it almost smothers the actual dialogue.
 I don't really like being manipulated like this.  The scene where an army
notification car rode up to mother Ryan's home, as she fell to her knees when
a priest tried to comfort her, was very powerful stuff.  Why not just leave
it that way without this obtrusive, blaring soundtrack of trite music we've
heard over and over again?  One could've easily substituted this entire
soundtrack for the ET score, for Jurassic Park, for virtually ANY Spielberg
film really.
I mention and highlight the music because this is an example of where the
film goes wrong for me, seriously wrong. Each time the soundtrack music
swelled like it did, it completely ruined my experience of the sometimes
overwhelming visuals.  It also completely destroyed my "suspension of
disbelief" that I was actually watching just another war movie, and this is
the film's main failing for me.  SPR tries to be two things at once, a "real"
glimpse of war, and a typical Hollywood piece of entertainment.  Perhaps this
duality isn't really possible when touching upon the reality and horror of
war, but I do think other films have given it a much better shot than SPR. 
The most striking example of the film's almost soulless failure to do justice
to its apparent agenda (to show how utterly abominable real war is), brings
me to perhaps my main complaint. The film's cinema verite, shaky documentary
camera style.  NYPD Blue on amphetamines...
A little of this "style" can go a long way.  Drenching entire scenes lasting
several minutes, was totally ineffective and pretentious to me.  Like the
stereotypical Williams score swells, the jerky camera was so overdone and
manipulative, that it seemed to undercut itself finally.  Some of this
specific technique is fine, in the right place, the right time, and used
sparingly to highlight something in particular about the image which the
director is trying to point our attention to.  But in the numerous combat
sequences in SPR where it was completely appropriate and where it should have
been effective, it was so collateral, that the camera style itself
overwhelmed the content and power of the images.  Several times, I really
felt so beleaguered, that I wish I could've reached up onto the screen and
just stabilized the shot for a moment. Generally, I am suspicious of
Spielberg's motivation for doing this in the first place.  In many ways, this
is a "false" and outdated "style" to begin with, and its use should always be
frugal, if used at all.  In short time, SPR's constant camera jerkiness
becomes superfluous to the point of actually undercutting the meaning
intended for its use in the first place.
I had other problems.  From the start, I felt Tom Hanks as lead was a bad
choice.  His performance was great, don't get me wrong.  I loved his acting
throughout.  But the whole "documentary" type feel which Spielberg constantly
kept trying to hit us over the head with throughout the film, was constantly
undercut for me, by seeing a well known actor in the part.  An unknown
should've gotten this part, actually, all of the parts.  Hey, it's been done.
 Would Spielberg do it though?        Would Paramount go for it?  Hardly.  It was
all part of some complex "deal," of course.  More Hollywood marketing, what's
going to sell, what isn't.  Star appeals, profit margins, "business."  And
yet, didn't the whole concept of SPR in a way, call for something more than
just another "vehicle" by which Hanks will possibly grab another of those
oscar statues? There are 10's of 1000's of OTHER actors in Hollywood, with
just as much "talent" as Hanks, I am sure.  Why not give them one of them a
shot at this? Why spend so much money trying to convince an audience that
they are watching something "real," then thrust into our consciousness good
ol' Forrest Gump again?
The problem is, that like the music, like the shaky camera, and like the
"patriotism" expressed, the images and subject matter, which "deserved"
something much better, were undercut by Tom Hanks in the lead.        I very rarely
ever believed what Spielberg was trying so hard to get me to believe with the
great images, sets, and action sequences he stages.  Even at the end, when
Hanks is sitting there dying and shooting a gun at a Tiger tank, I saw Tom
Hanks, actor, "best actor." At one point, Ted Danson appears.  Again, an
unknown actor should've played this.  I hardly heard a word Hanks or Danson
said during their brief encounter, nor did I believe they were soldiers, nor
did I accept any longer the reality of the destroyed French town they were
walking through.  It suddenly just became a "set" again.  My suspension of
disbelief, which so many powerful scenes in the film evoke, was broken once
more.  Hey, there's the guy on Cheers, I said to myself.  It is true that
Spielberg casts some unknowns (or hardly-knowns) in other roles, but even
then, their characters are so stereotyped that the unfamiliar faces never got
in the way of feeling at all times that I was simply watching a Hollywood
movie.
Within all of this criticism, one may have noticed some positives mentioned.
Yes, there were many.  Some of the wobbly camera in the opening sequence, was
very potent, like the troops running towards the beach.  This gave the viewer
a real sense of being there, of being in a frantic state of confusion,
attempting to move forward into a frightening and imposing blur of horror and
motion. However, a bit later, when Hanks and his men are using a mirror at
the end of a rifle to try to find out where a particular German machine gun
is firing from, why shake the camera?  When the medics are trying to fix up
wounded men on the beach, why shake the camera?  If one were there watching
these things, they would simply not be seeing it from this perspective. 
Again, this whole technique was so overused to me, that it eventually
subverted its intended purpose.  Why?  Is this just typical over the top
Spielberg?  Were the horrible images in themselves not horrible enough that
we needed this constant "gimmick" thrown in our faces over and over again? 
Was such blatant manipulation of his audience really necessary?  Like the
music, the shaky camerawork, for this viewer at least, ended up simply
interfering with the effect on me I think Spielberg himself intended.  In
many ways, SPR seemed like Spielberg shooting himself in the foot, to escape
the real horror he said he wanted to convey all along.        I have to seriously
wonder why.  Was he "afraid" to show us what he was certainly capable of
about the reality of war?  Or would that not be "entertainment" any longer? 
Would it not be part of the "deal," or would it cut into potential profits? 
Of course.  But oh, what a shame and a cop out.  And so even when trying to
concentrate on "positives" in SPR, I am again drawn to criticize it.
What's so disappointing about SPR is that it just could've been done so much
better, in so many areas, that the collective result, is frustrating.  One of
the most notable exceptions when Spielberg seemed to "get it right," was one
"sound dissolve" early in the film, which really sent chills through me. 
This was when he showed it beginning to rain, the drops falling onto leaves,
trees, and ponds, the sound of which slowly changed into that of approaching
gunfire and bombs, which it all turned into soon visually.  The sound editing
was generally great in SPR, however, that distinctive "sound dissolve" was
fantastic.  One visual gem around that time in the film, also stood out for
me, which was a shot of the men walking on a hill, silhouetted against a blue
dawn sky filled with distant (and not so distant) mortar and bomb blasts. 
My, if only more of the film could've held such qualities.  It would've then
easily approached "Apocalypse Now" (my all time favorite "war" film) and
achieved true "masterpiece" status.  It is interesting to compare the two
films actually, if only in intent and success.        "Apocalypse Now" clearly
attempts with each shot, each element, to be flowing in some uniform whole,
all to portray war as utter madness.  On that level, it is clearly unequaled
in my opinion, and succeeds brilliantly in what it tries to do.  SPR on the
other hand, whose clear intent seems to be to show us how horrible war is,
cloaks that horror in typical Hollywood cliché and hokum, ending up not only
doing disservice to its very subject, but undercutting its own effectiveness.
 The two examples in SPR given above, the sound dissolve and the silhouette
image, were only hints of what greatness Spielberg could have accomplished,
but did not.  Unfortunately, moments such as these were far and few between
in SPR, whereas in "Apocalypse Now" for instance, almost every frame, every
sound, every element actually, seems carefully (and lovingly) thought out. 
It was thus sad to witness, that each time SPR began to approach "art," it
quickly became just more Hollywood "entertainment."  Given the subject
matter, and the supposed "tribute" Spielberg seemed to desperately want to
convey, the film clearly betrays its own values. I suspect that the possibly
faulty "values" of the director himself, are the sole blame for this, but his
politics being what they obviously are, I won't "go there."
Another SPR positive however, and a whole sequence which for me, seemed as if
it almost belonged in another movie (a great one?), was that of the whole
"radar installation" attack scene, which lasted about 15 minutes.  This
singular part of the film was absolute brilliance.  It started with Hanks'
men questioning whether they should attack this area, or just go around it. 
For the first time in the film, I felt as if I were actually watching real
people, and not just actors.  Before this point (and sadly, after the
sequence was over), I again felt as if I were just watching a cast playing
parts.        This was especially evident in the earlier walking/chatting part,
where we are "introduced" to the various characters (I guess that was
Spielberg's intention).  This was pure corn, out of a dozen other WWII films,
and I didn't buy it for a moment.  Wasn't there some other way for the
filmmaker to make us more familiar with the characters than something so
consummately unimaginative?
The truly outstanding radar attack sequence, when compared to much of the
rest of the movie, seemed to strangely stand out for me, so much so that I
almost wonder if someone else directed this part.  The characters were given
a REAL identity to me during this portion.  And for all the talk (hype?) of
blood and gore and entrails in SPR, to me, the only really powerful depiction
of the horror, came in this one section of the film, specifically in the
segment when one of the GI's chests was pumping gushes of bright red blood. 
Before dying, where he meekly mouthed the words "Mama, mama" in a haze of
morphine shots, Spielberg leaves all the million dollar effects and stages
and sets behind, relying on something the rest of the film seems not to want
to delve too deeply in, namely, real death.  For all the blood and carnage
SPR shows throughout, little of it ever really made an impression on this
viewer.  It was mostly just typical "Hollywood" war movie nonsense, rows of
German soldiers being mowed down by one single American, men getting shot and
falling over, dead immediately, and lots of bandaged wounded, exhibiting very
little actual pain or suffering.  When the lone GI died in the arms of his
fellow comrades, SPR clearly for me succeeded in what it seemed to want to do
from the start, powerfully and emotionally display the actual results of all
of this flying hot metal and debris, which real combat is.
Why wasn't there so much more of this however?        When the little French girl
is handed down to a GI amidst a hail of German sniper fire, I fully expected
to see the girl's head blown off, or at least something truly horrible
happen.  Earlier in the film, in the much hyped opening 20-25 minute
sequence, there is a long beach shot of the bloody aftermath of the landing,
showing waves of blood, dead men, and dead fish.  Good enough.        But weren't
some of those poor souls still alive?  Why not show their utterly horrible
pain and suffering?  When one of the men gets his arm blown off and goes to
retrieve it in a nightmarish way, I wanted Spielberg to show us this man a
bit later on, to show us the real consequences of what had happened. 
Typically however in SPR, Spielberg "chickens out" in doing such things, and
in doing so, for whatever reason, he continually disappoints.  For myself,
the only "bloody" scene in the entire movie which had any kind of real
effect, was the dying man whose seemingly stray fire wounds, resulted in an
unstoppable sea of red gore, the life force itself, draining from his body. 
In essence, there was really nothing else in the film, despite the high tech
and obvious on-screen high budget, which stayed true to the film's own
purported intention to actually show the real horror of war, as this one
solitary scene did.
There was more to the horror of these events however, than simple blood and
gore.  SPR seems a bit more successful in displaying such, although again, it
seems to undercut itself whenever possible.  One particularly great little
fragment of the movie when it did not, was again, in this specific section of
the film.  Following their friend's slow and bloody death, Hanks goes over by
himself, and he is shaking, crying, trying to hold back the emotion of what
he's just witnessed.  There is subtle music this time.        There is also a
lingering effect to the camerawork, a slow zoom.  Spielberg lets the actor
ACT here, and even though it was Tom Hanks, my suspension was complete. 
Here, like the earlier scene where we experience up close and personal
someone's bloody death, the true nature of war was brought home to me, more
powerfully than any series of high-priced Hollywood FX.
After Hanks cries, the entire Axis prisoner scene, was also good.  There was
a real tension here, and I easily felt myself not watching a movie anymore,
but feeling as if I had some sort of personal stake in what I was watching. 
In SPR, Spielberg's more delicate and subtly discriminating touches, were
clearly the best moments of the film.  All the blood and violence and special
effects of the opening and closing sections, never came close for me, to
displaying the real horror of war, than this one little middle section, which
culminated in two men on the same side, almost killing each other because a
POW was being released. In this one short sequence, to me, the film not only
gave me a sense of the real horror of war, but it also had a real moral
center and soul.  The subtle nature of Spielberg's touch here was also the
real power of the effect.  This was to be lost afterwards however, and
especially near the end of the film.  If, and I emphasize that word, any real
tribute to basic humanity and the values and ideals which made "our" side the
"good" side in WWII, was present in SPR, it was only present in this one
section, seen through the eyes of the translator, and eventually Hanks.  This
whole concept was utterly blown to bits at the end of the film however, and
throughout other sections was given only lip service at best.  Had SPR truly
explored such ideas however, I guess that would've cut into the special
effects and explosions, and we couldn't have that now, could we?
Overall, SPR's standard MOP seems to be cliché exaggeration and more.  There
are few real surprises in this film.  For all the unique things in it, there
is little very original or thought provoking, and time after time, Spielberg
just does not seem willing to take chances.  A lot of SPR actually feels more
like your standard, formula episode of television's WWII series from 60's,
"Combat." That series in fact, which used to be a favorite of mine, kept
entering my head throughout SPR.  The men walking in the field chatting and
wisecracking, the quiet whispering in the church at night, the whole French
girl/sniper/dying soldier in the middle of the road scene, and most of the
last half hour at the bridge, seemed regulation Vic Morrow material to me. 
In SPR, about the only added element to this 2 and ˝ hour episode of "Combat"
was clearly money spent on sets and effects.
So many archetypal scenes like this, I felt, were simply missed by Spielberg,
that is, their POTENTIAL to be presented in a truly original, superlative,
and powerful manner, was missed.  Even the opening landing sequence, which
has been commented on by many as so "gory," came nothing close to what I
expected (and hoped for).  One of my chief complaints about ALL war movies,
let alone WWII ones, is that none have very effectively portrayed (for me)
what combat must really be like.  SPR did so in some respects, better than
most.  But some of the images were laughable to me.  The singular shot of the
guy laying there screaming, with half of his guts hanging out on the sand,
was something out of a cheap horror movie.  It wasn't believable at all.  The
shot of the man trying to retrieve his shot-off arm, was also not effective. 
Many of the so-called "gore" shots, seemed simple FX to me, and nothing of
their real import or pain was portrayed effectively by Spielberg.  WAY TOO
MANY shots for me of Americans mowing down whole groups of German soldiers,
like as if this was a standard scene out of WWII (it wasn't).  It IS a
standard, stereotypical scene out of WWII MOVIES however.  I had hoped for
much more however, in SPR.  Guys riding up onto tanks and armored cars
throwing in hand grenades, more rows of Germans mowed down by a single man,
Generals quoting Abraham Lincoln with schmaltzy music swelling, the wiseguy
from Brooklyn, the tough sergeant, the scene where the WRONG Private Ryan was
notified of his brother's deaths were all predictable, boring, and totally
cliché to me.  All of these things were plain old stock WWII movie nonsense. 
This might've worked 20 years ago.  I expect more today.  If a man gets his
arm blown away, I want to "feel his pain" for a few moments, before moving on
to the next FX shot.  If German tanks were as formidable and frightening as
those who fought them have testified, why was taking them out so "easy?" 
Hollywood, that's why.        I saw only ONE shot near the end, where they fire a
mortar or bazooka at a Tiger, when the shell only bounced off harmlessly. 
Otherwise, in Spielberg's fantasy WWII world, whole German squads can easily
be mowed down by a single GI, and tanks and other weapons can be disabled
with nothing more than some good old GI Joe bravery.  For all the effects,
for all the blood and guts that ARE shown, SPR continually refuses to step
over certain lines.  It wants to be two things at once, which is its ultimate
undoing, to show the "reality" of war, but to do it in an entertaining
Hollywood story suited for mass consumption.  Whenever Spielberg gets close
to one side of it, the reality side, he once again becomes the Hollywood
entertainer.  It's as if he were trying to put menacing sharks or dinosaurs
in the middle of "Schindler's List." SPR felt that way generally to me
throughout. A schizophrenic movie, no doubt about it.
Three parts of the film (though there are others) were particularly annoying
in this manner.  When the decision to hold the bridge is made, and Hanks
comes up with the sock bomb/sniper in the tower/middle of the road lure/plan,
the men begin putting this into action.  So what do we get?  Not a sense of
the real desperateness of their plight or their fears, but more over the top
music, quick cuts and shots of the preparation (right out of Jaws), and more
MOVIE MOVIE stuff.  Then a much too long, extended "lull" sequence as the
troops await the German's attack, which SHOULD depict some sense of impending
doom and death, but which concentrates more on triviality.  I simply didn't
buy it.  And by the way, was Hanks so out of touch and unable to reach his
superiors at this time, that he would not/could not try to find out what THEY
wanted him to do when Ryan refused to go back?        What was it that completely
turned Hank's character and motivation at this time, from getting the mission
accomplished, to playing hero? This was bad writing to me, or just
unrealistic movie heroics.  In real life, I don't think this would've played
out at all like it did in the film.  Again, cliché, audience manipulation,
and Hollywood crapola.
Who can take the death and final heroics of Hanks vainly shooting his pistol
(Hanks, the sudden "hero"?) at the Tiger seriously, when at the very last
moment, the "Calvary" arrives and the tank is blown away by a plane?  All is
right with the world.  Happy ending.  Nonsense.  I laughed out loud when the
plane arrived to blow the tank away.  I couldn't believe how corny and
predictable this was, and still can't believe Spielberg utilized this
hackneyed concept at all, let alone in such a crucial part of the film. 
Wasn't this scene a direct copy of the one in "Jurassic Park" where the
people are just about to be eaten by the two vicious Raptors only to be
"saved" at the last moment by the T-Rex?  Cornunoriginal corn.  Hank's death
after this, was also totally unmoving to me, and was also completely
predictable at this point.  His death seemed quite contrived, and like so
many other parts of SPR, quite expected.  I fully expected Hanks to die from
about mid-point in the film, exactly as he did. I even guessed at what he
would say to Ryan in his dying breath.
However, what WAS NOT expected (for me at least), and what eventually made me
throw up my hands with the film as a whole, was when the meek translator, who
had acted so afraid and cowardly up until this time, calmly shoots the
earlier released POW who had been part of the last battle sequence.  This was
the same man which the translator had befriended, the same human being which
he pleaded with Hank's to spare over "moral" issues, and here, near the end
of the film, Spielberg has the ONLY true moral character in the film (the
American translator) calmly murder the smiling, hands-raised, unarmed
prisoner.  This was done so casually, and obviously shown intentionally that
way by Spielberg, that ANY sort of patriotic feelings I myself held at this
point, were totally wiped out.        Why did this man shoot the prisoner? 
Spielberg seems to be trying to make some point here, some "subtle" one at
best, that such horrible insanity all around has even turned the meek but
moral coward into just another part of the vicious madness, and yet, any such
"point" is totally negated by yet another "cheat."  We are never really given
any reason for this behavior, are not shown any consequences of it, and it
totally contradicts the whole concept of the film itself.  Throughout SPR, we
are constantly bombarded with this idea that all of this horror and violence
is real and appalling.        And yet, at the end, when the translator murders the
unarmed POW, I was left to wonder what was the point of ANY single
"patriotic" element in the film?  How anyone could proudly show an American
flag flowing in the wind AFTER this, and really expect any decent human being
to feel the slightest sympathy with the filmmaker's own biased
(nationalistic) viewpoint, is beyond me.  Could it be that the very immoral
and materialistic "soul" of SPR, clearly revealed to myself at least, is only
a reflection of what's lacking in the "soul" of its creator?  I have no other
interpretation at this time, and would have to say yes.  As a whole, SPR
fails for me as anything but entertainment.  To read into the film anything
"deeper" than that, feels as disingenuous to me as reading same in most of
Spielberg's other works.
Summing up, I walked out of this film hardly thinking afterwards of it,
except for dwelling on my disgust for the wasted effort and money.  Like so
much of Spielberg's other "enjoyable" work (Jurassic Park, ET, and the Raider
sequels), it is digestible filler candy for awhile, but there are no great
ideas here, no true moral or political or philosophical "center" or soul.  I
have not found myself thinking much about anything in this film subsequently,
except for the few brief positive moments mentioned above.  I think only the
easily manipulated, or those who were there back then and find some common
experiences depicted, think this is truly a "great" film.  It is not.  It is
average.  And to me, in many ways, it contradicts its whole subject in the
first place.  Maybe Hollywood WILL "get it right" someday, but SPR didn't. 
As a film about WWII, it is an above average one, but it comes nowhere near
others, such as "Bridge on the River Kwai," "The Great Escape," "Stalag 17,"
"A Midnight Clear," and is even inferior to the last "blockbuster" made about
this event, "The Longest Day."        Hell, at least THAT one was up front about
its jingoistic, sloppy sentimentality.        SPR dwells in a similar sensibility,
but denies doing it to its audience every step of the way.  In this day and
age, and considering what Spielberg had to work with, what the film clearly
does wrong, cannot in the final analysis, overcome the few things it does
right.        Entertaining?  Yes. Transcendent?  Only if one is easily prone to
hype, whether political, or cinematic.        This viewer is neither.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Jamie Peck

SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
While the wrenching intro is going to shock some of the more unassuming
audience members into sudden hysteria, it at least instantly announces
"Saving Private Ryan"'s agenda -- war isn't pretty, and Spielberg doesn't
waste any time pretending it is. Still, as extremely difficult as the
combat is to watch, it's just as hard to divert your concentration, thus
desensitizing viewers to the alarming horrors we will witness during the
next two-and-a-half hours. The movie demolishes the fine line between
observing and participating without any kind of preparation or warning;
the only way to capture the realism of violent battle is to drop you right
in the center of it, and this amazing film unapologetically does just
that. For those of us who have never experienced firsthand warfare,
"Saving Private Ryan" is very likely the closest that we'll ever get. 
Part of the afore-mentioned D-Day attack is overseen by Captain John
Miller (Tom Hanks), a quiet, resourceful man whose heroism only distances
him from the serene life he lead before enlisting -- "With every man I
kill, the farther away from home I feel," he says. Though Miller's forces
are victorious at Normandy, their triumph does not come without a
staggering human cost. Among the lives lost at Omaha Beach are two
brothers, a third sibling of whom has also fallen, leaving a fourth who
might still be alive somewhere deep in French territory. When the
government learns that the boys' mother will be receiving a trio of death
notices on the same day, they assign Miller to lead seven soldiers on a
mission even more dangerous than what they have previously faced -- to
travel behind enemy lines and retrieve the remaining sibling, one Private
James Ryan, at any cost. But tragedy begets tragedy, and Miller's team
questions the significance of risking their collective necks just to
rescue a single person that might already be dead. 
While it's perhaps unfair to compare "Saving Private Ryan" to a movie
like, say, "Armageddon," the association does in fact reveal a large part
of what's missing in film today -- genuine characters and stories that
make you care. While Armageddon's cast is composed of ciphers, some of
whom are killed off for obligation's sake, "Saving Private Ryan" boasts a
canvas of thoughtful, substantive individuals. When death is portrayed
here, you feel deep heartache and sorrow, not some sort of manufactured
sadness. Not surprisingly, Spielberg and screenwriter Robert Rodat ("Fly
Away Home") never stoop to exploitation or manipulation when they portray
the casualties of war, and the result is an intensely exhilarating
experience unlike anything you've seen since "Schindler's List." That
connection isn't just being made because Spielberg directed "Schindler" --
these films are arguably the two most important motion pictures of this
decade. 
Tom Hanks' performance is more moving than his Oscar-winning turns in
"Philadelphia" and "Forrest Gump" put together, and that's quite a feat
considering that John Miller isn't a very flashy role. But Hanks installs
emotional dignity in Miller's calm, commanding presence; when he finally
breaks down after an especially traumatic episode, you will too. With a
few exceptions like Tom Sizemore (as Hanks' devoted sergeant) and Matt
Damon (who shows up late in the game), the fine ensemble is made up of
mostly-unknown young actors. Giovanni Ribisi, a recurring guest star on
"Friends" (playing Lisa Kudrow's daffy brother), provides the film with
one of its most affecting moments, while Barry Pepper is striking as an
excellent marksman who prays as he picks off enemies. Jeremy Davies
("Spanking the Monkey") is the best of the bunch; perfectly cast as a
timid, violence-shy soldier recruited in the operation for his linguist
skills, he makes a powerful foil for the audience. Also strong are Adam
Goldberg, Vin Diesel and Edward Burns, the multi-talented guy behind "The
Brothers McMullen" and "She's the One." 
With "Saving Private Ryan," Steven Spielberg has fashioned another
monumental tale about humanity and self-sacrifice among the horrors of
war. He's done the unthinkable, really, since this work is every bit as
profound as "Schindler," his uncontended masterpiece. If anyone criticizes
"Saving Private Ryan" as being "too violent," then they've sadly missed
the anti-war point. Even the quiet, meditative moments boil with the
threat of spontaneous carnage, all to create a film that transcends its
medium --thanks to Spielberg's potently graphic depictions of historical
bloodshed and Janusz Kaminski's gritty, you-are-there cinematography, you
don't just watch this movie, you live it. A guaranteed lock on 1998 top
tens, updated American Film Institute lists and Oscar ballots next March
-- yes, it's that unforgettable -- "Saving Private Ryan" is, in a word,
phenomenal.

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
As the 20th century closes out at the end of next year, 'Saving Private
Ryan' is a timely release that reminds us that the last 100 years has
been a time of warfare unlike any other in history and that six of those
100 years, 1939-1945, were the most horrific times in the broad spectrum
of human conflict ever seen by mankind with unmatched weapons of
devastation and the senseless slaughter of millions of lives both on and
off the fields of battle.
Director Steven Spielberg has ventured into World War II territory twice
in his career before this film.  His flawed but mildly satisfying
'Empire of the Sun' (1987) and his masterpiece 'Schindler's List' (1993)
are films that show the diversity of war from the concentration camps of
the Pacific to the holocaust the plagued Europe.  On both occasions,
Spielberg plunged his audience into the insanity of war, with all of its
evil qualities but found a curious sense of pride and redemption among
noble characters on each attempt and taught movie audiences of the way
film should be used as not only an entertainment medium of visual
extremes but as a redefined account of human conscience.
D-Day:  June 6, 1944.  Omaha Beach on the shores of Normandy (France).
This is the setting for the opening half hour of 'Saving Private Ryan'
but shortly before the battles commences, the opening scene is set in
the present day where an elderly man and a couple of generations of his
family visit the landmarks erected to Omaha beach veterans.  There is no
dialogue and the scene ends with a slow zoom into the man's eyes as they
fill the movie screen completely and we later realize that this elderly
man is one of the film's central characters and then the film moves to
the past and shows the D-Day carnage.
Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) leads his infantry into battle.  You
will never experience the impact of bullets upon human bodies more
realistically than you will see in this film.  Heads, legs, and arms are
mangled and one soldier's guts are spilled into full view of the
audience and another soldier picks up his arm and walks away with it
after it is blown off.  It is a shocking and difficult thing to watch
but Spielberg is to be commended for his immediate and unglamourous look
at the realities of war.  As the battle winds down the film takes a
sympathetic turn which will later put Hanks and his men in the arms of a
mission that will turn out to be the most important one in the eyes of
one Iowa family.
Private James Ryan (Matt Damon, whom we don't see until the last hour of
the film) has lost his other three brothers in combat and the war
department decides to send Hanks and his men on a mission to find him
and bring him home to his family.  The family has already received three
telegrams of regret with three folded American flags in memory of the
men lost and the mission is set in place. Tom Hanks is brilliant in this
film as he plays his role of the leader with a quiet sense of authority,
gaining admiration from his men, and his character is sympathetic but
never sentimental. He has seven men with him and the most noteworthy
members of his squad are actors Tom Sizemore ('Natural Born Killers',
'Heat') and Edward Burns ('The Brothers McMullen') who each turn in
brilliant performances as soldiers who feel uncertain about the mission,
questioning the logic in sending eight men to find one, and the mission
is described as "finding a needle in a stack of needles".
The mission sends Hanks and his men into the fields of Normandy as they
experience combat, the personal bonding that soldiers experience during
war time and the realistic killer instinct that all humans have and
although Spielberg is credited largely with the film's success,
screenwriter Robert Rodat has written an evenly paced script that
carefully illustrates and details the total scope of tension among the
film's characters that looks and feels like nothing a war film has
accomplished before.
The most impressive technical aspects of 'Saving Private Ryan' numb the
human mind as the hand held camera, used in many scenes (Spielberg
actually held the camera himself at times), plunges its way into battle,
complete with constantly changing shutter speeds, frenzied shots of
action and the film's sound effects will leave a permanent impression on
your brain as bullets hit their mark and mixed together with the film's
sensational editing, the constant thuds heard in the film as soldiers go
down in tragic fashion are haunting to say the least.  I was seeing and
hearing the film vividly, a few days after I saw it.  Director of
photography Janusz Kaminski and longtime Spielberg editor Michael Kahn,
both of whom did 'Schindler's List' with Spielberg, and the sound team
of 'Saving Private Ryan' are Oscar bound as is the rest of this film.
I doubt a better film will come along in 1998 to match the intensity of
'Saving Private Ryan'. After all, Spielberg is the century's most noted
and impressive film maker as five of his films, 'Schindler's List',
'E.T., The Extra-Terrestrial', 'Jaws', 'Raiders of the Lost Ark', and
'Close Encounters of the Third Kind', recently made the American Film
Institute's Top 100 list of all time greatest films from 1896 to 1996.
No other director, not Wyler, Ford, Hitchcock, Coppola, Wilder or
Kubrick have matched Spielberg in the eyes of his peers and the cultural
historians who have judged him in the first century of film.  Even when
Spielberg makes a mediocre film, it seems to grow on you after a while
and the amazing thing is, Spielberg's only 50.
Visit the 'new look' FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies Of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm

Author
Michael Redman
        There are times in most people's lives for which they are completely
unprepared: nothing they have ever done seems relevant to the experience.
Extraordinary situations sometimes force ordinary people into a mental state
on automatic with no time to think. The most extreme of these circumstances is
probably war.
        Near the beginning of the film is 25 minutes of pure hell. As troop-carrying
ships land on Omaha Beach in Normandy on June 6, 1944, the boys in uniform are
vomiting and shaking. When the doors open, they don't even get the chance to
leave the boats before they are cut to pieces by Nazi machine guns. The air
support that was supposed to have taken out the German weapons missed their
targets and the shore becomes a slaughterhouse.
        Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is one of the few that survive the carnage.
The next day he's given an odd mission. Three out of four Ryan brothers were
killed in the war and their mother in Iowa got all three telegrams on the same
day. General George Marshall is determined to send the remaining brother,
James Ryan (Matt Damon), back home and assigns Miller to the rescue operation.
        The Captain assembles a small unit of men and sets off through occupied
France to find the boy. The problem is that Ryan parachuted into the area. The
paratroopers were scattered all over the countryside and no one knows where
anyone is.
        The beach battle and a later one defending a bridge are as close as I want to
come to actual combat. The horror is indescribable and the filmmaking
exceptional. The camera follows one soldier, moves across the scene to another
while obscenities form the background. One man reaches down to pick up his arm
that was shot off and stumbles away. Others writhe in pain with gaping holes
in their bodies. 
        These are probably the most realistic WWII battle scenes ever filmed. As in
the Vietnam films "Platoon" and "Apocalypse Now", we get a glimpse of what war
is actually like. There are no John Waynes here, only civilians forced into a
situation where no one knows what is going on and they are trying to make it
through alive. During the landing, there are no viable options. There is no
place to retreat to. To stay where they are is certain death. To advance into
the machine gun fire is lunacy. The men are so shell-shocked that when Germans
surrender, they are shot down.
        The scenes between the two major battles are not as captivating. With a
couple of exceptions, Miller's men are cliches: a New York Irish smart-aleck,
a southern Bible-quoting sharpshooter, a Jew, a tough Sergeant and so on.
While they are fleshed-out somewhat and become real people as the film
progresses, they begin as the same guys you see in every war film.
        One of the exceptions is Upham (Jeremy Davies), a translator who has never
seen combat and is picked for the squad because he speaks German and French.
The most human of the group, he is scared to death. In a particularly
terrifying scene, he is carrying ammunition and cowers behind a wall as
several enemy soldiers are on the other side. Later he freezes in fear on a
stairway as a German walks by, ignoring him because he is inconsequential.
Although he is everyman, he is also the most easily despised.
        There are apalling scenes that will stay with the audience for a long time.
One especially excruciating one is a close-up of a German slowly sliding a
knife into the chest of one of the soldiers.
        The cinematography is phenomenal. Janusz Kaminski, who also shot "Shindler's
List" uses a personal point of view with muted colors, hand-held cameras and
various film stocks to give us the feel of battle.
        The sound is also spectacular. During the fighting, there is no music.
Especially effective are the times where the sound turns into a roar or
becomes complete silence.
        There are a few things that don't work or don't make sense. Marshall's reason
for risking eight men to save one is unclear. Is it a whim based on his
obsession with Lincoln's letter to a soldier's mother or is it true
compassion? The question of the worth eight men versus that of one is the
primary focus of the film, but is never answered.
        Towards the end of the film, Miller whispers something to Ryan. What he says
is a key point in the movie, but it is barely intelligible. After the
utterance, I saw half the audience turn to the other with "What did he say?"
        The framing episodes in modern France are needless and add nothing to the
movie other than emotional manipulation.
        Even with these problems, the incredible scenes make this a must-see.
        Also troubling is the consequences of mercy. One soldier attempts to rescue a
French child. The squad lets a German captive go that they can't take with
them rather than kill him in cold blood. Both of these acts have disastrous
results ending with deaths. The message seems to be that kindness during times
of war is fatal.
        Director Steven Spielberg seems determined to write history. As our society
knows less and less about the past, he is apparently aware of the power of
cinema. With this, "Shindler's List", "Empire Of The Sun", "The Color Purple"
and "Amistad" our view of history is being formed by one man. The Normandy
invasion will forever be defined by "Saving Private Ryan" in the minds of the
movie-going public.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and still hasn't had
the space to tell of the fire scare during an IMax showing of "Titanic". Maybe
next week...)
[This appeared in the 7/30/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Frederick Weber
     I have read some and printed out all the reviews listed here.  I am
not a movie critic.  I do not have the eloquence that most of you have.
Hell, the 14 year old reviewer writes a lot better than I do.  So please
excuse my ignorance, any mispelling that I do not catch or my point of
view.
I came out of this afternoon's matinee, drained.  I sat in my hot
automobile for 5 minutes with the engine on before I noticed that I
hadn't turned the air conditioner on.  I can not believe that I didn't
walk out afer the first ten minutes of the 25 minute opening battle in
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN.  If you are weak of heart or of stomach, do not see
this movie.  If this movie would have been made in the 60's, when I grew
up, I would have had nightmares for years.  This is not a movie for
children and many adolescents.  Wait until they've learned a little bit
about the war in the vanilla coated history texts in school.
I'm not going to critique the movie but I will, with your patience,
the audience in attendance with me. Besides the slob sitting behind me
belching and flatulating during the movie, there were 3 patrons who
stood out.
The first was a gentlemen who continually talked throughout the
entire movie, which irritates me to death.  I will assume that he was
there in France on D-Day because by the time I got really engrossed in
the movie, I found myself waiting to hear what he had to say about what
he saw.  I don't think he cried during the movie, at all.
The second was a little boy whom his father had taken to see this
movie.  He had been running up and down the aisles several times, whch
again irritates me.
After the movie was over, the boy and his father were outside the
theater.  The boy was crying on his father's shoulder.  The father was a
Viet-Nam veteran.  You could tell by the tattoos and the light vest with
patches that he wore.  With all the movies about Viet-Nam that this
child probably had seen, I was stunned by this child's reaction.  I
applaud the veteran for handling the situation because it turns out the
kid had upchucked several times in the men's room, in reaction to some
of the graphic scenes.
The third was an older woman who was sitting in front of me and to
my left. She, too, talked throughout the movie; ditto on the irritation.
It turns out that she lost her husband on Omaha Beach.  She had not shed
one tear during the entire movie.  Her voice never cracked once.
Then there was me.  An overweight 45 year old handicapped acounting
clerk on medical leave from my job.  I cried a lot,, shuttered at many
scenes, closed my eyes on many occassions, laughed once and then
realized what had just happened.  I cried because I wasn't there,
neither was the boy.  But the elders in the crowd did not seem to be
bothered as much as some of the younger people, excluding the Viet-Nam
vet who calmly tried to quiet his son.  I probably would have yelled at
him for running up and down the aisles.
This is by far the first movie that I've seen that had just
physically weakened me.  I've seen movies that I've applauded at  that
I've walked out on, and that I was highly exhilirated after seeing but
none was as emotionally charged as SAVING PRIVATE RYAN.
I hope a lot of the Generation Xers see this movie.  They have
never gone through a war like the baby boomers did with Viet-Nam or
Korea or the older generation who had to endure a lot of hardships
during the 2 World Wars. I hope they stop and appreciate what those men
on Normandy did and what they stood for.  In this day of think only for
yourself, it might change a few attitudes about responsibility and pride
for tradition that this country stands for.  On major national holidays,
I no longer see the American flag as frequently as I did when I was
younger.
Sorry. I tend to ramble and go off on tangents, sometimes.  Thank
you for allowing me to do this.  Comments appreciated.  
P.S.-I did see the squad with 8 soldiers walking down the road, after
the first soldier died and the way the rifles were covered.  I was under
the impression that they used condoms, like in THE BIG RED ONE.  I rate
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, 4 out of 4 and 10 out of 10..          

Author
Mark O'Hara
A sore subject with many Americans is the absence of a national memorial 
dedicated to the men and women who served and perished in World War II.  
Steven Spielberg's SAVING PRIVATE RYAN will not stand as this memorial.  
But the film is noteworthy because of the ways it bestows a profound 
tribute and respect.
I was lucky to be able to watch with my father, a WW II veteran.  We sat 
in the third row, the crowded theater taking our options.  Glancing 
behind me during the film, and talking with my father afterwards, I 
concluded that no other film about war packs the sustained power of 
Spielberg's treatment.
Only ALL QUIET ON THE WESTERN FRONT and GALLIPOLI carry similar moments 
that show personal horrors.  SAVING PRIVATE RYAN opens with a prologue 
in which a veteran visits an American cemetery in France.  The man walks 
ahead of his extended family, his face caving in under his memories.  
Soon we see the men in the LCIs landing on Omaha Beach on June 6, 1944.  
Some soldiers retch, some kiss the crucifixes of their rosaries;  all 
are afraid.  From a monologue delivered in a dark church to the private 
torment of a shell-shocked translator, the film creates a relentless 
emotional tension.  
One of the agents that makes this mood is the camera.  We witness the 
first hour from the points of view of hand-held cameras, some shots so 
jerky they are uncomfortable to watch.  After Captain John Miller (Tom 
Hanks) receives orders to bring to safety Private James Ryan, whose 
three brothers have been killed in action, we continue to watch many 
skirmishes from on-the-spot vantages.  Matched with editing that is 
quick and transparent, the camera work makes the viewer's experience 
visceral.  
The sets and costumes further the terrifying realism.  Although there 
are no long shots of the entire Operation Overlord, the part of the 
invasion we can see is dead-on.  Machine gun nests, bunkers, weaponry 
and vehicles -- these elements engage us easily into the narrative.  
After Capt. Miller picks his squad and sets off behind enemy lines to 
locate James Francis Ryan of Iowa (Matt Damon), we see more locations 
that telegraph the story's accuracy.  Bombed houses, splintered planks 
everywhere, and rubble-strewn streets resemble photographs of real 
battle scenes.  And the costumes are correct.  My father says perhaps a 
few too many helmets are covered in netting, but otherwise the designers 
are sharp.  The canvas belts, the jackets, the occasional puttees laced 
around the calves -- these are the outfits of 1944. 
Do technical aspects make the actors' work easier?  They are certainly 
related, but the acting here is self-reliant.  It is hard to identify an 
unnatural performance or an unnecessary character.  Tom Hanks tints John 
Miller with mannerisms and tone that evoke sympathy.  The motif of his 
shaking hand reminds us that even the strongest and wisest leaders are 
human.  If politics are just this year, Hanks will pull nominations for 
major awards.  I would also cite Tom Sizemore as Sergeant Mike Horvath, 
a sturdy confidant to Miller.  Perhaps the toughest supporting role is 
Damon's.  The long build-up  of the squad's resentment toward Pvt. Ryan 
is dispelled almost immediately when we finally see him.  (I understand 
there was some actual resentment because Damon did not experience the 
mini boot-camp imposed upon the actors in Miller's squad.)  
I'll offer one critical comment about the director, and then I'll praise 
him.  The ending of the film, while effective, does not flow as well as 
the last moments of SCHINDLER'S LIST.  The frame tale to which LIST 
returns works better, developing a personal epic weightiness.  Anyhow, 
Spielberg has a talent for choosing important themes, whether or not his 
film is a serious drama or a lighter "entertainment."  RYAN links 
mesmerizing episodes of war with moments of characterization you would 
expect in a fine short story.  It even throws in some laughs for relief.  
We are fortunate that Spielberg has wrought an honest portrayal, one 
that affirms the values of the 1940's and deems them worthy today.  
As a boy in the 1960's, playing "Army" with cap guns and real surplus 
canteens donated to our Scout troop, I saw the Second World War as a 
romantic adventure.  It was like following Vic Morrow from "Combat" 
around our backyards.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN reinforced to me that the war following the Great 
War was just as hellish as the fighting in Vietnam -- which I heard 
about on television every night as I grew up.
The film reminded me why my father and hundreds of thousands of people 
of his generation sacrificed their time and their lives.  We, their 
daughters and sons, must live in a free world.  We must inherit or cause 
the eventuality of not having to fight and die ourselves.
Perhaps the hushed audience in the multiplex realized these ideas as the 
credits rolled.  It's one type of memorial I'm sure our parents and 
grandparents would want, an anti-war movie viewed by millions.


Author
John Carroll
Steven Spielberg has a way with film. Does the man ever fail? In an era of
Hollywood where CGI is more commonly used then plot, Spielberg manages to tell
his stories in a way to captivate fans of all genres and get his point across.
His latest, Saving Private Ryan, examines World War II, and has the basic plot
of trying to save one man by risking the lives of eight. But, he is able to
tell many other stories and does it with such flair that I am still impressed. 
The film starts off with D-Day, the invasion of Omaha Beach. It is a
twenty-five minute sequence that is the one of the most shocking lengths of
film in motion picture history. There is no introduction, you do not know the
characters, you just see men running for their lives trying to secure Omaha
Beach. For once, war is not glorified. Throughout the film, Spielberg displays
the image of men fighting for their country, but does not glorify the horror
that the men experience in battle. He shows his audience the gruesome aspects
of war, from dismembered body parts to shots in the head. This first sequence
of Saving Private Ryan is not for the weak at heart.
The film progresses to a special mission handed down to Captain Miller (Tom
Hanks) from his superiors. The mission: Miller and his platoon must scour the
lands to find Private James Ryan (Matt Damon), whose three brothers died in
action. Therefore, Hanks takes up his men to start the search. The casting of
Hanks' platoon was terrific. Ed Burns plays the tough-talking Private Reiben.
Tom Sizemore plays the by the rules Sergeant Horvath. Another outstanding
performance is turned in by Adam Goldberg who plays the somewhat cynical, but
humorous, Private Mellish. Through Goldberg's character, Spielberg expresses
the views of the Jewish, who were being persecuted by Hitler during the war.
But, in my opinion, the man who turns in the most unexpected performance and
steals the show is Jeremy Davies who plays Corporal Upham. He is brought along
to translate for the platoon and fight, and thinks of war as glorious battles
and a lovely brotherhood among soldiers. But, Spielberg displays the change he
sees as he experiences true war. 
Tom Hanks, as always, gives a terrific, Oscar worthy performance. His character
is a quiet, yet powerful, leader who is torn between risking his life and his
men's life and his ticket out of the war. But, Spielberg displays through Hanks
the true glory of war. Captain Miller is a man who fights for his country and
follows all orders. Despite his objections, he risks his life and the life of
his men to save Private Ryan and get his ticket back to his home and his wife.
The film progresses with each story developing in a subtle way, yet each
getting their point across. Throughout their journey they fight the impossible
fight, almost break apart and go through such surprising moments, I was
genuinely shocked. We learn of Captain Miller's occupation (I won't spoil it
for you), a wall crashes and it is all of a sudden two opposing platoons with
weapons and no one willing to pull the trigger. Also, they find James Ryan, or
so they thought. And yet through all of this, the whole platoon is able to come
together through bonding and fights, against the enemy and against themselves.
All in all, they find Ryan when they find a way to coexist in harmony through
Hanks' leadership. It is a truly inspiring film, and Spielberg is able to make
the two and one half-hours seem like half that.
Saving Private Ryan is a truly cinematic masterpiece. Throughout the film,
Spielberg expands on one story to tell dozens. He yet again utilizes his entire
cast to portray war as a horrific experience, despite all of the glorifying
aspects of defending your country. Spielberg truly does have a way with film
and yet again shows that he can reach any audience and have them leave with a
truly new thought on life.
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Nick Amado
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies, Vin
Diesel, Adam Goldberg
As the small boats rock slowly toward the shore at Omaha beach Normandy
on D-day, the weary, seasick soldiers take a deep breath and open the
large protective shield at the back of the boat. They are unaware of
exactly what is going to happen. One man kisses the crucifix that hangs
around his neck. As the flap falls, the battle begins. They are trapped
like rats in a cage and proceed to be blown to pieces in the wake of
enemy gunfire. Amid the chaos of this massacre, stands a shot that, at
least for me, hangs in the air like the girl in the little red coat in
Schindler's List. A soldier, clearly missing an arm, wanders around the
body-strewn beach like a lost puppy. We are not invited to know what he
is searching for until he finds it himself. He bends over, picks up his
arm and starts to carry it, probably not bothering to ask himself; "What
now?"
Saving Private Ryan is a masterfully composed film. The direction is out
of this world, surely the type of command that can win Spielberg another
directing Oscar. The cinematography, by Janusz Kaminsky, is also
astounding. But be forewarned, this is the most violent and graphic film
I have ever seen. The articles you read and the warnings you see are
justified; Saving Private Ryan is visually as disturbing as a film can
get. The question is, "does the story and its realism justify the
excessive use?" The answer from my point of view is "no". 
Braveheart was a truly gritty, and, one would imagine, realistic battle
film. Ryan is ten times worse. Expect disembowelments, sucked in skulls,
heads blown to bits, arms and legs flying across the battlefield. Many
in the theater could not bear to watch.
And it is a shame, too, because this is otherwise by far one of the
standouts this year. But such graphic displays may turn away even the
most loyal Spielberg supporters (and Academy members).
Saving Private Ryan takes us from the attack at Omaha beach on D-day,
1944, through into the film's primary mission. Captain Miller (Hanks)
assembles an 8 man crew and sets off to find a missing solider, Private
Ryan, whose three brothers have already been killed on the battlefield.
The government goes to great lengths to make sure that Mrs. Ryan doesn't
recieve a fourth letter of condolences about her sons, that no person
should suffer such injustice. Miller's crew is not in favor of the
mission and they begin to harbor a secret hatred for Ryan, though they
don't yet know him. They resent having to trudge out to bring home one
soldier who doesn't have any more or less right to live than any of
them.
This film manages to keep up a rapid pace and, though there is a lot of
set up between battles, the story continues full speed to the end. The
pacing and dramatism of the extremely well choreographed battle scenes
is really in a league of it's own. Spielberg, though not a student of
the "quick cut" school of filmmaking, takes a stab at it here, and does
it better than Michael Bay or any of his MTV counterparts could ever
hope to do it. Bay should pay close attention, take copious notes. If
you want to jump cut every two seconds, do it the way Spielberg does it
in Ryan.
In the end, the extremity of the gory violence is not justified by the
"importance" of the film. Schindler's List taught many people the truth
about the Holocaust. It opened eyes, sparked debate and study. Though
the battle scenes in Ryan have never been portrayed as realistically
before, they don't amount to anything as serious or thought provoking as
the Schindler's List. Overall, this is just the truest depiction of the
old adage, "war is hell." But Braveheart-dosage would have fit this
movie much more appropriately, and would have made the difference
between me getting up the nerve to see it again some day and realizing
that this is something I doubt I could endure again. Masterful work
marred only by excessive gore.

Author
J.K. Salisbury
War is hell.  A point that very few, from whatever side of the fence you
reside, will disagree with.  A seemingly pointless, senseless loss of life,
all to attain an objective that they do not understand, or even believe in. 
Anyone who doubts or disputes any of those statements, should sit through a
viewing of Saving Private Ryan.  If you can, and still hold your belief that
war isn't a tragedy, for which the payoff sometimes doesn't seem worth        the
journey, then, I pity you.
Spielberg's vision of war, the most unabashed, undaunting, uninhibited that
I've seen in a while (albeit, not being a fan, nor frequent viewer of war
movies, I can't compare this fairly against them).  The much-talked about
opening scenes, difficult to express in words because of the intensely
emotional vision painted, are worthy of the talk.  They are graphic, tragic,
maybe a bit over the top, but if that is the way that war really was, then I
have an even stronger found respect for those who went through it.  Being a a
veteran of war (albeit comparing my experiences to these, would be like
comparing my one year of Little League, to that of the New York Yankees, by
saying.."Yeah, I played baseball") I can understand and respect some of the
ideals, sentiments,a nd thoughts expressed.  We often wondered (as the
characters do) what's the purpose, is it worth it, questions, that have been
asked through time, and may never have an answer, but this movie tries.
It is brutally honest, straightforward, it is drawn out at times, overly
emotional and lingering at others.  It pulls no punches, reaches into your
soul and brings you there, makes you feel it.  The sounds are all around you,
the visions are exquisite (kudos to cinematographer Jarusz Kaminski, this
movie looks amazing, with some memorable shots), the horror of it all, right
in your lap.
The story involves a team of soldiers, sent to retrieve the lone surviving
brother, of 4, who is somewhere in France during the Normandy invasion of
1944.  Granted, you know what's going to happen, but you just don't know how,
and that is where this movie succeeds.        You are stuck, on the journey, like
it, or not, and the only resolution, is to complete the mission.
The performances, are thoroughly effective as well.  Hanks, is, well, he's
Tom Hanks, he can do epics in his sleep, and he turns another effectively
emotional, but not overly mind blowing (see Forrest Gump) performance. The
remainder of the group, Tom Sizemore, in the best performance yet of his
career, as the loyal grizzled sidekick.  Edward Burns, the talented actor-
director (see Brothers McMullen) as a the required tough Brooklyn-ite (do all
war movies need the token New Yorker) pulls off the doubting Thomas role with
a street tough sentiment.  Of course the hunk-o-the-moment Matt Damon, who
really isn't given much to do, but has an effective presence, and some well-
placed cameos from Ted Danson, and Paul Giamatti (on a role since Howard
Stern phone-whipped him in Private Parts) keep the movie flowing.  But the
kudos in this one, goto a trio of unknowns, Jeremy Davies (The Locusts) as
the reluctant interpreter, Giovanni Ribisi, as the emotional medic, and Barry
Pepper as the sniper, with God on his side.  These three young stars make a
presence, and add to the emotional intensity of this movie, by being
seemingly the most real of the group.
Clocking in at just under three hours, you tend to lose yourself a bit, but
that's the way war was, it was long, it was tiring, and it wasn't pretty or
simple.  This movie is not for the weak of heart, or stomach.  It will
effective reach inside you, leave a bit of itself in you afterwards.  Is it
the best movie of the summer, probably not, as some will say..I won't jump on
the Oscar bandwagon yet, too early.  But in a summer full of brainless,
plotless, emotionless wastes of celluloid, this one stands out as an
effective, if not educational and emotional, way to spend an afternoon.  I
would suggest this one be viewed on the big-screen, in all it's epic glamour.
See more of my Reel Ramblings at
http://www.angelfire.com/ks/nearside/comingatt.html
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Scott Renshaw
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
(DreamWorks)
Starring:  Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies, Matt
Damon, Barry Pepper, Adam Goldberg, Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel.
Screenplay:  Robert Rodat.
Producers:  Steven Spielberg, Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon & Gary Levinsohn.
Director:  Steven Spielberg.
MPAA Rating:  R (intense wartime violence and gore, profanity)
Running Time:  170 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     The first and last image in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, a war story of
shattering visceral and emotional force, is an American flag waving in the
breeze.  It's a bold choice, one that defines what makes this film so
unique among modern war films.  For over 25 years in the post-Vietnam era,
American war films have reminded us over and over again that war is a
chaotic and futile endeavor characterized by gleeful brutality and
morality of convenience.  Even the most well-received examples -- THE DEER
HUNTER, APOCALYPSE NOW, PLATOON, FULL METAL JACKET -- trafficked in
violence and psychological devastation as though they were the only facets
of the wartime experience worth exploring.  The stories were less about
the people in war than about war itself as an existential disease.  Being
"anti-war" had become about as meaningful as being "anti-cancer."
     SAVING PRIVATE RYAN may be the most mature war film ever made,
because it combines the horrifying realism of contemporary war films with
the sense of purpose conveyed in the patriotic adventures of the 1940s.
The primary action begins with the June 6, 1944 invasion of Normandy,
focusing on a Ranger company under the command of Capt. John Miller (Tom
Hanks).  After making it through the first push at Omaha Beach, Miller and
his company find themselves handed a mission with an angle more political
than tactical.  It seems that three Iowa brothers have all been killed in
action, leaving Pvt. James Ryan (Matt Damon) his mother's only surviving
son.  General George Marshall himself decides that Private Ryan _will_
make it home alive, and assigns Miller and his company the task of risking
their lives to save Private Ryan's.
     The reluctance of Miller's men to take on this mission is
understandable, since it's amazing enought that any of them survived the
initial assault on the beach.  Spielberg stages the 25-minute Omaha Beach
sequence as a savage, gut-churning frenzy of torn limbs and bullet-riddled
bodies.  It's hard to begin describing the film artistry involved:  that
half hour is disturbing, surreal, at times darkly humorous, simultaneously
too intense to watch and impossible _not_ to watch.  Some images come and
go with a shivery subliminal quickness; others linger on undisguised human
suffering.  If it had been Spielberg's intent to play a game of wartime
can-you-top-this with his contemporary peers -- and you never believe for
a second that it was -- the contest wouldn't even be close.  Cinematic
warfare has never been more agonizing.
     Nor, in its way, has it ever been more human.  Screenwriter Robert
Rodat crafts Miller and his team as a collection of distinct individuals,
making every death and every anguished decision personal.  Hanks delivers
his finest performance yet as Miller, whose trembling hand betrays demons
his men can only guess at; Barry Pepper radiates steely-eyed confidence as
sharpshooter Pvt. Jackson; Adam Goldberg is slick but determined as the
Jewish Pvt. Mellish, who makes sure every German he encounters knows he
takes this war personally.  The most harrowing performance, however, comes
from Jeremy Davies as Cpl. Upham, the college-educated translator called
into his first duty with gun in hand.  Cliches like "loss of innocence"
don't do justice to the transformation Upham undergoes in a moment of
paralysis which risks the lives of fellow soldiers.  It's even more
disturbing when a German soldier passes Upham as though he were not even
worth the trouble of killing.  In one brilliantly acted scene, Upham's
psyche vanishes into the rubble.
     But cowardice is only one side of the complex story in SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN.  This being a tale of the "last noble war" in American history, it's
also about heroism, though not in a conventional sense.  Faced with an
assignment everyone considers FUBAR -- an acronym for the saltier version
of "fouled up beyond all recognition" -- Miller and his men are forced to
make it make sense.  This is the sort of heroism SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
examines:  not the heroism of men fighting an obviously evil enemy for an
obviously just cause, but the heroism of men taking responsibility for
doing their duty to the best of their ability.  Honor becomes something
quite distinct from the nation's political or military objectives.  It
becomes the ability to make meaning from the hell war always has been and
always will be.
     Steven Spielberg, who set a new standard for himself with SCHINDLER'S
LIST, actually manages to raise that standard in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN,
which isn't to say that it's a perfect film.  John Williams score may not
be as intrusive as it was in AMISTAD -- but then, how _could_ it be? --
but it still underscores scenes best left silent, and one late scene is a
bit too reminiscent of Schindler's "I could have done more" speech.  Yet
even in that moment Spielberg drives home his unique, provocative vision.
Late in the film, a character tells Ryan, "Earn this," handing him the
responsibility for making his life -- and the lives of those who died for
his sake -- matter.  That waving flag which opens and closes SAVING
PRIVATE RYAN is a challenging sort of patriotism, free from self-righteous
over-simplifications like "good war" vs. "bad war."  With the grace and
power of great cinema, Spielberg makes accountability in the midst of
tragedy absolutely individual.  He forces you to stare inward and ask 
whether you've earned this -- this life, this country, this freedom.

Author
Edward Burke
Today, war became a reality to me after seeing a screening of Saving
Priivate Ryan. Steve Spielberg goes beyond reality with his latest
production. The audience is tossed about the theatre witnessing the
horror of war. Please keep the kids home as the R Rating is for reality.
Tom Hanks is stunning as Capt John Miller, set out in France during WW
II to rescue and return home a soldier, Private Ryan (Matt Damon) who
lost three brothers in the War.  Spielberg at time takes us inside the
heads of these individuals as they face death during the horrific battle
scenes.
Private Ryan is not for everyone, but I felt the time was right for a
movie like this to be made. The movie reminds us of the sacrifices made
by our WW II fighting men and women. We must not ever forget them as
many gave the ultimate sacrifice, their lives so that we may live in
freedom today. For this I thank them and for Steve Spielberg for making
a movie that I will never forget.
The Academy will not forget Tom Hanks come April 1999,  as another well
deserved Oscar with be in Tom's posession. 

Author
Luke Buckmaster
REVIEW: Saving Private Ryan
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Matt Damon, Edward Burns, Jeremy Davies,
Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi
Director: Steven Spielberg
Screenplay: Robert Rodat
Australian theatrical release date: November 19, 1998
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece): 5
stars
Only hours after viewing this film, horrifying images of war and
sacrifice haunt my mind.  I know these will last for days, maybe weeks.
Steven Spielberg's Saving Private Ryan is as much about the devastation
of war as it is the nature of human sanity.  This off and on director
challenges the influence and power of contemporary cinema, pushing the
boundaries of his medium as far as he can go and stops just before
bursting into horror and trepidation.  Spielberg pulls all the right
cinematic strings, but ultimately Saving Private Ryan is more of an
experience than it is a movie.
The first half-hour or so is undoubtedly one of the finest pieces in
film history.  It is an excruciating scene set in Ohama Beach, Normandy,
at the time of the D-Day massacre. Cameras pans across the shoreline and
land, capturing American soldiers fighting as they try to reach the
offending troops, many gunned down from higher ground.  The tension is
almost unbearable.
Captain John Miller (Tom Hanks) is the commanding officer of a team
consisting of eight men.  They are assigned to an unusual mission: to
find and retrieve Private James Ryan (Matt Damon), whose mother has
received telegrams and a visit from the priest after her other three
sons were killed in action.  General George Marshall decides that Ryan
will make it home, so Miller and his crew contemplate risking their
eight lives to save one.  Rationalizing between the mission and the men
is never an easy thing for Miller to do; but this time, the mission is a
man.
The sheer visceral force of Saving Private Ryan is enough to evoke all
sorts of reactions, but Spielberg's intentions are more than just to
shock his audience.  With the aid of writer Robert Rodat's (Fly Away
Home) potent screenplay, he examines all aspects of war, whilst never
losing sight of developing character and setting.  This makes the battle
of governments and tactics appear as something much more individual, as
each of the eight men convey their unique demeanors and try to make
sense of a ludicrous war.
Even after his expert performances in Philadelphia, Forrest Gump and
Apollo 13, Tom Hanks has managed to step up a few notches.  Hanks plays
Miller deliberately restrained; he doesn't look like a glorified hero,
he looks like an ordinary man outside of his comfortable environs. Rodat
has crafted Miller as a mysterious leader who is bound by personal
motives to earn his way back to his wife, back to civilization.  "Each
person I kill makes me feel further away from home," Miller explains, as
his feelings begin to unravel.
Jeremy Davies is painfully realistic as Cpl. Upham, a translator who has
never been in combat before.  His harrowing portrayal of a weak willed
man is amongst the film's finest.  Tom Sizemore gives a strong
performance, as does Matt Damon, as does Edward Burns, as does Barry
Pepper.  The entire cast is electric.
Even more impressive than the performances is the stark cinematography
by Janusz Kaminski (Schindler's List, The Lost World) and the tight
direction from Spielberg.  In many scenes hand held cameras were used to
great effect, and they stylize the film with a mixture of clarity and
radiate an overall look of uniqueness.  Saving Private Ryan's visual
overture is fast paced and convincing, as if the events on screen were
as realistic as the war itself.
Deliberately more sentimental that Spielberg's other World War II
masterpiece Schindler's List, Saving Private Ryan is actually an epic
movie, packaged as very much an American flick by the identical opening
and closing images - an US flag waving in the wind.  As one of the great
directors of our time, Steven Spielberg has re-assured us that a picture
can tell a thousand words, and it is those pictures of war and sacrifice
that will continue to lurk in my mind.  Saving Private Ryan almost
beckons us not to label it as a film.  It's an experience.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Jerry Saravia
              Here is director Steven Spielberg at his best, and at his worst.
"Saving Private Ryan" contains some of the best war battle scenes in motion
picture history, thrillingly realized by Spielberg. This movie is also
gratuitously mawkish - a flaw that has not conflicted Spielberg's earlier works
as much as this one does. 
"Private Ryan" begins on D-Day at Omaha Beach, amid a flurry of bullets and
cannon blasts, as the American troops approach the beach to fight the Nazis.
The graphic, brilliantly choreographed footage shows dismembered bodies, in all
their blood, guts and glory. Tom Hanks plays Captain Miller, the leader of his
troop that underwent the furious Omaha assault. Along with the members of his
troop (Edward Burns as the Brooklyn-accented, arrogant soldier, Tom Sizemore as
the tough, devoted Sergeant Horvath, Barry Pepper as the Bible-quoting sniper
Private Jackson, Giovanni Ribisi as the pale medic Wade, and Jeremy Davies as
the bony, scared Corporal Upham), they go on assignment to find a Private Ryan
from another platoon stationed in the French countryside. It turns out Ryan is
the sole surviving brother of the enlisted four who died in action. As one
soldier remarks, "This Ryan better be worth it" - he better be if they are
going to fight more Nazis.
"Saving Private Ryan" is terrifically frightening and compelling in its battle
scenes, particularly the final epic battle in Normandy amid rubble and wobbly
tanks. It's the dramatic scenes between the platoon soldiers that reeks of
clichés and sentimental hogwash - Oliver Stone could have given Spielberg a
couple of pointers on how to frame these talented actors against such a hellish
landscape. The movie's framing device, involving a prologue and coda set in a
cemetery in remembrance of D-Day, is nonessential considering the genuine power
of the story itself. 
What works extremely well in "Private Ryan" is the maturity and frailty of
Captain Miller, wonderfully played by Tom Hanks. Miller's trembling hand and
sorrowful glances suggests that he's only human and can surely fail in such a
mission. Hanks also suggests that even in an apocalyptic frenzy, a heroism can
still exist, however unwanted considering he's an English teacher, not John
Wayne. 
My other favorite character is the arrogant soldier played by Edward Burns
("The Brothers McMullen") who refuses to play by the rules. I also enjoyed
Jeremy Davies ("Spanking the Monkey") as the cowardly Corporal Upham who loves
hearing Edith Piaf on the radio, but is choked with terror by the possibility
of picking up a rifle. 
"Saving Private Ryan" brings us as close to the mechanics of battle as any
other war film, but Spielberg and screenwriter Robert Rodat seems to think that
any war, no matter how unjustified, still warrants a hint of heroism and
bravery. By now, we know that any war is not worth dying for, even for your own
country - a sentiment I thought had long died with the heroics of John Wayne
and the Green Berets and all those romanticized propaganda films. Just look at
the war on Vietnam broadcast to millions in the 60's that left a bitter taste
in every American's mouth. For a true look at the dehumanizing effects of war,
check out "Platoon," "Paths of Glory," "Manchurian Candidate," and "Full Metal
Jacket." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at Faust667@aol.com or at
jerry@movieluver.com 

Author
Alex Fung
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (DreamWorks - 1998)
Starring Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies,
  Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi,
  Matt Damon
Screenplay by Robert Rodat
Produced by Steven Spielberg, Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn
Directed by Steven Spielberg
Running time: 169 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned.
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   A sight which never fails to affect me is the annual commemoratory
   gatherings of WWII veterans at war monuments.  It's been over fifty
   years since the curtain fell on the last Great War, and the young men
   who then risked life and limb to fight for their country are now
   aging seniors.  As their numbers dwindle with time and the ceremonies
   now barely rate a five-second blurb with the youth-obsessed media, I
   can't help but be terribly moved to witness these elderly men, in
   full uniform and decorated with ribbons and medals, ignoring the
   protests of their weary bodies as they march with fierce pride and
   solemnly salute their fallen comrades.  I'm overwhelmed with a sense
   of gratitude for the sacrifices and horrors to which these men have
   subjected themselves for the greater good, and saddened by the
   disinterest of the press and the public alike as indicated by the
   sparse attendance of the proceedings.  Shamefully, we have forgotten.
   Steven Spielberg's film, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, attempts to address
   this situation by honouring these valiant soldiers.
   A noble goal, to be sure, but good intentions don't necessarily
   translate into a good film; it's dangerous to fall into the trap of
   judging a film based upon the worthiness of its subject matter.  At
   its best, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is a staggering achievement of
   verisimilitude, recreating the stark terror of the battlefield as
   perhaps no film has ever done before.  Narratively symmetric, it
   opens with a washed-out shot of the stars and stripes fluttering in
   the wind, a present-day war cemetery sequence, and a spectacular
   half-hour battle scene, and closes with a reversal of the same
   elements, in effect coming full circle, although the picture's
   systematic emotional bombardment will undoubtedly result in the
   audience leaving the screening in a markedly different state of mind
   than that as they entered.
   The opening battle segment on the shores of Omaha Beach during the
   D-Day assault is particularly stunning, impressing at once the
   hellish atmosphere of mayhem and carnage, and perhaps most
   significantly, the notion of futility.  History informs us that we
   (referring to the Allied forces) won Omaha, and yet the film
   unblinkingly presents us to the chaos of our troops being mowed down
   in hails of bullets, shredded to pieces by explosives, blood and
   entrails splattering and spilling everywhere, with the cries and
   screams of the wounded and terrified only muted by detonations and
   the sound of ammunition tearing through flesh.  (Curiously enough,
   although SAVING PRIVATE RYAN barely straddled the line between an R
   and the dreaded NC-17 rating from the MPAA, in Ontario it's been
   designated with a relatively biteless rating of AA -- adult
   accompaniment required for under-14s, far weaker than the Rs
   inexplicably given for tame fare such as HIGH ART and HENRY FOOL.)
   Impeccably staged by Mr. Spielberg and captured with the stark,
   glamourless flavour of authentic combat footage by cinematographer
   Janusz Kaminski, the net effect is intensely assaulting and at once
   captures the immense suffering of the soldiers.
   The film wisely decides to forego introductions to the troops prior
   to the battle -- although we immediately latch upon the recognizable
   visage of our modern equivalent to the Jimmy Stewart-ish Everyman,
   Tom Hanks -- lending an unexpected sense of despair to the
   proceedings; not provided with the tools to be allowed to relate to
   the slaughtered onscreen victims as characters and heroes, we're
   forced to view them simply as men, and consequently the bitter
   sentiment of wasted lives is palpable.  Smartly, Mr. Spielberg never
   provides a malevolent close-up of the Axis snipers during the first
   half of this battle -- the Allieds are essentially being attacked by
   a faceless enemy -- and he refrains from indulging in emblematic
   jingoism, avoiding the blatant use of the hateful Nazi swastika until
   quite late in the game; from a larger, philosophical perspective,
   this was a just war, but strictly on the microscopic level of this
   battleground as inspected by this film, principles such as right and
   wrong, good and evil, and heroes and villains don't enter into the
   fray: both sides being humanized, these are men fighting just to stay
   alive.  When the Allied troops are able to topple the German
   stronghold, the mood isn't that of triumphant euphoria or jubilation,
   but of unadulterated relief.
   The Omaha segment is so impressively achieved that it almost seems
   curmudgeonly to point out how clunky the film's screenplay,
   particularly the dialogue, becomes during the middle segment as the
   plot unfolds before giving way to the extended closing battle
   sequence.  Assigned to locate and retrieve a Pvt. James Ryan in a
   goodwill mission, Cpt. John Miller (Mr. Hanks) and his men -- Sgt.
   Horvath (Tom Sizemore), Pvts. Reiben (Edward Burns), Jackson (Barry
   Pepper), Mellish (Adam Goldberg) and Caparzo (Vin Diesel), Medic Wade
   (Giovanni Ribisi), and later, a green translator, Cpl. Upham (Jeremy
   Davies) -- are sent behind enemy lines, and much moralizing and
   philosophizing is performed.  It's all well-intentioned but
   comparatively ineffective in terms of execution, rife with contrived,
   Oscar-ready outbursts of introspection, banter which neither sounds
   genuinely naturalistic nor adequately addresses the issues raised on
   any more than a surface level, and a propensity to lend unearned
   gravity to profundities which lean more towards hokiness than
   provocation.  There's also the problem of tone: the film clearly
   endeavours to capture the aura of a wartorn Europe as seen through
   the bleary eyes of our heroes, and yet two unnecessary comic bits are
   interjected which seem suited for sitcom-level storytelling; it's
   surprising that the film so willingly and needlessly undermines its
   achieved ambiance.  The film's middle stretch has interludes of
   dramatic interest and some thematic exploration, but it's hardly
   groundshattering material.
   SAVING PRIVATE RYAN's arduous middle section would probably be even
   more problematic if not for its direction.  I'm not convinced that
   Mr. Spielberg is The Great Filmmaker Of Our Time; he's indisputably
   made some Great Films (including JAWS, RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, and
   SCHINDLER'S LIST), but, as I recently remarked to a colleague, in a
   reality where Martin Scorsese still walks the Earth, designating Mr.
   Spielberg as America's finest filmmaker (as Time Magazine recently
   declared) is sheer folly.  Nonetheless, he's a director of not
   inconsequential strengths, chief of which is his ability to elicit an
   emotional reaction from his audience; Mr. Spielberg can easily lay
   claim to the title of Master of Emotional Manipulation.  It's a trait
   most conducive to exploitation for this film's subject matter.  I
   appreciated the simple but effective manner of layering several
   voice-overs reading different condolence telegrams as the camera
   panned across a busy room to convey the enormity and tragedy of the
   war, and particularly liked the use of silence accompanying a bit
   with a secretary wordlessly shuffling between three letters and then
   rushing off to draw the attention of her supervisor.  With nary a
   word, the onscreen implications are brutally clear; indeed, what
   words are suitable for such a grievous loss?  It's a much more subtle
   touch than a later monologue by Harve Presnell (performed well,
   incidentally) involving a stirring letter reading.
   For the most part, the film eschews subtlety for the use of emblems,
   both literal and figurative.  Not only does SAVING PRIVATE RYAN open
   and close with a colour-muted shot of the American flag, its vibrancy
   literally drained from it, but it epitomizes in wholesome Pvt. Ryan
   (Matt Damon) the spirit of America; it's no accident that he's from
   Iowa, dead center in the heartland of America, and that his family
   background is in that most American of professions, farming.  (When
   Pvt. Ryan's mother appears onscreen, she's even in the kitchen --
   kudos to the filmmakers for the restraint of not depicting her baking
   an apple pie.)  When Cpt. Miller addresses Pvt. Ryan, particularly at
   a pivotal moment late in the film, he's essentially speaking to the
   audience.  However, the audience surrogate in the picture is not that
   of Pvt. Ryan, but of Cpl. Upham, a nervous wreck thrown into battle
   for the first time.  Like him, we're seeing the horrors of the war
   through startled, inexperienced and idealistic eyes, and consequently
   we're simultaneously dismayed and empathetic at his limited
   effectiveness as a soldier.  Though it was an interesting touch to
   encapsulate the entire conflict into a single scenario -- a German
   soldier killing a Jew as an American soldier stands by helplessly --
   I was most impressed with the film's cynical lesson about the
   consequences of moral righteousness at wartime, an unexpected bit of
   grimness atypical for a film in Mr. Spielberg's oeuvre (although it's
   disappointingly tempered and dulled by a cathartic counterresponse
   which, while audience-pleasing, plays false).
   While SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is far from flawless, during its best
   stretches there are moments of sheer visceral bravura.  Its
   recreation of battles, with the sea literally awash with blood and
   soldiers being slain with horrifying ease, is a testament to the real
   brutality of war.  It's a price which our WWII veterans paid on our
   behalf, and it's something that we should not forget.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Author
Brandon Stahl
 It took me too long to see Saving Private Ryan - I finally saw the
movie the second time it was released. No one wanted to see it with
me; either they had already seen it or just afraid to go, they heard
about the Omaha Beach scene. They knew what they were in for. It's not
a buddy movie, a date movie, it's not an independent film. It's an
experience, and sometimes those can be hard to watch.
 After the academy had deemed it Oscar worthy, after the accolades and
the money and the praise heaped upon Spielberg and Hanks, and it was
released a second time, I finally dragged the first available
person. I wasn't going to miss out.
 It is the best movie of war I have ever seen. It competes with All
Quiet on the Western Front, Platoon, The Best Years of Our Lives and
Patton. But to me, it rises above those films because the experience
stayed with me long after the theater. Yes, Omaha beach will long be
in my memory, but so will the scene of the grunt trying to save the
girl from sniper attack in the rainy French village; the final battle
where men are slaughtered in hopes of saving a bridge, the moment on
the stairs where a soldier confronts cowardice (which to me, resonates
as one of the most realistic war scenes ever filmed. Of course in war
there are heroes, but where there are heroes, there must be
cowards. We don't see them in movies too often, but it frightens us
more than death.)
 After three hours of Ryan, the audience didn't walk away from the
theater easily. We were quiet as we left, many in tears, careful about
the words we chose and who would hear what we say. Ryan is a movie
that must be spoken of with the utmost care. You don't want to detract
anything from the experience.
 Much has been written about the landing at Omaha beach; the absolute
carnage, terror and shock. I never realized, even after reading the
reviews, that those soldiers were simply sitting ducks in battle. You
almost smell the blood mixing with the beach water. It is a triumph
that any man made it off that beach alive.
 Ryan is honest, violent, and pulls your emotional strings at the
right time, so you don't feel manipulated but instead shock, even
fear. We weep because we have no other way of expressing what we're
watching. He opens and closes the film with a US flag. Pride?
Patriotism? Yes, but it's also a lesson not to take anything for
granted.
 What's the point in reviewing a movie that doesn't need any else to
say "Go see it?" Because it fills you with so much emotion and visual
horror that a way of cleansing is to write and talk about it. After I
got home from the theater I didn't say much of anything at all, only
thankful that I watched it, and I wasn't there.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
        Approximately one week after my largely critical review of
"Saving Private Ryan" appeared on the Internet, I've become the target
of many readers' anger.  New mail continues to flood into my mailbox
every hour, saying pretty much the same thing: "You don't know what you're
talking about!  This is the best movie of the year!" etc.
        I've responded to the majority of these messages, but since I've
basically found myself saying the same things over and over, I've decided
to write this public addendum.  This will be my final word on the movie:
I've moved on to other reviews, and since each lengthy "SPR" reply takes
fifteen minutes or more to complete, I must now look ahead or face the
possibility of getting behind in my viewing of new films.
Here are some of the more articulate charges which have been leveled
at me (some messages have been edited slightly to remove profanity and
correct minor typos):
        While I regret that my comments have offended so many people,
I do not apologize for my opinion.  As a film critic, I have to identify
the good and the negative as I see them.  I am not on a personal vendetta
against this, or any, film.  One reader accuses me of trashing the movie
simply because everyone else likes it, assumedly to draw attention to
myself.  Not so.  I saw the film on opening day, before I'd read a single
review or heard any comments.  Only later did I discover that my opinion
was in the minority. (My exact words: "When so many people disagree
with me, then hey, maybe it's just me.")  As I said in my disclaimer,
which apparently this reader didn't bother to look at, I never had any
intention of reviewing the movie.  It was only because I received several
e-mails which specifically asked for my opinion that I compiled my notes
into a critique.
        For the record, I didn't hate "Saving Private Ryan."  The war
scenes are well-done, and as stated previously, Tom Hanks does his usual
wonderful job.  Is the film significantly flawed?  In my eyes, yes.
But if the movie fails on a spectacular basis, it's only because it risks
so much more than the average film.  For that reason alone, Spielberg has
my respect.
        This doesn't change the fact that the opening sequence is
irrelevent to the story line, and that the characters border on
caricature.  I found the film terribly unfocused, as if Spielberg did not
know what he wished to do.  Is he trying to show the horrors of warfare?
A documentary would've been more effective.  Or was Speilberg trying
to make a character-intensive drama?  If so, the war footage appears
intrusive.  One reader criticises me for attacking something as
"inconsequential as character development."  I'm sorry, but character
development is an important part of ANY drama.  If Spielberg didn't
want to develop his characters, I reiterate: he should've made a
documentary.  By attempting to create both The Greatest War Film Ever
Made and a Touching Drama, he has, in my opinion, distilled the effects
of both.
        In my own defense: the review of "Saving Private Ryan" which
appeared on rec.arts.movies.reviews was an early draft; the later
version is available on my website.  While the criticisms are basically
the same, I did elaborate a bit more on certain points.
        I will also note that after my review appeared, I spotted two
other critical essays about the film.  The Raleigh "Independent," a local
newspaper, gave the film one star out of a possible five.  Another
Internet film critic, whose name I didn't catch, gave the film two stars
out of a possible five.  Both cited many of the same flaws that I did.
I'm pleased to learn that I'm not the only one who spotted problems; I
was honestly beginning to wonder.
And one piece of information I was grateful to receive:
(Thanks to Amy Snyder Hale for sharing this with me.)
        One reader, however, sent me a message so profound that it has
actually given me pause.  She writes:
    This is an excellent point, and it's one that I quite frankly had
not considered.  That's great food-for-thought, and who knows?  It may
prompt me to significantly re-think my opinion of the movie.  Thank you,
Linda.
        I'd also like to thank those of you who wrote me kind messages,
thanking me for not sugar-coating my opinion and for stating how I
honestly felt.  You're welcome.  I will continue to do so.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **** (out of 4 = excellent)
1998, R, 170 minutes [2 hours, 50 minutes]
starring: Tom Hanks (Captain Miller); Tom Sizemore (Sergeant Horvath), Edward
Burns (Private Reiben), Jeremy Davies (Corporal Upham); written by Robert
Rodat; produced by Ian Bryce, Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn; Steven Spielberg;
directed by Steven Spielberg.
Seen August 8, 1998 at 6 p.m. at Rotterdam Square Cinemas (Rotterdam, NY),
theater #6, by myself for free using my Sony/Loews critic's pass. [theater
rating: ***: good seats, sound, and picture]
        War is a topic that can't help but be glorified any way it is portrayed by
the media. Movies, documentaries, and even history books have a way of making
the darker side of humanity exciting since the most general aspects are
focused on, such as strategy, politics, and victory. It's easy to forget war,
in its most basic form, is a battle of armies out to slaughter each other.
Forgotten more easily is the fact that each soldier, no matter what his rank
or importance, is a real flesh-and-blood person and not just a number. "Saving
Private Ryan" is one of the few films that dares play up this aspect,
especially in its unapologetic, realistic delivery. It proves there's a huge
difference between battling and killing.
        The film opens with one of the most graphic, disturbing scenes in recent
memory. It's World War II, D-Day to be exact, and the U.S. military is
invading Omaha Beach where the Nazis are more than ready for them. Spielberg
uses many techniques to create for a total sense of reality. Instead of
positioned cameras, the footage here seems to have been shot by camera
operators running alongside soldiers as if they were just as scared. There is
no sense of stability, but of constant, anxious, and confusing motion, giving
us the feeling of being in the middle of the battle, and just a vulnerable as
the poor troops.
        "Poor" is a proper word to describe how pathetic and yet innocent the men
fighting are. There is little to no dialogue throughout the loud battle and no
prologue to define any characters. We don't get the feeling these are handsome
actors playing heroic roles, but that these are men about to kill and be
killed for reasons beyond their understanding. The Nazis are not portrayed as
enemies to be hated, but as people that must be destroyed because they're
there.
        In the movies, the good guys can run through a firestorm of bullets and bombs
and not get a scratch, but in reality that wouldn't happen. The men have
nothing to shield or protect them besides some metal flanks and dead bodies.
They are sitting ducks and we realize this through the perspective of the
well-secured Germans who can actually see who, what, and where they're
shooting, unlike the Americans who must fire in a general direction to avoid
getting their heads blown off.
        Perhaps the film is flawed by not providing any backstory on the war itself
and who the men really are, but that seems to be part of the theme. The film
seems to rely on the audience's sense of patriotism, that the American
military is "right" and good and that the Nazis are "inherently evil." The
battle scene eventually focuses on a group of men who have miraculously
survived and made their way close to the enemy stronghold (a whole 50-foot
progression), and begin to inflict some damage. I have to admit that once the
first glimpse of victory over the Nazis sprang up, I couldn't help but feel
some sense of joy and relief. To triumph against all odds is a cliche to be
sure, but there's nothing cliche about the graphic, detailed, atmosphere here
because it really happened.
        One of the most surprising aspects of the film is how little story
construction there is, and yet the events that take place make sense and are
interesting. The plot is practically irrelevant since the film is more
concerned with the reality of the war and the soldiers we meet. Tom Hanks
stars as Captain Miller, a relatively average man who happens to be the leader
of a platoon. He's never obsessive or any such generic, cartoonish
characteristic that might dominate a character like this. He doesn't want to
be there any more than his men, but when he is given a mission he intends to
carry it out. The mission the film is concerned with is, as the title states,
saving Private Ryan. 
        Through a series of command started by an ordinary clerical worker, it is
brought to a general's attention that three brothers from Iowa have been
killed in action and their mother will receive notices of each's death
simultaneously. When they learn a fourth brother is stationed somewhere in
Europe, they make it a top priority to have him returned safely to his mother.
It's easy to sympathize with this situation, after all, no one should have to
lose all their children at once. But finding one man in this war is, as Miller
puts it, "Like trying to find a needle in a stack of needles."
        The saving of Private Ryan isn't just a dramatic device, but a thematic one.
His salvation represents the sense of innocence the country, the world even,
was trying to convince itself it still had. When Miller's company hears of the
mission, they scoff at the idea assuming he is dead, but Miller isn't so quick
to shrug it off. He knows the only thing that can really save soldiers from
death is hope, and now he has the opportunity to make someone's sense of hope
a reality.
        The mission to find Ryan gives Miller's group a destination, but not
direction. Along the way many things happen to them, both good and bad. A few
battles are fought, not to be major accomplishments for the war, but because
they encounter German soldiers and have no other choice. The act of killing
itself becomes one of the film's major philosophical metaphors. The soldiers
don't mind killing other soldiers in blind battle, but when they come across a
lone survivor who begs them to let him go, they can barely stop themselves
from killing him in cold blood as some kind of vengeance for their losses.
        Unfortunately, death is a fact of war, and most films try to avoid it when it
comes to the main characters, but here Spielberg doesn't want us to think
these men are invincible. In fact, only a small amount of color and
personality is sketched into each man, and the performances are good enough to
make this method work. Although the characters are somewhat typical, the
actors maintain control over the material at all time. Whether they're arguing
with each other, telling stories of back home, or fighting the Germans, they
never go overboard and always seem believable. Sure, there's a zinger here and
there, but war doesn't change the fact boys will be boys. If and when one dies
we too can feel the loss, even though we hardly knew them.
        The final act brings the story full circle with another tremendous, violent
battle sequence. Private Ryan has been found, but facing four to one odds, can
the Americans defeat the Germans and keep Ryan alive? That's not a premise for
thrills, it's symbolic of everything the film has worked for. It would be
wrong to say the film has either a happy or sad ending, it ends the way it
must end.
        I remember reading a "Calvin & Hobbes" comic strip where Calvin asked his dad
something like, "Dad, how do armies of men killing each other solve problems?"
"Saving Private Ryan" is the adult version of that question.


Author
Brian Takeshita
Steven Spielberg has been a successful director for about 25 years.
Like anyone else, he's had his share of less-than stellar movies
during his career, but when he nails it, watch out. SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN reminds us all that Spielberg is still very much the master.
In Spielberg's latest film, Tom Hanks plays U.S. Army Ranger Captain
John Miller.  In June of 1944, three days after landing on the beach
at Normandy, Captain Miller and several of his men are charged with
finding and bringing back to safety Private James Francis Ryan (Matt
Damon), a paratrooper who dropped into France with the 101st Airborne
the night before the D-Day invasion.  Ryan's three older brothers, all
serving in the Army, were killed in action within days of each other,
and General George Marshall himself has ordered that Mrs. Ryan will
not lose another son.
Unlike many war movies, the characters in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN are not
sure how they feel about their mission for most of the film.  Getting
men killed in battle is justifiable because the death of one man
probably saves many others, but going to retrieve Ryan is inherently a
backwards idea because the lives of many are being risked to save one.
It is this dilemma which is a source of conflict not only within the
unit, but for each individual as he questions just what is worth
fighting for.
Miller is a character who is tactically proficient both on the
battlefield and when dealing with the personalities of his men.
There's a scene where the soldiers under his command turn on each
other, and the way he defuses the situation is unexpected and
ingenious.  He also proves himself to be very smart, at one point
musing about the Allied strategy of the Normady campaign, and Rommel's
probable avenue of counterattack.  This rises him above the level of
the average soldier (who usually doesn't see beyond his immediate
situation), and therefore makes him very likable.  While he often
plays the part of the infallible leader, we also see him in moments of
catharsis, which give his character a surprising depth.  Portraying
Miller, Hanks delivers what is perhaps his finest performance to date,
running the emotional gamut and being consistently convincing.  You
really believe him when he says he's on this mission to earn the right
to go home.
As is usually the case, Miller's men are a cross-section of
backgrounds, but rather than focus on their differences as a source of
conflict, screenwriter Robert Rodat has instead chosen to show how
their common experiences have homogenized them.  More impressive is
that none of the characters are throwaways; each is given appropriate
screen time to be featured and developed.  A few notables include
Sergeant Horvath (Tom Sizemore), Miller's right-hand man, Corporal
Upham (Jeremy Davies), a young innocent who has no combat experience
but comes along as a French and German translator, and Private Reiben
(Edward Burns), the soldier who most vocally questions the mission.
Through good writing by Rodat, clear direction by Spielberg, and solid
performances by the actors, Miller's unit is one of sympathetic
characters whom we fear for in the dangerous moments and laugh with in
lighter times.
Credit must be given to Spielberg for showing restraint in several
areas.  Symbolism such as literal metaphor and religious imagery are
abound in the film, but are often so subtle, you'll miss it if you're
not paying attention.  A lesser director might have pounded us over
the head with obvious sights and close-ups of particular objects, but
Spielberg is instead content to use character actions and dialog to
convey messages.  Additionally, John Williams's score is an almost
latent enhancement to the film, not the majestic composition we would
expect from the oft Spielberg-collaborator.  To do any more would have
been too intrusive.
Much of the quality of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is found in the details.  A
soldier taps a rifle magazine against his helmet before shoving it
home into his carbine.  Another remarks that "tracers point both
ways."  When reporting what they've seen, Miller's men are specific,
using "Panzers, Tigers, and MG-42's" instead of merely "tanks and
machineguns."  The research done in making this film is pervasive, and
it pays off.
Be warned:  This film is not for children, nor the squeamish.  The
first 25 minutes or so concentrates on the amphibious landing at Easy
Green Sector of Omaha Beach, and is some of the bloodiest footage I
have ever seen.  However, Spielberg does not include the images of
soldiers with lost limbs and open wounds simply for the sake of making
a battle scene.  Rather, he immerses the viewer in the chaotic and
horrible nature of battle by portraying the violence as close to
reality as possible.  This is enhanced by employing a handheld camera
whenever combat occurs throughout the film, and there is scarcely an
angle that is not from the soldier's point of view.  To further the
effect, these scenes are also photographed with a look resembling
footage from the era, with off-tinted colors and a certain degree of
graininess.  There are also moments where dialog is nearly
unintelligible, either drowned out by the sounds of war, or lost in
the overlapping shouts of confusion.  Odd for a movie, where the
audience must usually hear everything, this technique greatly
contributes to the realism.
"Unforgettable" would be a good word to describe this film, although a
million more could still not do it justice.  Sounds, dialog, and
sights (including an incredible one of the ships, men, and barrage
balloons at Omaha Beach on D-Plus-Three) make seeing this film an
experience.  The stark realism takes such a toll on the viewer, and
leaves in his or her mind such indelible images that it will pervade
one's conscience for a long time.  The portrayal of heroism,
confusion, and fear is so thought-provoking, you will want to discuss
many of the film's points the next day.  Immediately after leaving the
theater, however, the impact will be so great, you may not be able to
talk at all.  Quite simply, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is one of the best
films of all time.

Author
Bill Chambers
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN **** (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers; wchamber@netcom.ca
starring Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Edward Burns, Matt Damon
screenplay by Robert Rodat
directed by Steven Spielberg
In this fictional but truthful picture, Tom Hanks stars as Captain
Miller; his squadron has just survived D-Day at Omaha Beach when they
are reassigned. Essentially a P.R. move from the head office, Miller and
his seven men must search for a missing paratrooper, one Private James
Francis Ryan-whose three brothers have been killed in action-and send
him home to his distraught mother. The search leads them across French
battlefields... I suppose it's not giving away too much to say that they
eventually locate Ryan (Damon) and discover their moral duty as soldiers
in an active war surpasses the exact definition of their mission.
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is possibly the most violent movie I have ever seen.
At least, it seemed that way because of its connection to history and,
in the second half of the film, my emotional attachment to the
characters. In addition to Miller, we have Sgt. Horvath (Sizemore), who
collects dirt from the various places he's travelled; New Yorker Pvt.
Reiben (Burns), eager to impress with attitude; gentle T/4 Medic Wade
(Giovanni Ribisi), whom at one point recopies a letter for a dead
soldier so that it is not mailed-out bloodstained; lone-Jew Pvt. Mellish
(Adam Goldberg), for whom the war has obviously become deeply personal;
Cpl. Upham (Jeremy Davies), a gun-shy translator fluent in French and
German; God-fearing Pvt. Jackson (Barry Pepper) and Pvt. Caprazo (Vin
Diesel), both exemplary servicemen.
I have just done what the filmmakers basically resist: breaking the
squadron down into genre types. The soldiers remain ordinary human
beings in unpredictable circumstances to the bitter end, by turns
cowardly, certifiable, happy, melancholy, etc. If one of them dies, we
feel as sad as if another of them dies. Like combat, such deaths are
always shocking and instantaneous. Spielberg's latest film doesn't just
have a generic, you-are-there feeling: his camera zigzags like a scared
LIFE photographer trapped in the heat of the action, racing behind the
troops, falling into the sea, dizzily lingering on some gruesome
carnage, like the man who is searching for his missing arm, or the boy
who takes off his shot helmet in relief only to be killed seconds later.
The layered story places its anti-violent and anti-war sentiments
clearly up-front: the only way to hammer home the horror of armed
conflict is to display it uncensored. At one point, Reiben asks, Why
risk the eight of us for one guy?' and the irony was not lost on me:
nobody questions the validity of their involvement in WWII, a P.R. move
at its heart, also.
Which is why I'm only hesitant about the final shot of the movie: an
American flag flapping in the breeze. Proudly? That's open to debate; I
never felt SAVING PRIVATE RYAN was particularly patriotic, to its
credit. This is a smaller story than "America's War Effort". I'll
unabashedly admit it reduced me to tears. If it takes a popular
entertainment to put into context for so many young people what has
mostly been relegated to dryly-written textbooks, thank goodness it is
one of integrity and catharsis.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     "What the hell do we do now, sir?" the discombobulated grunt asks
his equally nonplussed captain.  The captain has lost most of his men
in what appears certain to be a rout.  As soon as their landing craft
hit the beach, most of his troops were slaughtered before they could
get out.  A few jumped into the sea only to be shot underwater while
attempting to remove their heavy packs.  The water has turned a blood
red from the massive bleeding of thousands of dead soldiers.
     It is June 6, 1944 at Omaha Beach.  By the end of the day the
battle, which looked at first like a monstrous disaster, will turn into
one of the greatest victories in modern military history.
     As the wise Captain John Miller, the man whose unit has almost
vanished, Tom Hanks gives the most reserved performance of his career -
reserved, but no less brilliant.  Hanks plays a man who prefers being
an enigma to the men under his command.  They take bets on when he will
finally reveal his occupation in civilian life.  Why this is a mystery
is a mystery in itself.  Mild mannered but self-assured John Miller
doesn't look like a man who would want or need to hide his past.
     SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is director Steven Spielberg's best film since
SCHINDLER'S LIST.  A moving war picture that takes neither an overly
pacifist nor patriotic approach, it avoids shameless manipulation of
the audience's emotions.  The war itself is shown so realistically that
the reaction of many viewers may be similar to mine.  I wanted to go to
a private corner and cry my eyes out after the movie finished.
     The film opens in the present with a dramatic scene of an old man
leading a private procession to a military cemetery.  With his extended
family behind him, he stares at a white cross in a sea of crosses and
breaks into tears.
     Part of a strong cast, GOOD WILL HUNTING's Matt Damon plays
Private Ryan.  Private Ryan's three brothers have been killed in the
same week in battle so the top brass sends Captain Miller and a small
crew out to locate the private and bring him home to safety.  Edward
Burns, Jeremy Davies, Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Tom
Sizemore and Giovanni Ribisi play the soldiers accompanying the captain
on the rescue mission.
     Since Private Ryan has parachuted behind the German lines, finding
him is a dangerous operation akin to finding the proverbial needle in a
haystack.  The captain's men resent the mission to prevent Private
Ryan's mother from losing all of her sons.  They argue that they have
mothers too.  As they start to be killed off, their cynicism increases
and then turns bitter toward this Private Ryan, whom they've never met.
Full of twists and turns, their quest is long and torturous.
     John William's heroic music for the film is sweeping in its
grandeur, yet never overwhelms the more delicate moments.
     SCHINDLER'S LIST's Academy Award winning cinematographer Janusz
Kaminski is as good in the intimate moments as the dramatic ones.  When
the men rest inside a church, he uses a warm natural lighting to show
reverence toward the men's battle worn faces.  When the captain goes up
on a ridge, the camera captures him in shadow with all of the drama of
a Life magazine cover.  Finally, Kaminski uses the handheld camera to
good effect during the battle sequences.  As it bounces up and down,
you can feel the jitters of the fighting men, and the chaos of the
battle.
     Between scenes that take your breath away, Robert Rodat's script
is smart enough to throw in a little much-needed humor.  Fighting a war
vicariously can take an enormous toll on an audience.  Watching men
necessarily reduced to animals fighting for survival may be hard to
watch, but this film of Spielberg's is movie making at its best.  It is
an experience sometimes hard to endure but not to be missed.
     SAVING PRIVATE RYAN runs 2:48.  It is rated R for profanity and
strong violence and would be fine for mature teenagers.

Author
Jamey Hughton
   More MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton at:  http://welcome.to/movieviews
In Steven Spielberg's newest film, he demonstrates what the word war
really means. Utter, complete hell. And then he pits us there, right in
the middle of the most realistic battle scene ever experienced on
screen.
That scene is the landing on Omaha Beach, which starts off Saving
Private Ryan and then doesn't end for a painful and unquestionably
brutal 25 minutes into the movie. The deaths are not quick and painless
like in other war movies. Men have their limbs blown off left and right,
blood splatters in every direction, young soldiers lay on the ground
holding their own guts screaming for their "mommy", all of which sends
shivers down your spine.
Spielberg's three hour WWII epic is a masterful achievement that ranks
easily as one of the best movies of the year. But that doesn't mean it's
perfect. There are some moments when you feel the final impact should
have been more dramatically satisfying. But still, after two films (The
Lost World and Amistad) that I thought weren't up to Spielberg's average
quota, this one will set him back on track.
The Private Ryan of the title is one of four brothers fighting in World
War II. After the other three are killed in battle, a squad is sent out
to recover the remaining Ryan (played by Matt Damon) and bring him back
safely to his family. Leading the platoon is shaky captain Miller (Tom
Hanks, wonderful), and a loyal soldier who always sticks by his side
(the surprisingly commanding Tom Sizemore). Jeremy Davies plays a
frightened translator to such a stunning effect for a rookie player, and
the young cast shows they are capable of the most grating of tasks: to
hold their own in a Spielberg movie.
When the squad finally finds Ryan, 2/3 of the way into this three-hour
film, he turns out to be a stubborn yet likeable lad who doesn't want to
leave his platoon behind. This means Hanks and his team must stay to
defend one of the last remaining bridges from incoming Nazi's, in a
final sequence that is one of the most incredible scenes I've ever
witnessed on screen. The editing is marvelous, done to near perfection,
and once the smoke clears the final impact of the amazing battle will
stay with you long after you exit the theater.
Saving Private Ryan is one of the best war films of our time, standing
strong next to Glory and Platoon. When Steven Spielberg has a vision, it
usually seems to work out. Unlike his mindless rampaging dino movie of
1997, this is a true vision. And it seemed to work out just fine.
Jamey Hughton writes a Published Column
  in The StarPhoenix (Saskatoon, Sk Canada)
    and was a 1999 Writing Finalist in the
      Canadian YTV Achievement Awards.

Author
David Wilcock
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
(DREAMWORKS)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 48 MINUTES.
STARRING TOM HANKS, EDWARD BURNS, TOM SIZEMORE AND MATT DAMON
DIRECTED BY STEVEN SPIELBERG
Already being hailed as the 'Greatest War Movie Ever Made,'  Saving Private
Ryan is an harrowing, saddening and riveting movie. It may not be the
greatest war movie in my opinion, but it's certainly one of the best war
movies made, and one of the best of 1998. Tom Hanks stars as a Captain
who's troop has to find Private Ryan (Damon) who has a ticket home because
his three brothers have been killed in action. Action, drama and even some
humour occur as the troop journeys through wartime France to find him.
After the disappointing Amistad (1997) Spielberg has returned to form with
this excellent movie. I'm not the war movie genre biggest fan, but I found
this film to be gripping, and very scary, thanks to the excellent cast,
direction and terrifying battle scenes. Tom Hanks is superb, straying away
from his usually soppy dramatic roles, such as in Forrest Gump (1994). This
time, he plays the role with gritty realism, and is much better for it.
Occasionally he overacts the sentimentally, but he generally delivers a fine
performance. Edward Burns, looking a lot like Armageddon's Ben Affleck, also
delivers a top notch performance, moving away from his roles in films such
as She's The One (1996) Tom Sizemore makes less of an impact, but is still
watchable, and Matt Damon reinforcing his position as one of the finest
young actors working today.
Spielberg directs very well, putting the audience right in the heart of the
action of the battle scenes. And what battle scenes they are! They're truly
terrifying, yet the audience cannot drag their eyes away from the screen.
The battle scenes are filmed with a jerky hand-held camera, and the panic
and confusion felt by the soldiers is emphasized by this technique. The gore
and violence isn't spared either, which body parts flying, and blood
spurting. This film is certainly not for kids and sensitive adults.
Other factors help Saving Private Ryan be a masterpiece of 90's film making.
The cinematography is excellent, and the music score by John William's is
also superb. It is never intrusive, and adds to the drama on-screen.
But while they are thousands of good things great about Private Ryan,
there's one major flaw that detracts the genius of the film: the writing. It
is unusually flat, with many of the speeches strangely weak. The film never
really makes any profound statements. This is not a major gripe, as Private
Ryan is a film of action, not words. Still, the script could of been a lot
better. Thankfully, the actors help partly to rectify the situation with
their great delivery of their lines.
Saving Private Ryan, in the end, is an excellent film, but not the 'greatest
war movie' due to it's weak acting. This film should be viewed by everyone
who has the stomach for it, as it's rewarding and extremely worthwhile. It
really shouldn't be missed, and Dreamworks SKG has finally found it's first
hit movie.
Š1998 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Andrew Hicks
        Call me crazy, but I don't see SAVING PRIVATE RYAN as the film 
of the summer. A good movie, yes, with chillingly realistic battle 
scenes and emotion to spare. An utterly riviting movie on par with 
Steven Spielberg's best work, no. Personally, if I was Spielberg, I 
wouldn't go back to the World War II era one more time after 
SCHINDLER'S LIST and the Indiana Jones movies. I'm guessing Steve has 
a thing for Nazis; I really wouldn't be surprised if a velociraptor ate 
one of the swastika-wearing dudes in the next JURASSIC PARK movie.
        All lofty pretenses aside, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is the goriest 
movie this side of a 1980s slasher flick. The difference is, it's easy 
during FRIDAY THE 13TH to laugh off a spear sticking out of Kevin 
Bacon's chest while blood spurts like crazy, but it's damn hard to sit 
and eat Reese's Pieces while soldiers suffer machine gun bullets to the 
head and have their intestines spilled out onto the battlefield.
        And believe me, there's plenty of it. A 30-minute sequence at 
the beginning of the movie has an Army captain (Tom Hanks) and his 
soldiers landing at Omaha Beach to join countless other Americans 
who are already under fire. Lives are lost in seconds as the 
purposefully confusing and jarring scene goes on and on, and all the 
young men in the audience find themselves never, ever wanting to be 
drafted.
        Cut to some bureaucratic defense office, where a hundred 
women pound out sympathy form letters to the families of the 
casualties. One woman happens upon an interesting detail -- three 
brothers in different platoons were killed in combat, and their mother 
is getting the telegram today. I guess it's an interesting conversation 
piece to everyone but the mother, so the Army chief (Harve Presnell) 
sends Hanks on what is essentially a public relations mission, to find 
the fourth Ryan brother and send him home. That way, the Army 
saves the postage on yet another telegram to Mrs. Ryan.
        One good thing about SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is that the soldiers 
who are headed to rescue Ryan know it's a mission designed to make 
the Army look good. They question the worth of risking eight soldiers' 
lives to save one, and Hanks' character admits he doesn't give a damn 
about Ryan; he's just following orders. If this was a John Wayne 
movie, things would be different. There'd be a phony, "Let's go get that 
boy, gosh darn it!" attitude that would sugarcoat the reality of war. By 
doing things this way, Spielberg admits the instincts of self-
preservation and complacency that every normal person has. It makes 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN a lot more powerful than an testosterone-driven 
Stallone movie mission.
        The movie's pattern is to have long battle scenes followed by 
quiet scenes of semi-introspective conversation among the soldiers. 
Hanks is painted first as a nails-tough Army man careful to hide his 
true self from the other men. It's not that way for long. Edward Burns, 
the guy you get for your movie when Ben Affleck isn't available, is the 
impulsive one. Jeremy Davies plays the translator who is seeing 
combat for the first time, and so on. None of the characters are 
fascinating or natural born heroes, but was Spielberg's obvious 
intention.
        I wondered when I heard SAVING PRIVATE RYAN was three 
hours long, how were they going to fill three hours' time searching for 
one person and still make it interesting? There are a few false starts; 
Hanks finds one Private Ryan in Ted Danson's company (Apparently, 
Danson joined the Army after "Ink" was canceled.) and breaks the bad 
news before learning it's the wrong Ryan. And of course the movie's 
far from over when Hanks does locate Ryan (Matt Damon, the other 
guy you get when Affleck isn't available). That's when the movie turns 
into more of a conventional war flick, although body parts and limbs 
still fly like never before.
        SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is worth your time, but it's definitely no 
SCHINDLER'S LIST. The battle scenes are intense and realistic, but some 
of the attempts at sincere emotion aren't. The movie's bookends are 
particularly cheesy and out of place, when an old Private Ryan goes to 
the cemetary with his family and bawls his eyes out, whining, "Tell me 
I've led a good life. Tell me I'm a good man." Spielberg was apparently 
following the James Cameron line of thought that any three-hour 
movie about the past should be framed by a self-contained prologue 
and epilogue that takes place in the present.
        Much more effective are subtler scenes, like the one where 
several of Hanks' men are rifling thrugh a bag of dogtags from dead 
soldiers, and they make light of what they're doing by pretending 
they're playing poker. This while an airborne division marches by, 
their eyes full of that mound of dogtags. By not explicitly pointing out 
that it symbolizes the random poker game that life and death can be in 
war, the audience gets the message. And even if it's not a classic, 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is definitely one of the better war movies out 
there.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   Once again, Steven Spielberg proves that as a constructer
of movie images, he's unbeatable.  Critic Matt Zoller Seitz
reports in the July 8 issue of New York Press that "Spielberg
is the most consistently inventive, passionate and precise
director in American cinema....It's a rare shot in a Spielberg
film that isn't beautiful."  While we'd have a tough time
describing scenes of total warfare as beautiful, we would have
to admit that as a forger of indelible images, Spielberg has
accomplished his principal goal in the making of "Saving
Private Ryan."  He has demonstrated the sheer reality of war
as no other filmmaker before him has done.  His latest film
does not move us as did Lewis Milestone's 1930 film "All
Quiet on the Western Front."  Milestone's 68-year-old work is
cloaked with a powerful antiwar message based on Erich
Maria Remarque's pacifist novel about German boy's
experiences as soldier's during World War I. "All Quiet" hones
in more effectively on the war's meaning to a single
individual.  "Ryan" is more of a piece with Ken Annakin's 1962
epic, "The Longest Day," featuring an all-star cast in a
retelling of the Allied invasion of Normandy--a re-creation of
historical events emphasizing the actuality of battle more than
an exploration of the lives of its combatants.  "Ryan" is no
"Schindler's List," still Spielberg's greatest accomplishment,
because its characters do not undergo radical changes of
behavior. As portrayed by Spielberg, Schindler was a
man of particular interest because he was such a flawed
character; a businessman whose principal goal at first was to
become a millionaire using cheap Jewish labor, who proudly
wore a Nazi insignia in his jacket and loved his brandy, night
clubs and finely-tailored suits.  "The Saving of Private Ryan"
includes no such complex personality.  We know little of its
hero, subtly played by Tom Hanks, save that he was an
English teacher in a small town high school and who, despite
a pronounced tremor in his right hand has no distinct
imperfections.  Characterization is what made "Schindler's
List" mong the most moving films of all time.  Imagery, on the
other hand, makes "The Saving of Private Ryan" remarkable.
   You need not wait long to perceive this.  While the story is
framed by a contemporary scene in much the way that
Spielberg concluded "Schindler's List," the attention of Janusz
Kaminski's frequently hand-held camera shifts to the landing
of troops on Omaha Beach, situated in a northwest corner of
France just east of Cherbourg.  It is D-Day, June 6, 1944, the
opening day of the Allied invasion of Europe and the men
who are about to hit the sands are not a platoon of gung-ho
Zorros preparing to battle evil.  Some are throwing up, others
pray in a variety of tongues; orders are barked as though the
men were hearing the proposed strategy of the campaign,
which was effectively kept a secret from Nazi intelligence. 
The Omaha campaign, a pyrrhic victory for the Allies, was
bungled from the start.  The Americans appear to lose ten
men for every German killed, hitting the beach amid a flurry of
bullets from the enemy who are situated high above them as
though lobbing kettles of hot oil from the tower
of a medieval castle.  In the confusion of the adrenalin-
pumping scene, the American forces cannot be blamed for
some acts of stupidity and self-destruction, foremost of which
is that of one G.I. whose life is saved when a bullet richochets
from his helmet.  He removes the helmet in surprise, stares at
it in wonderment, and promptly receives a fatal bullet in the
head.  Spielberg is a master at representing carnage in a
believable, indelible fashion, spinning his camera to the sea
which has become incarnadine with the blood of American
victims.  The stereophonic sound sound of the theater
envelopes up in the endless rat-tat-tat of machine guns
accompanied subtly and only intermittently by John Williams's
score.  Little music is needed to manipulate our emotions.
   While "Saving Private Ryan" succeeds each time it portrays
combat, it is less successful in developing its characters, and
particularly uninventive and superficial in verbalizing ethical
questions.  The storyline hinges on an order received from
the very top brass, Chief of Staff George C. Marshall, to
search out and bring home one James Francis Ryan, the sole
surviving member of a family of five.  On a single day Ryan's
mother receives news from the war office that three of her
sons were killed in action.  To save Mrs. Ryan the tragedy of
losing her last surviving boy, the general has ordered a
dangerous mission: a team will comb the area of France to
which Private Ryan (Matt Damon) has parachuted, find the
soldier, and escort him home.  Captain Miller (Tom Hanks) is
chosen to lead the search party, made up of his right-hand
man, Sergeant Horvath (Tom Sizemore); an intellectual pulled
from his desk job as a language interpreter, Corporal Upham
(Jeremy Davies); a Jewish soldier from Brooklyn, Private
Mellish (Adam Golberg); and a medic, Wade (Giovanni Ribisi),
who must try without sterile equipment or even gloves to save
the lives of men who receive bullet wounds in the field. 
Ethical issues are raised in short order, as the small legion
question the appropriateness of risking the lives of eight
people in order to remove a single soldier from his company. 
Further debate focuses on whether James Ryan should be
singled out for release from combat since "we all have
mothers," from which two additional issues emerge. 
What if removing Ryan from the battlefield will cause a
hardship in his own unit, which needs him badly to fulfill a
bridge-blowing mission, and what if Ryan himself does not
want to desert "the only brothers I know," the men in his unit
he has grown to love?
   Though the story is driven by the search for one man, the
glory of the movie is in portraying a succession of combat
scenes which materialize almost without letup, without giving
the audience much time to breathe.  The rapid-fire sequence
of bloody encounters maintains the tension throughout the
170-minute film but do not allow for much insight into the lives
of the individuals in the unit.  Aside from the initial portrayal of
the Gallipoli-like bloodshed at Omaha Beach, Spielberg
extracts the horrors of war from some noteworthy panoramas. 
In one instance involving hand-to-hand combat between a
large, powerful German and a hapless member of the search
party, the German gains a dominant position over Private
Mellish, his knife slowly descending toward Mellish's heart as
the American impotently calls out "stop!"  In another, a
German unit is successfully ambushed by the Americans and
wiped out save for one German, who is ordered to dig a
grave for his dead buddies.  The Nazi soldier, desperately
trying to save his hide, insists "I love America," tries
pathetically to sing the Star Spangled Banner, curses Hitler,
and forces Captain Miller to make a decision amid appeals
from the scholarly Upham that killing him "is not right."
   Tom Hanks's performance is visceral. You can imagine him
as the beloved, small-town English teacher who takes up
arms when duty calls.  You see Matt Damon as the all-
American farm boy whose loyalty to his troop is more exalted
than his fondness for hom.  You empathize with Edward
Burns who as Private Reiben is so enraged by the seeming
absurdity of the mission that he is prepared to desert.  And
you can understand the screwups of Jeremy Davies who, as
a language interpreter with only the barest of arms training,
rains havoc on his own men until he gains the courage of the
battlefield.
   The immediacy of the drama is furthered by the use of
a hand-held camera, stripped of protective lens coatings to
give the film the look of a 1940s war picture. The unit's
success in impressing us with the horrors of war is due
largely to the use of Stephen E. Ambrose, author of
"D-Day: June 6, 1994," as historical consultant.  Credibility is
not hurt by the training which a company called Warriors
Inc. gave the actors; a boot camp involving ten days of
rigorous weapons drills, close combat, individual manuevers,
and World War 2 lingo and hand signals.  Spielberg insists
that everything, down to the actual language the men used in
the field, is the 1940s McCoy, and though you can count on
your fingers the number of curse words the men utter, you
can have faith in the great director's word.  After all Spielberg
has made the world believe in the authenticity of a rich array
of films in all genres--the mystical experience of "Close
Encounters," the feverishness of "Sugarland Express," the
wildly imaginative "Indiana Jones" series among others--that if
you've been lucky enough to avoid front-line service, you can
with absolutely safety be right up there with Captain Miller's
daredevil unit.
